Left-Wing Communism: An Infantile Disorder

Vladimir Ilyich Lenin

 

 

WRITTEN: April—May 1920 

 

SOURCE: _Collected Works_, Volume 31, p. 17—118
 

PUBLISHER: Progress Publishers, USSR, 1964 
 

FIRST PUBLISHED: As pamphlet, June 1920 

 

TRANSLATED: Julius Katzer 

 

TRANSCRIBED: Zodiac

TRANSCRIPTION\MARKUP: Brian Baggins and David Walters

PUBLIC DOMAIN: Lenin Internet Archive (marxists.org) 2005. You may
freely copy, distribute, display and perform this work; as well as make
derivative and commercial works. Please credit “Marxists Internet
Archive” as your source.

 

HTML VERSION: http://marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1920/lwc/index.htm

 

CONVERTED TO EBOOK FORMAT BY: Sajjan Singh (2014)

 

CONTENTS

Note from the Lenin Internet Archive

In What Sense We Can Speak of the International Significance of the
Russian Revolution

An Essential Condition of the Bolsheviks’ Success

The Principal Stages in the History of Bolshevism

The Years of Preparation for the Revolution (1903-05)

The years of revolution (1905-07)

The years of reaction (1907-10)

The years of revival (1910-14)

The second revolution in Russia (February to October 1917)

The Struggle Against Which Enemies Within the Working-Class Movement
Helped Bolshevism Develop, Gain Strength, and Become Steeled

"Left-Wing" Communism in Germany: The Leaders, the Party, the Class, the
Masses

Should Revolutionaries Work in Reactionary Trade Unions?

Should we Participate in Bourgeois Parliaments?

No Compromises?

“Left-Wing” Communism in Great Britain

Several Conclusions

Appendix

I. The Split Among the German Communists

II. The Communists and The Independents in Germany

III. Turatie and Co. in Italy

IV. False Conclusions from Correct Premises

V

Letter From Wijnkoop

 



NOTE FROM THE LENIN INTERNET ARCHIVE


 

With this now-classic work, Lenin aimed to encapsulate the lessons the
Bolshevik Party had learned from its involvement in three revolutions in
12 years—in a manner that European Communists could relate to, for it
was to them he was speaking. He also further develops the theory of what
the "dictatorship of the proletariat" means and stresses that the
primary danger for the working-class movement in general is opportunism
on the one hand, and anti-Marxist ultra-leftism on the other.

 

_"Left-Wing" Communism: an Infantile Disorder_ was written in April, and
the appendix was written on May 12, 1920. It came out on June 8-10 in
Russian and in July was published in German, English and French. Lenin
gave personal attention to the book’s type-setting and printing schedule
so that it would be published before the opening of the Second Congress
of the Communist International, each delegate receiving a copy. Between
July and November 1920, the book was re-published in Leipzig, Paris and
London, in the German, French and English languages respectively.

 

_"Left-Wing" Communism: an Infantile Disorder_ is published according to
the first edition print, the proofs of which were read by Lenin himself.

 



IN WHAT SENSE WE CAN SPEAK OF THE INTERNATIONAL SIGNIFICANCE OF THE RUSSIAN REVOLUTION


 

In the first months after the proletariat in Russia had won political
power (October 25 [November 7], 1917), it might have seemed that the
enormous difference between backward Russia and the advanced countries
of Western Europe would lead to the proletarian revolution in the latter
countries bearing very little resemblance to ours. We now possess quite
considerable international experience, which shows very definitely that
certain fundamental features of our revolution have a significance that
is not local, or peculiarly national, or Russian alone, but
international. I am not speaking here of international significance in
the broad sense of the term: not merely several but all the primary
features of our revolution, and many of its secondary features, are of
international significance in the meaning of its effect: on all
countries. I am speaking of it in the narrowest sense of the word,
taking international significance to mean the international validity or
the historical inevitability of a repetition, on an international scale,
of what has taken place in our country. It must be admitted that certain
fundamental features of our revolution do possess that significance.

 

It would, of course, be grossly erroneous to exaggerate this truth and
to extend it beyond certain fundamental features of our revolution. It
would also be erroneous to lose sight of the fact that, soon after the
victory of the proletarian revolution in at least one of the advanced
countries, a sharp change will probably come about: Russia will cease to
be the model and will once again become a backward country (in the
"Soviet" and the socialist sense).

 

At the present moment in history, however, it is the Russian model that
reveals to _all_ countries something—and something highly significant—of
their near and inevitable future. Advanced workers in all lands have
long realised this; more often than not, they have grasped it with their
revolutionary class instinct rather than realised it. Herein lies the
international "significance" (in the narrow sense of the word) of Soviet
power, and of the fundamentals of Bolshevik theory and tactics. The
"revolutionary" leaders of the Second International, such as Kautsky in
Germany and Otto Bauer and Friedrich Adler in Austria, have failed to
understand this, which is why they have proved to be reactionaries and
advocates of the worst kind of opportunism and social treachery.
Incidentally, the anonymous pamphlet entitled _The World Revolution
(Weltrevolution)_, which appeared in Vienna in 1919 _(Sozialistische
Bucherei_, Heft 11; Ignaz Brand), very clearly reveals their entire
thinking and their entire range of ideas, or, rather, the full extent of
their stupidity, pedantry, baseness and betrayal of working-class
interests—and that, moreover, under the guise of "defending" the idea of
"world revolution".

 

We shall, however, deal with this pamphlet in greater detail some other
time. We shall here note only one more point: in bygone days, when he
was still a Marxist and not a renegade, Kautsky, dealing with the
question as an historian, foresaw the possibility of a situation arising
in which the revolutionary spirit of the Russian proletariat would
provide a model to Western Europe. This was in 1902, when Kautsky wrote
an article for the revolutionary _Iskra_,^(¹) entitled "The Slavs and
Revolution". Here is what he wrote in the article:

 

"At the present time [in contrast with 1848] it would seem that not only
have the Slavs entered the ranks of the revolutionary nations, but that
the centre of revolutionary thought and revolutionary action is shifting
more and more to the Slavs. The revolutionary centre is shifting from
the West to the East. In the first half of the nineteenth century it was
located in France, at times in England. In 1848 Germany too joined the
ranks of the revolutionary nations.... The new century has begun with
events which suggest the idea that we are approaching a further shift of
the revolutionary centre, namely, to Russia.... Russia, which has
borrowed so much revolutionary initiative from the West, is now perhaps
herself ready to serve the West as a source of revolutionary energy. The
Russian revolutionary movement that is now flaring up will perhaps prove
to be the most potent means of exorcising the spirit of flabby
philistinism and coldly calculating politics that is beginning to spread
in our midst, and it may cause the fighting spirit and the passionate
devotion to our great ideals to flare up again. To Western Europe,
Russia has long ceased to be a bulwark of reaction and absolutism. I
think the reverse is true today. Western Europe is becoming Russia’s
bulwark of reaction and absolutism.... The Russian revolutionaries might
perhaps have coped with the tsar long ago had they not been compelled at
the same time to fight his ally—European capital. Let us hope that this
time they will succeed in coping with both enemies, and that the new
’Holy Alliance’ will collapse more rapidly than its predecessors did.
However the present struggle in Russia may end, the blood and suffering
of the martyrs whom, unfortunately, it will produce in too great
numbers, will not have been in vain. They will nourish the shoots of
social revolution throughout the civilised world and make them grow more
luxuriantly and rapidly. In 1848 the Slavs were a killing frost which
blighted the flowers of the people’s spring. Perhaps they are now
destined to be the storm that will break the ice of reaction and
irresistibly bring with h a new and happy spring for the nations" (Karl
Kautsky, "The Slavs and Revolution", _Iskra_, Russian Social-Democratic
revolutionary newspaper, No. 18, March 10, 1902).

 

How well Karl Kautsky wrote eighteen years ago!

 



AN ESSENTIAL CONDITION OF THE BOLSHEVIKS’ SUCCESS


 

It is, I think, almost universally realised at present that the
Bolsheviks could not have retained power for two and a half months, let
alone two and a half years, without the most rigorous and truly iron
discipline in our Party, or without the fullest and unreserved support
from the entire mass of the working class, that is, from all thinking,
honest, devoted and influential elements in it, capable of leading the
backward strata or carrying the latter along with them.

 

The dictatorship of the proletariat means a most determined and most
ruthless war waged by the new class against a _more powerful_ enemy, the
bourgeoisie, whose resistance is increased _tenfold_ by their overthrow
(even if only in a single country), and whose power lies, not only in
the strength of international capital, the strength and durability of
their international connections, but also in the _force of habit_, in
the strength of _small_-_scale production._ Unfortunately, small-scale
production is still widespread in the world, and small-scale
production _engenders_ capitalism and the bourgeoisie continuously,
daily, hourly, spontaneously, and on a mass scale. All these reasons
make the dictatorship of the proletariat necessary, and victory over the
bourgeoisie is impossible without a long, stubborn and desperate
life-and-death struggle which calls for tenacity, discipline, and a
single and inflexible will.

 

I repeat: the experience of the victorious dictatorship of the
proletariat in Russia has clearly shown even to those who are incapable
of thinking or have had no occasion to give thought to the matter that
absolute centralisation and rigorous discipline of the proletariat are
an essential condition of victory over the bourgeoisie.

This is often dwelt on. However, not nearly enough thought is given to
what it means, and under what conditions it is possible. Would it not be
better if the salutations addressed to the Soviets and the Bolsheviks
were _more frequently_ accompanied by a _profound analysis_ of the
reasons _why_ the Bolsheviks have been able to build up the discipline
needed by the revolutionary proletariat?

 

As a current of political thought and as a political party, Bolshevism
has existed since 1903. Only the history of Bolshevism during
the _entire_ period of its existence can satisfactorily explain why it
has been able to build up and maintain, under most difficult conditions,
the iron discipline needed for the victory of the proletariat.

 

The first questions to arise are: how is the discipline of the
proletariat’s revolutionary party maintained? How is it tested? How is
it reinforced? First, by the class-consciousness of the proletarian
vanguard and by its devotion to the revolution, by its tenacity,
self-sacrifice and heroism. Second, by its ability to link up, maintain
the closest contact, and—if you wish—merge, in certain measure, with the
broadest masses of the working people—primarily with the
proletariat, _but also with the non_-_proletarian_ masses of working
people. Third, by the correctness of the political leadership exercised
by this vanguard, by the correctness of its political strategy and
tactics, provided the broad masses have seen, _from their own
experience_, that they are correct. Without these conditions, discipline
in a revolutionary party really capable of being the party of the
advanced class, whose mission it is to overthrow the bourgeoisie and
transform the whole of society, cannot be achieved. Without these
conditions, all attempts to establish discipline inevitably fall flat
and end up in phrasemongering and clowning. On the other hand, these
conditions cannot emerge at once. They are created only by prolonged
effort and hard-won experience. Their creation is facilitated by a
correct revolutionary theory, which, in its turn, is not a dogma, but
assumes final shape only in close connection with the practical activity
of a truly mass and truly revolutionary movement.

 

The fact that, in 1917-20, Bolshevism was able, under unprecedentedly
difficult conditions, to build up and successfully maintain the
strictest centralisation and iron discipline was due simply to a number
of historical peculiarities of Russia.

 

On the one hand, Bolshevism arose in 1903 on a very firm foundation of
Marxist theory. The correctness of this revolutionary theory, and of it
alone, has been proved, not only by world experience throughout the
nineteenth century, but especially by the experience of the seekings and
vacillations, the errors and disappointments of revolutionary thought in
Russia. For about half a century—approximately from the forties to the
nineties of the last century—progressive thought in Russia, oppressed by
a most brutal and reactionary tsarism, sought eagerly for a correct
revolutionary theory, and followed with the utmost diligence and
thoroughness each and every "last word" in this sphere in Europe and
America. Russia achieved Marxism—the only correct revolutionary
theory—through the _agony_ she experienced in the course of half a
century of unparalleled torment and sacrifice, of unparalleled
revolutionary heroism, incredible energy, devoted searching, study,
practical trial, disappointment, verification, and comparison with
European experience. Thanks to the political emigration caused by
tsarism, revolutionary Russia, in the second half of the nineteenth
century, acquired a wealth of international links and excellent
information on the forms and theories of the world revolutionary
movement, such as no other country possessed.

 

On the other hand, Bolshevism, which had arisen on this granite
foundation of theory, went through fifteen years of practical history
(1903-17) unequalled anywhere in the world in its wealth of experience.
During those fifteen years, no other country knew anything even
approximating to that revolutionary experience, that rapid and varied
succession of different forms of the movement—legal and illegal,
peaceful and stormy, underground and open, local circles and mass
movements, and parliamentary and terrorist forms. In no other country
has there been concentrated, in so brief a period, such a wealth of
forms, shades, and methods of struggle of _all_ classes of modern
society, a struggle which, owing to the backwardness of the country and
the severity of the tsarist yoke, matured with exceptional rapidity, and
assimilated most eagerly and successfully the appropriate "last word" of
American and European political experience.

 



THE PRINCIPAL STAGES IN THE HISTORY OF BOLSHEVISM


 


The Years of Preparation for the Revolution (1903-05)

 

The approach of a great storm was sensed everywhere. All classes were in
a state of ferment and preparation. Abroad, the press of the political
exiles discussed the theoretical aspects of _all_ the fundamental
problems of the revolution. Representatives of the three main classes,
of the three principal political trends -- the liberal-bourgeois, the
petty-bourgeois-democratic (concealed behind "social-democratic" and
"social-revolutionary" labels^(²)), and the
proletarian-revolutionary—anticipated and prepared the impending open
class struggle by waging a most bitter struggle on issues of programme
and tactics. _All_ the issues on which the masses waged an armed
struggle in 1905-07 and 1917-20 can (and should) be studied, in their
embryonic form, in the press of the period. Among these three main
trends there were, of course, a host of intermediate, transitional or
half-hearted forms. It would be more correct to say that those political
and ideological trends which were genuinely of a class nature
crystallised in the struggle of press organs, parties, factions and
groups; the classes were forging the requisite political and ideological
weapons for the impending battles.

 


The years of revolution (1905-07)

All classes came out into the open. All programmatical and tactical
views were tested by the action of the masses. In its extent and
acuteness, the strike struggle had no parallel anywhere in the world.
The economic strike developed into a political strike, and the latter
into insurrection. The relations between the proletariat, as the leader,
and the vacillating and unstable peasantry, as the led, were tested in
practice. The Soviet form of organisation came into being in the
spontaneous development of the struggle. The controversies of that
period over the significance of the Soviets anticipated the great
struggle of 1917-20. The alternation of parliamentary and
non-parliamentary forms of struggle, of the tactics of boycotting
parliament and that of participating in parliament, of legal and illegal
forms of struggle, and likewise their interrelations and connections—all
this was marked by an extraordinary wealth of content. As for teaching
the fundamentals of political science to masses and leaders, to classes
and parties alike, each month of this period was equivalent to an entire
year of "peaceful" and "constitutional" development. Without the "dress
rehearsal" of 1905, the victory of the October Revolution in 1917 would
have been impossible.

 


The years of reaction (1907-10)

 

Tsarism was victorious. All the revolutionary and opposition parties
were smashed. Depression’ demoralisation, splits, discord, defection,
and pornography took the place of politics. There was an ever greater
drift towards philosophical idealism; mysticism became the garb of
counter-revolutionary sentiments. At the same time, however, it was this
great defeat that taught the revolutionary parties and the revolutionary
class a real and very useful lesson, a lesson in historical dialectics,
a lesson in an understanding of the political struggle, and in the art
and science of waging that struggle. It is at moments of need that one
learns who one’s friends are. Defeated armies learn their lesson.

 

Victorious tsarism was compelled to speed up the destruction of the
remnants of the pre-bourgeois, patriarchal mode of life in Russia. The
country’s development along bourgeois lines proceeded apace. Illusions
that stood outside and above class distinctions, illusions concerning
the possibility of avoiding capitalism, were scattered to the winds. The
class struggle manifested itself in a quite new and more distinct way.

 

The revolutionary parties had to complete their education. They were
learning how to attack. Now they had to realise that such knowledge must
be supplemented with the knowledge of how to retreat in good order. They
had to realise—and it is from bitter experience that the revolutionary
class learns to realise this—that victory is impossible unless one has
learned how to attack and retreat properly. Of all the defeated
opposition and revolutionary parties, the Bolsheviks effected the most
orderly retreat, with the least loss to their "army", with its core best
preserved, with the least significant splits (in point of depth and
incurability), with the least demoralisation, and in the best condition
to resume work on the broadest scale and in the most correct and
energetic manner. The Bolsheviks achieved this only because they
ruthlessly exposed and expelled the revolutionary phrase-mongers, those
who did not wish to understand that one had to retreat, that one had to
know how to retreat, and that one had absolutely to learn how to work
legally in the most reactionary of parliaments, in the most reactionary
of trade unions, co-operative and insurance societies and similar
organisations.

 


The years of revival (1910-14)

 

At first progress was incredibly slow, then, following the Lena events
of 1912, it became somewhat more rapid. Overcoming unprecedented
difficulties, the Bolsheviks thrust back the Mensheviks, whose role as
bourgeois agents in the working-class movement was clearly realised by
the entire bourgeoisie after 1905, and whom the bourgeoisie therefore
supported in a thousand ways against the Bolsheviks. But the Bolsheviks
would never have succeeded in doing this had they not followed the
correct tactics of combining illegal work with the utilisation of "legal
opportunities", which they made a point of doing. In the elections to
the arch-reactionary Duma, the Bolsheviks won the full support of the
worker curia.

The First Imperialist World War (1914-17). Legal parliamentarianism’
with an extremely reactionary "parliament", rendered most useful service
to the Bolsheviks, the party of the revolutionary proletariat. The
Bolshevik deputies were exiled to Siberia.^(³) All shades of
social-imperialism social-chauvinism, social-patriotism, inconsistent
and consistent internationalism, pacifism, and the revolutionary
repudiation of pacifist illusions found full expression in the Russian
emitter press. The learned fools and the old women of the Second
International, who had arrogantly and contemptuously turned up their
noses at the abundance of "factions" in the Russian socialist movement
and at the bitter struggle they were waging among themselves, were
unable—when the war deprived them of their vaunted "legality"
in _all_ the advanced countries -- to organise anything even
approximating such a free (illegal) interchange of views and such a free
(illegal) evolution of correct views as the Russian revolutionaries did
in Switzerland and in a number of other countries. That was why both the
avowed social-patriots and the "Kautskyites" of all countries proved to
be the worst traitors to the proletariat. One of the principal reasons
why Bolshevism was able to achieve victory in 1917-20 was that, since
the end of 1914, it has been ruthlessly exposing the baseness and
vileness of social-chauvinism and "Kautskyism" (to which
Longuetism^(⁴) in France, the views of the Fabians^(⁵) and the leaders
of the Independent Labour Party^(⁶) in Britain, of Turati in Italy,
etc., correspond), the masses later becoming more and more convinced,
from their own experience, of the correctness of the Bolshevik views.

 


The second revolution in Russia (February to October 1917)

 

Tsarism’s senility and obsoleteness had (with the aid of the blows and
hardships of a most agonising war) created an incredibly destructive
force directed against it. Within a few days Russia was transformed into
a democratic bourgeois republic, freer—in war conditions—than any other
country in the world. The leaders of the opposition and revolutionary
parties began to set up a government, just as is done in the most
"strictly parliamentary" republics; the fact that a man had been a
leader of an opposition party in parliament—even in a most reactionary
parliament—_facilitated_ his subsequent role in the revolution.

 

In a few weeks the Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries thoroughly
assimilated all the methods and manners, the arguments and sophistries
of the European heroes of the Second International, of the
ministerialists^(⁷) and other opportunist riff-raff. Everything we now
read about the Scheidemanns and Noskes, about Kautsky and Hilferding,
Renner and Austerlitz, Otto Bauer and Fritz Adler, Turati and Longuet,
about the Fabians and the leaders of the Independent Labour Party of
Britain—all this seems to us (and indeed is) a dreary repetition, a
reiteration, of an old and familiar refrain. We have already witnessed
all this in the instance of the Mensheviks. As history would have it,
the opportunists of a backward country became the forerunners of the
opportunists in a number of advanced countries.

 

If the heroes of the Second International have all gone bankrupt and
have disgraced themselves over the question of the significance and role
of the Soviets and Soviet rule; if the leaders of the three very
important parties which have now left the Second International (namely,
the German Independent Social-Democratic Party,^(⁸) the French
Longuetists and the British Independent Labour Party) have disgraced
themselves and become entangled in this question in a most "telling"
fashion; if they have all shown themselves slaves to the prejudices of
petty-bourgeois democracy (fully in the spirit of the petty-bourgeois of
1848 who called themselves "Social-Democrats")—then we can only say that
we have _already_ witnessed _all this_ in the instance of the
Mensheviks. As history would have it, the Soviets came into being in
Russia in 1905; from February to October 1917 they were turned to a
false use by the Mensheviks, who went bankrupt because of their
inability to understand the role and significance of the Soviets, today
the idea of Soviet power has emerged _throughout the world_ and is
spreading among the proletariat of all countries with extraordinary
speed. Like our Mensheviks, the old heroes of the Second International
are _everywhere_ going bankrupt, because they are incapable of
understanding the role and significance of the Soviets. Experience has
proved that, on certain very important questions of the proletarian
revolution, _all_ countries will inevitably have to do what Russia has
done.

 

Despite views that are today often to be met with in Europe and America,
the Bolsheviks began their victorious struggle against the parliamentary
and (in fact) bourgeois republic and against the Mensheviks in a very
cautious manner, and the preparations they made for it were by no means
simple. At the beginning of the period mentioned, we did _not_ call for
the overthrow of the government but explained that it was impossible to
overthrow it _without_ first changing the composition and the temper of
the Soviets. We did not proclaim a boycott of the bourgeois parliament,
the Constituent Assembly, but said—and following the April (1917)
Conference of our Party began to state officially in the name of the
Party—that a bourgeois republic with a Constituent Assembly would be
better than a bourgeois republic without a Constituent Assembly, but
that a "workers’ and peasants"’ republic, a Soviet republic, would be
better than any bourgeois-democratic, parliamentary republic. Without
such thorough, circumspect and long preparations, we could not have
achieved victory in October 1917, or have consolidated that victory.

 



THE STRUGGLE AGAINST WHICH ENEMIES WITHIN THE WORKING-CLASS MOVEMENT HELPED BOLSHEVISM DEVELOP, GAIN STRENGTH, AND BECOME STEELED


 

First and foremost, the struggle against opportunism which in 1914
definitely developed into social-chauvinism and definitely sided with
the bourgeoisie, against the proletariat. Naturally, this was
Bolshevism’s principal enemy within the working-class movement. It still
remains the principal enemy on an international scale. The Bolsheviks
have been devoting the greatest attention to this enemy. This aspect of
Bolshevik activities is now fairly well known abroad too.

 

It was, however, different with Bolshevism’s other enemy within the
working-class movement. Little is known in other countries of the fact
that Bolshevism took shape, developed and became steeled in the long
years of struggle against _petty_-_bourgeois revolutionism_, which
smacks of anarchism, or borrows something from the latter and, in all
essential matters, does not measure up to the conditions and
requirements of a consistently proletarian class struggle. Marxist
theory has established—and the experience of all European revolutions
and revolutionary movements has fully confirmed—that the petty
proprietor, the small master (a social type existing on a very extensive
and even mass scale in many European countries), who, under capitalism,
always suffers oppression and very frequently a most acute and rapid
deterioration in his conditions of life, and even ruin, easily goes to
revolutionary extremes, but is incapable of perseverance, organisation,
discipline and steadfastness. A petty bourgeois driven to frenzy by the
horrors of capitalism is a social phenomenon which, like anarchism, is
characteristic of all capitalist countries. The instability of such
revolutionism, its barrenness, and its tendency to turn rapidly into
submission, apathy, phantasms, and even a frenzied infatuation with one
bourgeois fad or another—all this is common knowledge. However, a
theoretical or abstract recognition of these truths does not at all rid
revolutionary parties of old errors, which always crop up at unexpected
occasions, in somewhat new forms, in a hitherto unfamiliar garb or
surroundings, in an unusual—a more or less unusual—situation.

 

Anarchism was not infrequently a kind of penalty for the opportunist
sins of the working-class movement. The two monstrosities complemented
each other. And if in Russia—despite the more petty-bourgeois
composition of her population as compared with the other European
countries—anarchism’s influence was negligible during the two
revolutions (of 1905 and 1917) and the preparations for them, this
should no doubt stand partly to the credit of Bolshevism, which has
always waged a most ruthless and uncompromising struggle against
opportunism. I say "partly", since of still greater importance in
weakening anarchism’s influence in Russia was the circumstance that in
the past (the seventies of the nineteenth century) it was able to
develop inordinately and to reveal its absolute erroneousness, its
unfitness to serve the revolutionary class as a guiding theory.

 

When it came into being in 1903, Bolshevism took over the tradition of a
ruthless struggle against petty-bourgeois, semi-anarchist (or
dilettante-anarchist) revolutionism, a tradition which had always
existed in revolutionary Social-Democracy and had become particularly
strong in our country during the years 1900-03, when the foundations for
a mass party of the revolutionary proletariat were being laid in Russia.
Bolshevism took over and carried on the struggle against a party which,
more than any other, expressed the tendencies of petty-bourgeois
revolutionism, namely, the "Socialist-Revolutionary" Party, and waged
that struggle on three main issues. First, that party, which rejected
Marxism, stubbornly refused (or, it might be more correct to say: was
unable) to understand the need for a strictly objective appraisal of the
class forces and their alignment, before taking any political action.
Second, this party considered itself particularly "revolutionary", or
"Left", because of its recognition of individual terrorism,
assassination—something that we Marxists emphatically rejected. It was,
of course, only on grounds of expediency that we rejected individual
terrorism, whereas people who were capable of condemning "on principle"
the terror of the Great French Revolution, or, in general, the terror
employed by a victorious revolutionary party which is besieged by the
bourgeoisie of the whole world, were ridiculed and laughed to scorn by
Plekhanov in 1900-03, when he was a Marxist and a revolutionary. Third,
the "Socialist-Revolutionaries," thought it very "Left" to sneer at the
comparatively insignificant opportunist sins of the German
Social-Democratic Party, while they themselves imitated the extreme
opportunists of that party, for example, on the agrarian question, or on
the question of the dictatorship of the proletariat.

 

History, incidentally, has now confirmed on a vast and world-wide scale
the opinion we have always advocated, namely, that
German _revolutionary_ Social-Democracy (note that as far back as
1900-03 Plekhanov demanded Bernstein’s expulsion from the Party, and in
1913 the Bolsheviks, always continuing this tradition, exposed
Legien’s^(⁹) baseness, vileness and treachery) _came closest_ to being
the party the revolutionary proletariat needs in order to achieve
victory. Today, in 1920, after all the ignominious failures and crises
of the war period and the early post-war years, it can be plainly seen
that, of all the Western parties, the German revolutionary
Social-Democrats produced the finest leaders, and recovered and gained
new strength more rapidly than the others did. This may be seen in the
instances both of the Spartacists^(¹⁰) and the Left, proletarian wing of
the Independent Social-Democratic Party of Germany, which is waging an
incessant struggle against the opportunism and spinelessness of the
Kautskys, Hilferdings, Ledebours and Crispiens. If we now cast a glance
to take in a complete historical period, namely, from the Paris Commune
to the first Socialist Soviet Republic, we shall find that Marxism’s
attitude to anarchism in general stands out most definitely and
unmistakably. In the final analysis, Marxism proved to be correct, and
although the anarchists rightly pointed to the opportunist views on the
state prevalent among most of the socialist parties, it must be said,
first, that this opportunism was connected with the distortion, and even
deliberate suppression, of Marx’s views on the state (in my book, _The
State and Revolution_, I pointed out that for thirty-six years, from
1875 to 1911, Bebel withheld a letter by Engels^(¹¹), which very
clearly, vividly, bluntly and definitively exposed the opportunism of
the current Social-Democratic views on the state); second, that the
rectification of these opportunist views, and the recognition of Soviet
power and its superiority to bourgeois parliamentary democracy proceeded
most rapidly and extensively among those trends in the socialist parties
of Europe and America that were most Marxist.

 

The struggle that Bolshevism waged against "Left" deviations within its
own Party assumed particularly large proportions on two occasions: in
1908, on the question of whether or not to participate in a most
reactionary "parliament" and in the legal workers’ societies, which were
being restricted by most reactionary laws; and again in 1918 (the Treaty
of Brest-Litovsk^(¹²)), on the question of whether one "compromise" or
another was permissible.

In 1908 the "Left" Bolsheviks were expelled from our Party for
stubbornly refusing to understand the necessity of participating in a
most reactionary "parliament".^(¹³)

The "Lefts"—among whom there were many splendid revolutionaries who
subsequently were (and still are) commendable members of the Communist
Party—based themselves particularly on the successful experience of the
1905 boycott. When, in August 1905, the tsar proclaimed the convocation
of a consultative "parliament",^(¹⁴) the Bolsheviks called for its
boycott, in the teeth of all the opposition parties and the Mensheviks,
and the "parliament" was in fact swept away by the revolution of October
1905.^(¹⁵) The boycott proved correct at the time, not because
nonparticipation in reactionary parliaments is correct in general, but
because we accurately appraised the objective situation, which was
leading to the rapid development of the mass strikes first into a
political strike, then into a revolutionary strike, and finally into an
uprising. Moreover, the struggle centred at that time on the question of
whether the convocation of the first representative assembly should be
left to the tsar, or an attempt should be made to wrest its convocation
from the old regime. When there was not, and could not be, any certainty
that the objective situation was of a similar kind, and when there was
no certainty of a similar trend and the same rate of development, the
boycott was no longer correct.

 

The Bolsheviks’ boycott of "parliament" in 1905 enriched the
revolutionary proletariat with highly valuable political experience and
showed that, when legal and illegal parliamentary and non-parliamentary
forms of struggle are combined, it is sometimes useful and even
essential to reject parliamentary forms. It would, however, be highly
erroneous to apply this experience blindly, imitatively and uncritically
to other conditions and other situations. The Bolsheviks, boycott of the
Duma in 1906 was a mistake although a minor and easily remediable
one.^(¹⁶) The boycott of the Duma in 1907, 1908 and subsequent years was
a most serious error and difficult to remedy, because, on the one hand,
a very rapid rise of the revolutionary tide and its conversion into an
uprising was not to be expected, and, on the other hand, the entire
historical situation attendant upon the renovation of the bourgeois
monarchy called for legal and illegal activities being combined. Today,
when we look back at this fully completed historical period, whose
connection with subsequent periods has now become quite clear, it
becomes most obvious that in 1908-14 the Bolsheviks _could not
have_ preserved (let alone strengthened and developed) the core of the
revolutionary party of the proletariat, had they not upheld, in a most
strenuous struggle, the viewpoint that it was _obligatory_ to combine
legal and illegal forms of struggle, and that it was _obligatory_ to
participate even in a most reactionary parliament and in a number of
other institutions hemmed in by reactionary laws (sick benefit
societies, etc.).

 

In 1918 things did not reach a split. At that time the "Left" Communists
formed only a separate group or "faction" within our Party, and that not
for long. In the same year, 1918, the most prominent representatives of
"Left Communism", for example, Comrades Radek and Bukharin, openly
acknowledged their error. It had seemed to them that the Treaty of
Brest-Litovsk was a compromise with the imperialists, which was
inexcusable on principle and harmful to the party of the revolutionary
proletariat. It was indeed a compromise with the imperialists, but it
was a compromise which, under the circumstances, _had to be made._

Today, when I hear our tactics in signing the Brest-Litovsk Treaty being
attacked by the Socialist-Revolutionaries, for instance, or when I hear
Comrade Lansbury say, in a conversation with me, "Our British trade
union leaders say that if it was permissible for the Bolsheviks to
compromise, it is permissible for them to compromise too", I usually
reply by first of all giving a simple and "popular" example:

 

Imagine that your car is held up by armed bandits. You hand them over
your money, passport, revolver and car. In return you are rid of the
pleasant company of the bandits. That is unquestionably a compromise.
"_Do ut des_" (I "give" you money, fire-arms and a car "so that you
give" me the opportunity to get away from you with a whole skin). It
would, however, be difficult to find a sane man who would declare such a
compromise to be "inadmissible on principle", or who would call the
compromiser an accomplice of the bandits (even though the bandits might
use the car and the firearms for further robberies). Our compromise with
the bandits of German imperialism was just that kind of compromise.

 

But when, in 1914-18 and then in 1918-20, the Mensheviks and
Socialist-Revolutionaries in Russia, the Scheidemannites (and to a large
extent the Kautskyites) in Germany, Otto Bauer and Friedrich Adler (to
say nothing of the Renners and Co.) in Austria, the Renaudels and
Longuets and Co. in France, the Fabians, the Independents and the
Labourites in Britain entered into_compromises_ with the bandits of
their own bourgeoisie, and sometimes of the "Allied" bourgeoisie,
and _against_ the revolutionary proletariat of their own countries, all
these gentlemen were actually acting as _accomplices in banditry._

 

The conclusion is clear: to reject compromises "on principle", to reject
the permissibility of compromises in general, no matter of what kind, is
childishness, which it is difficult even to consider seriously. A
political leader who desires to be useful to the revolutionary
proletariat must be able to distinguish _concrete_ cases of compromises
that are inexcusable and are an expression of opportunism
and _treachery;_ he must direct all the force of criticism, the full
intensity of merciless exposure and relentless war, against _these
concrete_ compromises, and not allow the past masters of "practical"
socialism and the parliamentary Jesuits to dodge and wriggle out of
responsibility by means of disquisitions on "compromises in general". It
is in this way that the "leaders,, of the British trade unions, as well
as of the Fabian society and the "Independent" Labour Party, dodge
responsibility _for the treachery they have perpetrated’_ for having
made _a compromise_ that is really tantamount to the worst kind of
opportunism, treachery and betrayal.

 

There are different kinds of compromises. One must be able to analyse
the situation and the concrete conditions of each compromise, or of each
variety of compromise. One must learn to distinguish between a man who
has given up his money and fire-arms to bandits so as to lessen the evil
they can do and to facilitate their capture and execution, and a man who
gives his money and fire-arms to bandits so as to share in the loot. In
politics this is by no means always as elementary as it is in this
childishly simple example. However, anyone who is out to think up for
the workers some kind of recipe that will provide them with
cut-and-dried solutions for all contingencies, or promises that the
policy of the revolutionary proletariat will never come up against
difficult or complex situations, is simply a charlatan.

 

To leave no room for misinterpretation, I shall attempt to outline, if
only very briefly, several fundamental rules for the analysis of
concrete compromises.

 

The party which entered into a compromise with the German imperialists
by signing the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk had been evolving its
internationalism in practice ever since the end of 1914. It was not
afraid to call for the defeat of the tsarist monarchy and to condemn
"defence of country" in a war between two imperialist robbers. The
parliamentary representatives of this party preferred exile in Siberia
to taking a road leading to ministerial portfolios in a bourgeois
government. The revolution that overthrew tsarism and established a
democratic republic put this party to a new and tremendous test—it did
not enter into any agreements with its "own" imperialists, but prepared
and brought about their overthrow. When it had assumed political power,
this party did not leave a vestige of either landed or capitalist
ownership. After making public and repudiating the imperialists’ secret
treaties, this party proposed peace to _all_ nations, and yielded to the
violence of the Brest-Litovsk robbers only after the Anglo-French
imperialists had torpedoed the conclusion of a peace, and after the
Bolsheviks had done everything humanly possible to hasten the revolution
in Germany and other countries. The absolute correctness of this
compromise, entered into by such a party in such a situation, is
becoming ever clearer and more obvious with every day.

 

The Mensheviks and the Socialist-Revolutionaries in Russia (like all the
leaders of the Second International throughout the world, in 1914-20)
began with treachery—by directly or indirectly justifying "defence of
country", i.e., the defence _of their own_ predatory bourgeoisie. They
continued their treachery by entering into a coalition with the
bourgeoisie _of their own_ country, and fighting, together with _their
own_ bourgeoisie, against the revolutionary proletariat of their own
country. Their bloc, first with Kerensky and the Cadets, and then with
Kolchak and Denikin in Russia—like the bloc of their _confreres_ abroad
with the bourgeoisie of _their_ respective countries—was in fact
desertion to the side of the bourgeoisie, against the proletariat. From
beginning to end, _their_ compromise with the bandits of imperialism
meant their becoming _accomplices_ in imperialist banditry.

 



"LEFT-WING" COMMUNISM IN GERMANY: THE LEADERS, THE PARTY, THE CLASS, THE MASSES


 

The German Communists we must now speak of call themselves, not
"Left-wingers" but, if I am not mistaken, an "opposition on
principle".^(¹⁷) From what follows below it will, however, be seen that
they reveal all the symptoms of the "infantile disorder of Leftism".

 

Published by the "local group in Frankfurt am Main", a pamphlet
reflecting the point of view of this opposition, and entitled _The Split
in the Communist Party of Germany (The Spartacus League)_ sets forth the
substance of this Opposition’s views most saliently, and with the utmost
clarity and concision. A few quotations will suffice to acquaint the
reader with that substance:

 

"The Communist Party is the party of the most determined class
struggle...."

 

"... Politically, the transitional period [between capitalism and
socialism] is one of the proletarian dictatorship...."

 

"... The question arises: who is to exercise this dictatorship: _the
Communist Party or the proletarian class_? ..._ Fundamentally_, should
we strive for a dictatorship’ of the Communist Party, or for a
dictatorship of the proletarian class?..."

 

(All italics as in the orginal)

 

The author of the pamphlet goes on to accuse the Central Committee of
the Communist Party of Germany of seeking ways of achieving a coalition
with the Independent Social-Democratic Party of Germany, and of
raising "the question of recognising, in principle, all political
means" of struggle, including parliamentarianism, with the sole purpose
of concealing its actual and main efforts to form a coalition with the
Independents. The pamphlet goes on to say:

 

"The opposition have chosen another road. They are of the opinion that
the question of the rule of the Communist Party and of the dictatorship
of the Party is merely one of tactics. In any case, rule by the
Communist Party is the ultimate form of any party rule. _Fundamentally_,
we must work for the dictatorship of the proletarian class. And all the
measures of the Party, its organisations, methods of struggle, strategy
and tactics should be directed’ to that end. Accordingly, all compromise
with other parties, all reversion to parliamentary forms of struggle
which have become historically and politically obsolete, and any policy
of manoeuvring and compromise must be emphatically rejected."
"Specifically proletarian methods of revolutionary struggle must be
strongly emphasised. New forms of organisation must be created on the
widest basis and with the widest scope in order to enlist the most
extensive proletarian circles and strata to take part in the
revolutionary struggle under the leadership of the Communist Party.
A _Workers’ Union_, based on factory organisations, should be the
rallying point for all revolutionary elements. This should unite all
workers who follow the slogan: ’Get out of the trade unions!’ It is here
that the militant proletariat musters its ranks for battle. Recognition
of the class struggle, of the Soviet system and of the dictatorship
should be sufficient for enrolment. All subsequent political education
of the fighting masses and their political orientation in the struggle
are the task of the Communist Party, which stands outside the Workers’
Union....

 

"... Consequently, two Communist parties are now arrayed against each
other:

 

_"One is a party of leaders_, which is out to organise the revolutionary
struggle and to direct it from _above_, accepting compromises and
parliamentarianism so as to create a situation enabling it to join a
coalition government exercising a dictatorship.

 

"_The other is a mass party_, which expects an upsurge of the
revolutionary struggle from _below_, which knows and applies a single
method in this struggle—a method which clearly leads to the goal -- and
rejects all parliamentary and opportunist methods. That single method is
the unconditional _overthrow of the bourgeoisie_, so as then to set up
the proletarian class dictatorship for the accomplishment of
socialism...

 

"... There—the dictatorship of leaders; here—the dictatorship of the
masses! That is our slogan."

 

Such are the main features characterising the views of the opposition in
the German Communist Party.

 

Any Bolshevik who has consciously participated in the development of
Bolshevism since 1903 or has closely observed that development will at
once say, after reading these arguments, "What old and familiar rubbish!
What ’Left-wing’ childishness!"

 

But let us examine these arguments a little more closely.

 

The mere presentation of the question—"dictatorship of the
party _or_ dictatorship of the class; dictatorship (party) of the
leaders, _or_ dictatorship (party) of the masses?"—testifies to most
incredibly and hopelessly muddled thinking. These people want
to _invent_ something quite out of the ordinary, and, in their effort to
be clever, make themselves ridiculous. It is common knowledge that the
masses are divided into classes, that the masses can be contrasted with
classes only by contrasting the vast majority in general, regardless of
division according to status in the social system of production, with
categories holding a definite status in the social system of production;
that as a rule and in most cases—at least in present-day civilised
countries—classes are led by political parties; that political parties,
as a general rule, are run by more or less stable groups composed of the
most authoritative, influential and experienced members, who are elected
to the most responsible positions, and are called leaders. All this is
elementary. All this is clear and simple. Why replace this with some
kind of rigmarole, some new Volap?k? On the one hand, these people seem
to have got muddled when they found themselves in a predicament, when
the party’s abrupt transition from legality to illegality upset the
customary, normal and simple relations between leaders, parties and
classes. In Germany, as in other European countries, people had become
too accustomed to legality, to the free and proper election of "leaders"
at regular party congresses, to the convenient method of testing the
class composition of parties through parliamentary elections, mass
meetings the press, the sentiments of the trade unions and other
associations, etc. When, instead of this customary procedure, it became
necessary, because of the stormy development of the revolution and the
development of the civil war, to go over rapidly from legality to
illegality, to combine the two, and to adopt the "inconvenient" and
"undemocratic" methods of selecting, or forming, or preserving "groups
of leaders"—people lost their bearings and began to think up some
unmitigated nonsense. Certain members of the Communist Party of Holland,
who were unlucky enough to be born in a small country with traditions
and conditions of highly privileged and highly stable legality, and who
had never seen a transition from legality to illegality, probably fell
into confusion, lost their heads, and helped create these absurd
inventions.

 

On the other hand, one can see simply a thoughtless and incoherent use
of the now "fashionable" terms: "masses" and "leaders". These people
have heard and memorised a great many attacks on "leaders", in which the
latter have been contrasted with the "masses"; however, they have proved
unable to think matters out and gain a clear understanding of what it
was all about.

 

The divergence between "leaders" and "masses" was brought out with
particular clarity and sharpness in all countries at the end of the
imperialist war and following it. The principal reason for this was
explained many times by Marx and Engels between the years 1852 and 1892,
from the example of Britain. That country’s exclusive position led to
the emergence, from the "masses", of a semi-petty-bourgeois, opportunist
"labour aristocracy". The leaders of this labour aristocracy were
constantly going over to the bourgeoisie, and were directly or
indirectly on its pay roll. Marx earned the honour of incurring the
hatred of these disreputable persons by openly branding them as
traitors. Present-day (twentieth-century) imperialism has given a few
advanced countries an exceptionally privileged position, which,
everywhere in the Second International, has produced a certain type of
traitor, opportunist, and social-chauvinist leaders, who champion the
interests of their own craft, their own section of the labour
aristocracy. The opportunist parties have become separated from the
"masses", i.e., from the broadest strata of the working people, their
majority, the lowest-paid workers. The revolutionary proletariat cannot
be victorious unless this evil is combated, unless the opportunist,
social-traitor leaders are exposed, discredited and expelled. That is
the policy the Third International has embarked on.

 

To go so far, in this connection, as to contrast, _in general_, the
dictatorship of the masses with a dictatorship of the leaders is
ridiculously absurd, and stupid. What is particularly amusing is that,
in fact, instead of the old leaders, who hold generally accepted views
on simple matters, _new leaders_ are brought forth (under cover of the
slogan "Down with the leaders!"), who talk rank stuff and nonsense. Such
are Laufenberg, Wolffheim, Horner^(¹⁸), Karl Schroder, Friedrich Wendel
and Karl Erler,^(¹⁹) in Germany. Erler’s attempts to give the question
more "profundity" and to proclaim that in general political parties are
unnecessary and "bourgeois" are so supremely absurd that one can only
shrug one’s shoulders. It all goes to drive home the truth that a minor
error can always assume monstrous proportions if it is persisted in, if
profound justifications are sought for it, and if it is carried to its
logical conclusion.

 

Repudiation of the Party principle and of Party discipline -- that is
what the opposition has _arrived at_. And this is tantamount to
completely disarming the proletariat in _the interests of the
bourgeoisie_. It all adds up to that petty-bourgeois diffuseness and
instability, that incapacity for sustained effort, unity and organised
action, which, if encouraged, must inevitably destroy any proletarian
revolutionary movement. From the standpoint of communism, repudiation of
the Party principle means attempting to leap from the eve of
capitalism’s collapse (in Germany), not to the lower or the intermediate
phase of communism, but to the higher. We in Russia (in the third year
since the overthrow of the bourgeoisie) are making the first steps in
the transition from capitalism to socialism or the lower stage of
communism. Classes still remain, and will remain everywhere _for years
after_ the proletariat’s conquest of power. Perhaps in Britain, where
there is no peasantry (but where petty proprietors exist), this period
may be shorter. The abolition of classes means, not merely ousting the
landowners and the capitalists—that is something we accomplished with
comparative ease; it also means _abolishing the small commodity
producers_, and they _cannot be ousted_, or crushed; we _must learn to
live_ with them. They can (and must) be transformed and re-educated only
by means of very prolonged, slow, and cautious organisational work. They
surround the proletariat on every side with a petty-bourgeois
atmosphere, which permeates and corrupts the proletariat, and constantly
causes among the proletariat relapses into petty-bourgeois
spinelessness, disunity, individualism, and alternating moods of
exaltation and dejection. The strictest centralisation and discipline
are required within the political party of the proletariat in order to
counteract this, in order that the _organisational_ role of the
proletariat (and that is its_principal_ role) may be exercised
correctly, successfully and victoriously. The dictatorship of the
proletariat means a persistent struggle—bloody and bloodless, violent
and peaceful, military and economic, educational and administrative --
against the forces and traditions of the old society. The force of habit
in millions and tens of millions is a most formidable force. Without a
party of iron that has been tempered in the struggle, a party enjoying
the confidence of all honest people in the class in question, a party
capable of watching and influencing the mood of the masses, such a
struggle cannot be waged successfully. It is a thousand times easier to
vanquish the centralised big bourgeoisie than to "vanquish" the millions
upon millions of petty proprietors; however, through their ordinary,
everyday, imperceptible, elusive and demoralising activities, they
produce the _very_ results which the bourgeoisie need and which tend
to _restore_ the bourgeoisie. Whoever brings about even the slightest
weakening of the iron discipline of the party of the proletariat
(especially during its dictatorship), is actually aiding the bourgeoisie
against the proletariat.

 

Parallel with the question of the leaders—the party—the class—the
masses, we must pose the question of the "reactionary" trade unions. But
first I shall take the liberty of making a few concluding remarks based
on the experience of our Party. There _have always been_ attacks on the
"dictatorship of leaders" in our Party. The first time I heard such
attacks, I recall, was in 1895, when, officially, no party yet existed,
but a central group was taking shape in St. Petersburg, which was to
assume the leadership of the district groups.^(²⁰) At the Ninth Congress
of our Party (April 1920)^(²¹), there was a small opposition, which also
spoke against the "dictatorship of leaders", against the "oligarchy",
and so on. There is therefore nothing surprising, new, or terrible in
the "infantile disorder" of "Left-wing communism" among the Germans. The
ailment involves no danger, and after it the organism even becomes more
robust. In our case, on the other hand, the rapid alternation of legal
and illegal work, which made it necessary to keep the general staff—the
leaders—under cover and cloak them in the greatest secrecy, sometimes
gave rise to extremely dangerous consequences. The worst of these was
that in 1912 the _agent provocateur_ Malinovsky got into the Bolshevik
Central Committee. He betrayed scores and scores of the best and most
loyal comrades, caused them to be sentenced to penal servitude, and
hastened the death of many of them. That he did not cause still greater
harm was due to the correct balance between legal and illegal work. As
member of the Party’s Central Committee and Duma deputy, Malinovsky was
forced, in order to gain our confidence, to help us establish legal
daily papers, which even under tsarism were able to wage a struggle
against the Menshevik opportunism and to spread the fundamentals of
Bolshevism in a suitably disguised form. While, with one hand,
Malinovsky sent scores and scores of the finest Bolsheviks to penal
servitude and death, he was obliged, with the other, to assist in the
education of scores and scores of thousands of new Bolsheviks through
the medium of the legal press. Those German (and also British, American,
French and Italian) comrades who are faced with the task of learning how
to conduct revolutionary work within the reactionary trade unions would
do well to give serious thought to this fact.^(²²)

 

In many countries, including the most advanced, the bourgeoisie are
undoubtedly sending _agents provocateurs_ into the Communist parties and
will continue to do so. A skilful combining of illegal and legal work is
one of the ways to combat this danger.

 



SHOULD REVOLUTIONARIES WORK IN REACTIONARY TRADE UNIONS?


 

The German "Lefts" consider that, as far as they are concerned, the
reply to this question is an unqualified negative. In their opinion,
declamations and angry outcries (such as uttered by K. Homer in a
particularly "solid" and particularly stupid manner) against
"reactionary" and "counter-revolutionary" trade unions are sufficient
"proof" that it is unnecessary and even inexcusable for revolutionaries
and Communists to work in yellow, social-chauvinist, compromising and
counter-revolutionary trade unions of the Legien type.

 

However firmly the German "Lefts" may be convinced of the revolutionism
of such tactics, the latter are in fact fundamentally wrong, and contain
nothing but empty phrases.

 

To make this clear, I shall begin with our own experience, in keeping
with the general plan of the present pamphlet, which is aimed at
applying to Western Europe whatever is universally practicable,
significant and relevant in the history and the present-day tactics of
Bolshevism.

 

In Russia today, the connection between leaders, party, class and
masses, as well as the attitude of the dictatorship of the proletariat
and its party to the trade unions, are concretely as follows: the
dictatorship is exercised by the proletariat organised in the Soviets;
the proletariat is guided by the Communist Party of Bolsheviks, which,
according to the figures of the latest Party Congress (April 1920), has
a membership of 611,000. The membership varied greatly both before and
after the October Revolution, and used to be much smaller, even in 1918
and 1919.^(²³) We are apprehensive of an excessive growth of the Party,
because careerists and charlatans, who deserve only to be shot,
inevitably do all they can to insinuate themselves into the ranks of the
ruling party. The last time we opened wide the doors of the Party—to
workers and peasants only -- was when (in the winter of 1919) Yudenich
was within a few versts of Petrograd, and Denikin was in Orel (about 350
versts from Moscow), i.e., when the Soviet Republic was in mortal
danger, and when adventurers, careerists, charlatans and unreliable
persons generally could not possibly count on making a profitable career
(and had more reason to expect the gallows and torture) by joining the
Communists.^(²⁴) The Party, which holds annual congresses (the most
recent on the basis of one delegate per 1,000 members), is directed by a
Central Committee of nineteen elected at the Congress, while the current
work in Moscow has to be carried on by still smaller bodies, known as
the Organising Bureau and the Political Bureau, which are elected at
plenary meetings of the Central Committee, five members of the Central
Committee to each bureau. This, it would appear, is a full-fledged
"oligarchy". No important political or organisational question is
decided by any state institution in our republic without the guidance of
the Party’s Central Committee.

 

In its work, the Party relies directly on the _trade unions_, which,
according to the data of the last congress (April 1920), now have a
membership of over four million and are
formally _non_-_Party._ Actually, all the directing bodies of the vast
majority of the unions, and primarily, of course, of the all-Russia
general trade union centre or bureau (the All-Russia Central Council of
Trade Unions), are made up of Communists and carry out all the
directives of the Party. Thus, on the whole, we have a formally
non-communist, flexible and relatively wide and very powerful
proletarian apparatus, by means of which the Party is closely linked up
with the _class_ and the _masses_, and by means of which, under the
leadership of the Party, the _class dictatorship is_ exercised. Without
close contacts with the trade unions, and without their energetic
support and devoted efforts, not only in economic, _but also in military
affairs_, it would of course have been impossible for us to govern the
country and to maintain the dictatorship for two and a half months, let
alone two and a half years. In practice, these very close contacts
naturally call for highly complex and diversified work in the form of
propaganda, agitation, timely and frequent conferences, not only with
the leading trade union workers, but with influential trade union
workers generally; they call for a determined struggle against the
Mensheviks, who still have a certain though very small following to whom
they teach all kinds of counter-revolutionary machinations, ranging from
an ideological defence of (_bourgeois_) democracy and the preaching that
the trade unions should be "independent" (independent of proletarian
state power!) to sabotage of proletarian discipline, etc., etc.

 

We consider that contacts with the "masses" through the trade unions are
not enough. In the course of our revolution, practical activities have
given rise to such institutions as _non_-_Party workers’ and peasants’
conferences_, and we strive by every means to support, develop and
extend this institution in order to be able to observe the temper of the
masses, come closer to them, meet their requirements, promote the best
among them to state posts, etc. Under a recent decree on the
transformation of the People’s Commissariat of State Control into the
Workers’ and Peasants’ Inspection, non-Party conferences of this kind
have been empowered to select members of the State Control to carry out
various kinds of investigations, etc.

 

Then, of course, all the work of the Party is carried on through the
Soviets, which embrace the working masses irrespective of occupation.
The district congresses of Soviets are _democratic_ institutions, the
like of which even the best of the democratic republics of the bourgeois
world have never known; through these congresses (whose proceedings the
Party endeavours to follow with the closest attention), as well as by
continually appointing class-conscious workers to various posts in the
rural districts, the proletariat exercises its role of leader of the
peasantry, gives effect to the dictatorship of the urban proletariat
wages a systematic struggle against the rich, bourgeois, exploiting and
profiteering peasantry, etc.

 

Such is the general mechanism of the proletarian state power viewed
"from above", from the standpoint of the practical implementation of the
dictatorship. We hope that the reader will understand why the Russian
Bolshevik who has known this mechanism for twenty-five years and has
seen it develop out of small, illegal and underground circles, cannot
help regarding all this talk about "from above" _or_ "from below", about
the dictatorship of leaders _or_ the dictatorship of the masses, etc.,
as ridiculous and childish nonsense, something like discussing whether a
man’s left leg or right arm is of greater use to him.

 

We cannot but regard as equally ridiculous and childish nonsense the
pompous, very learned, and frightfully revolutionary disquisitions of
the German Lefts to the effect that Communists cannot and should not
work in reactionary trade unions, that it is permissible to turn down
such work, that it is necessary to withdraw from the trade unions and
create a brand-new and immaculate "Workers’ Union" invented by very
pleasant (and, probably, for the most part very youthful) Communists,
etc., etc.

 

Capitalism inevitably leaves socialism the legacy, on the one hand, of
the old trade and craft distinctions among the workers, distinctions
evolved in the course of centuries; on the other hand, trade unions,
which only very slowly, in the course of years and years, can and will
develop into broader industrial unions with less of the craft union
about them (embracing entire industries, and not only crafts, trades and
occupations), and later proceed, through these industrial unions, to
eliminate the division of labour among people, to educate and school
people, give them _all_-_round development and an all_-_round_ training,
so that they _are able to do everything._ Communism is advancing and
must advance towards that goal, and _will reach_ it, but only after very
many years. To attempt in practice, today, to anticipate this future
result of a fully developed, fully stabilised and constituted, fully
comprehensive and mature communism would be like trying to teach higher
mathematics to a child of four.

 

We can (and must) begin to build socialism, not with abstract human
material, or with human material specially prepared by us, but with the
human material bequeathed to us by capitalism. True, that is no easy
matter, but no other approach to this task is serious enough to warrant
discussion.

 

The trade unions were a tremendous step forward for the working class in
the early days of capitalist development, inasmuch as they marked a
transition from the workers’ disunity and helplessness to
the _rudiments_ of class organisation. When the _revolutionary party of
the proletariat_, the _highest_ form of proletarian class organisation,
began to take shape (and the Party will not merit the name until it
learns to weld the leaders into one indivisible whole with the class and
the masses) the trade unions inevitably began to
reveal _certain_ reactionary features, a certain craft
narrow-mindedness, a certain tendency to be non-political, a certain
inertness, etc. However, the development of the proletariat did not, and
could not, proceed anywhere in the world otherwise than through the
trade unions, through reciprocal action between them and the party of
the working class. The proletariat’s conquest of political power is a
gigantic step forward for the proletariat as a class, and the Party must
more than ever and in a new way, not only in the old, educate and guide
the trade unions, at the same time bearing in mind that they are and
will long remain an indispensable "school of communism" and a
preparatory school that trains proletarians to exercise their
dictatorship, an indispensable organisation of the workers for the
gradual transfer of the management of the whole economic life of the
country to the working _class_ (and not to the separate trades), and
later to all the working people.

 

In the sense mentioned above, a _certain_ "reactionism" in the trade
unions is _inevitable_ under the dictatorship of the proletariat. Not to
understand this means a complete failure to understand the fundamental
conditions of the _transition_ from capitalism to socialism. It would be
egregious folly to fear _this_ "reactionism" or to try to _evade_ or
leap over it, for it would mean fearing that function of the proletarian
vanguard which consists in training, educating, enlightening and drawing
into the new life the most backward strata and masses of the working
class and the peasantry. On the other hand, it would be a still graver
error to postpone the achievement of the dictatorship of the proletariat
until a time when there will not be a single worker with a narrow-minded
craft outlook, or with craft and craft-union prejudices. The art of
politics (and the Communist’s correct understanding of his tasks)
consists in correctly gauging the conditions and the moment when the
vanguard of the proletariat can successfully assume power, when it is
able—during and after the seizure of power—to win adequate support from
sufficiently broad strata of the working class and of the
non-proletarian working masses, and when it is able thereafter to
maintain, consolidate and extend its rule by educating, training and
attracting ever broader masses of the working people.

 

Further. In countries more advanced than Russia, a certain reactionism
in the trade unions has been and was bound to be manifested in a far
greater measure than in our country. Our Mensheviks found support in the
trade unions (and to some extent still do so in a small number of
unions), as a result of the latter’s craft narrow-mindedness, craft
selfishness and opportunism. The Mensheviks of the West have acquired a
much firmer footing in the trade unions; there the _craft_-_union,
narrow_-_minded, selfish, case_-_hardened, covetous, and
petty_-_bourgeois "labour aristocracy", imperialist_-_minded, and
imperialist_-_corrupted_, has developed into a much stronger section
than in our country. That is incontestable. The struggle against the
Gomperses, and against the Jouhaux, Hendersons, Merrheims, Legiens and
Co. in Western Europe is much more difficult than the struggle against
our Mensheviks, who are an _absolutely homogeneous_ social and political
type. This struggle must be waged ruthlessly, and it must unfailingly be
brought—as we brought it—to a point when all the incorrigible leaders of
opportunism and social-chauvinism are completely discredited and driven
out of the trade unions. Political power cannot be captured (and the
attempt to capture it should not be made) until the struggle has reached
a _certain_ stage. This "certain stage" will be _different_ in different
countries and in different circumstances; it can be correctly gauged
only by thoughtful, experienced and knowledgeable political leaders of
the proletariat in each particular country. (In Russia the elections to
the Constituent Assembly in November 1917, a few days after the
proletarian revolution of October 25, 1917, were one of the criteria of
the success of this struggle. In these elections the Mensheviks were
utterly defeated; they received 700,000 votes—1,400,000 if the vote in
Transcaucasia is added—as against 9,000,000 votes polled by the
Bolsheviks. See my article, "The Constituent Assembly Elections and the
Dictatorship of the Proletariat",^(²⁵) in the _Communist
International_^(²⁶) No. 7-8.)

 

We are waging a struggle against the "labour aristocracy" in the name of
the masses of the workers and in order to win them over to our side; we
are waging the struggle against the opportunist and social-chauvinist
leaders in order to win the working class over to our side. It would be
absurd to forget this most elementary and most self-evident truth. Yet
it is this very absurdity that the German "Left" Communists perpetrate
when, _because_ of the reactionary and counter-revolutionary character
of the trade union _top leadership_, they jump to the conclusion that
... we must withdraw from the trade unions, refuse to work in them, and
create new and _artificial_ forms of labour organisation! This is so
unpardonable a blunder that it is tantamount to the greatest service
Communists could render the bourgeoisie. Like all the opportunist,
social-chauvinist, and Kautskyite trade union leaders, our Mensheviks
are nothing but "agents of the bourgeoisie in the working-class
movement" (as we have always said the Mensheviks are), or "labour
lieutenants of the capitalist class", to use the splendid and profoundly
true expression of the followers of Daniel De Leon in America. To refuse
to work in the reactionary trade unions means leaving the insufficiently
developed or backward masses of workers under the influence of the
reactionary leaders, the agents of the bourgeoisie, the labour
aristocrats, or "workers who have become completely bourgeois" (cf.
Engels’s letter to Marx in 1858 about the British workers^(²⁷)).

 

This ridiculous "theory" that Communists should not work in reactionary
trade unions reveals with the utmost clarity the frivolous attitude of
the "Left" Communists towards the question of influencing the "masses",
and their misuse of clamour about the "masses". If you want to help the
"masses" and win the sympathy and support of the "masses", you should
not fear difficulties, or pinpricks, chicanery, insults and persecution
from the "leaders" (who, being opportunists and social-chauvinists, are
in most cases directly or indirectly connected with the bourgeoisie and
the police), but must absolutely _work wherever the masses are to be
found. You_ must be capable of any sacrifice, of overcoming the greatest
obstacles, in order to carry on agitation and propaganda systematically,
perseveringly, persistently and patiently in those institutions,
societies and associations -- even the most reactionary—in which
proletarian or semi-proletarian masses are to be found. The trade unions
and the workers’ co-operatives (the latter sometimes, at least) are the
very organisations in which the masses are to be found. According to
figures quoted in the Swedish paper _Folkets Dagblad Politiken_ of March
10, 1920, the trade union membership in Great Britain increased from
5,500,000 at the end of 1917 to 6,600,000 at the end of 1918, an
increase of 19 per cent. Towards the close of 1919, the membership was
estimated at 7,500,000. I have not got the corresponding figures for
France and Germany to hand, but absolutely incontestable and generally
known facts testify to a rapid rise in the trade union membership in
these countries too.

 

These facts make crystal clear something that is confirmed by thousands
of other symptoms, namely, that class-consciousness and the desire for
organisation are growing among the proletarian masses, among the rank
and file, among the backward elements. Millions of workers in Great
Britain, France and Germany are _for the first time_ passing from a
complete lack of organisation to the elementary, lowest, simplest, and
(to those still thoroughly imbued with bourgeois-democratic prejudices)
most easily comprehensible form of organisation, namely, the trade
unions; yet the revolutionary but imprudent Left Communists stand by,
crying out "the masses", "the masses!" but _refusing to work within the
trade unions_, on the pretext that they are "reactionary", and invent a
brand-new, immaculate little "Workers’ Union", which is guiltless of
bourgeois-democratic prejudices and innocent of craft or narrow-minded
craft-union sins, a union which, they claim, will be (!) a broad
organisation. "Recognition of the Soviet system and the dictatorship"
will be the _only_ (!) condition of membership. (See the passage quoted
above.)

 

It would be hard to imagine any greater ineptitude or greater harm to
the revolution than that caused by the "Left" revolutionaries! Why, if
we in Russia today, after two and a half years of unprecedented
victories over the bourgeoisie of Russia and the Entente, were to make
"recognition of the dictatorship" a condition of trade union membership,
we would be doing a very foolish thing, damaging our influence among the
masses, and helping the Mensheviks. The task devolving on Communists is
to _convince_ the backward elements, to work _among_ them, and not
to _fence themselves off_ from them with artificial and childishly
"Left" slogans.

 

There can be no doubt that the Gomperses, the Hendersons, the Jonhaux
and the Legiens are very grateful to those "Left" revolutionaries who,
like the German opposition "on principle" (heaven preserve us from such
"principles"!), or like some of the revolutionaries in the American
Industrial Workers of the World^(²⁸) advocate quitting the reactionary
trade unions and refusing to work in them. These men, the "leaders" of
opportunism, will no doubt resort to every device of bourgeois diplomacy
and to the aid of bourgeois governments, the clergy, the police and the
courts, to keep Communists out of the trade unions, oust them by every
means, make their work in the trade unions as unpleasant as possible,
and insult, bait and persecute them. We must be able to stand up to all
this, agree to make any sacrifice, and even -- if need be—to resort to
various stratagems, artifices and illegal methods, to evasions and
subterfuges, as long as we get into the trade unions, remain in them,
and carry on communist work within them at all costs. Under tsarism we
had no "legal opportunities" whatsoever until 1905. However, when
Zubatov, agent of the secret police, organised Black-Hundred workers’
assemblies and workingmen’s societies for the purpose of trapping
revolutionaries and combating them, we sent members of our Party to
these assemblies and into these societies (I personally remember one of
them, Comrade Babushkin, a leading St. Petersburg factory worker, shot
by order of the tsar’s generals in 1906). They established contacts with
the masses, were able to carry on their agitation, and succeeded in
wresting workers from the influence of Zubatov’s agents.^(²⁹) Of course,
in Western Europe, which is imbued with most deep-rooted legalistic,
constitutionalist and bourgeois-democratic prejudices, this is more
difficult of achievement. However, it can and must be carried out, and
systematically at that.

 

The Executive Committee of the Third International must, in my opinion,
positively condemn, and call upon the next congress of the Communist
International to condemn both the policy of refusing to work in
reactionary trade unions in general (explaining in detail why such
refusal is unwise, and what extreme harm it does to the cause of the
proletarian revolution) and, in particular, the line of conduct of some
members of the Communist Party of Holland, who—whether directly or
indirectly, overtly or covertly, wholly or partly, it does not
matter—have supported this erroneous policy. The Third International
must break with the tactics of the Second International, it must not
evade or play down points at issue, but must pose them in a
straightforward fashion. The whole truth has been put squarely to the
"Independents" (the ); the whole truth must likewise be put squarely to
the "Left" Communists.

 



SHOULD WE PARTICIPATE IN BOURGEOIS PARLIAMENTS?


 

It is with the utmost contempt—and the utmost levity—that the German
"Left" Communists reply to this question in the negative. Their
arguments? In the passage quoted above we read:

 

"... All reversion to parliamentary forms of struggle, which have become
historically and politically obsolete, must be emphatically rejected"
[[__ Rjc: Could be incomplete here; check __]]

 

This is said with ridiculous pretentiousness, and is patently wrong.
"Reversion" to parliamentarianism, forsooth! Perhaps there is already a
Soviet republic in Germany? It does not look like it! How, then, can one
speak of "reversion"? Is this not an empty phrase?

 

Parliamentarianism has become "historically obsolete". That is true in
the propaganda sense. However, everybody knows that this is still a far
cry from overcoming it in _practice._ Capitalism could have been
declared—and with full justice—to be "historically obsolete" many
decades ago, but that does not at all remove the need for a very long
and very persistent struggle _on the basis_ of capitalism.
Parliamentarianism is "historically obsolete" from the standpoint
of _world history_, i.e., the _era_ of bourgeois parliamentarianism is
over, and the _era_ of the proletarian dictatorship has _begun._ That is
incontestable. But world history is counted in decades. Ten or twenty
years earlier or later makes no difference when measured with the
yardstick of world history; from the standpoint of world history it is a
trifle that cannot be considered even approximately. But for that very
reason, it is a glaring theoretical error to apply the yardstick of
world history to practical politics.

 

Is parliamentarianism "politically obsolete"? That is quite a different
matter. If that were true, the position of the "Lefts" would be a strong
one. But it has to be proved by a most searching analysis, and the
"Lefts" do not even know how to approach the matter. In the "Theses on
Parliamentarianism", published in the _Bulletin of the Provisional
Bureau in Amsterdam of the Communist International_ No. 1, February
1920, and obviously expressing the Dutch-Left or Left-Dutch strivings,
the analysis, as we shall see, is also hopelessly poor.

 

In the first place, contrary to the opinion of such outstanding
political leaders as Rosa Luxemburg and Karl Liebknecht, the German
"Lefts", as we know, considered parliamentarianism "politically
obsolete" even in January 1919. We know that the "Lefts" were mistaken.
This fact alone utterly destroys, at a single stroke, the proposition
that parliamentarianism is "politically obsolete". It is for the "Lefts"
to prove why their error, indisputable at that time, is no longer an
error. They do not and cannot produce even a shred of proof. A political
party’s attitude towards its own mistakes is one of the most important
and surest ways of judging how earnest the party is and how it
fulfils _in practice_ its obligations towards its _class_ and
the _working people._ Frankly acknowledging a mistake, ascertaining the
reasons for it, analysing the conditions that have led up to it, and
thrashing out the means of its rectification -- that is the hallmark of
a serious party; that is how it should perform its duties, and how it
should educate and train its _class_, and then the _masses._ By failing
to fulfil this duty and give the utmost attention and consideration to
the study of their patent error, the "Lefts" in Germany (and in Holland)
have proved that they are not a _party of a class_, but a circle, not
a _party of the masses_, but a group of intellectualists and of a few
workers who ape the worst features of intellectualism.

 

Second, in the same pamphlet of the Frankfurt group of "Lefts", which we
have already cited in detail, we read:

 

"... The millions of workers who still follow the policy of the Centre
[the Catholic "Centre" Party] are counter-revolutionary. The rural
proletarians provide the legions of counter-revolutionary troops." (Page
3 of the pamphlet.)

 

Everything goes to show that this statement is far too sweeping and
exaggerated. But the basic fact set forth here is incontrovertible, and
its acknowledgment by the "Lefts" is particularly clear evidence of
their mistake. How can one say that "parliamentarianism is politically
obsolete", when "millions" and "legions" of _proletarians_ are not only
still in favour of parliamentarianism in general, but are downright
"counter-revolutionary"!? It is obvious that parliamentarianism in
Germany is _not yet_ politically obsolete. It is obvious that the
"Lefts" in Germany have mistaken _their desire_, their
politico-ideological attitude, for objective reality. That is a most
dangerous mistake for revolutionaries to make. In Russia—where, over a
particularly long period and in particularly varied forms, the most
brutal and savage yoke of tsarism produced revolutionaries of diverse
shades, revolutionaries who displayed amazing devotion, enthusiasm,
heroism and will power—in Russia we have observed this mistake of the
revolutionaries at very close quarters; we have studied it very
attentively and have a first-hand knowledge of it; that is why we can
also see it especially clearly in others. Parliamentarianism is of
course "politically obsolete" to the Communists in Germany; but—and that
is the whole point—we must _not_ regard what is obsolete _to us_ as
something obsolete _to a class_, _to the masses._ Here again we find
that the "Lefts" do not know how to reason, do not know how to act as
the party of a _class_, as the party of the _masses._ You must not sink
to the level of the masses, to the level of the backward strata of the
class. That is incontestable. You must tell them the bitter truth. You
are in duty bound to call their bourgeois-democratic and parliamentary
prejudices what they are—prejudices. But at the same time you
must _soberly_ follow the _actual_ state of the class-consciousness and
preparedness of the entire class (not only of its communist vanguard),
and of all the _working people_ (not only of their advanced elements).

 

Even if only a fairly large _minority_ of the industrial workers, and
not "millions" and "legions", follow the lead of the Catholic clergy—and
a similar minority of rural workers follow the landowners and kulaks
(Grossbauern)—it _undoubtedly_ signifies that parliamentarianism in
Germany has not _yet_ politically outlived itself, that participation in
parliamentary elections and in the struggle on the parliamentary rostrum
is _obligatory_ on the party of the revolutionary
proletariat _specifically_ for the purpose of educating the backward
strata of _its own class_, and for the purpose of awakening and
enlightening the undeveloped, downtrodden and ignorant
rural _masses._ Whilst you lack the strength to do away with bourgeois
parliaments and every other type of reactionary institution,
you_must_ work within them because _it is there_ that you will still
find workers who are duped by the priests and stultified by the
conditions of rural life; otherwise you risk turning into nothing but
windbags.

 

Third, the "Left" Communists have a great deal to say in praise of us
Bolsheviks. One sometimes feels like telling them to praise us less and
to try to get a better knowledge of the Bolsheviks’ tactics. We took
part in the elections to the Constituent Assembly, the Russian bourgeois
parliament in September-November 1917. Were our tactics correct or not?
If not, then this should be clearly stated and proved, for it is
necessary in evolving the correct tactics for international communism.
If they were correct, then certain conclusions must be drawn. Of course,
there can be no question of placing conditions in Russia on a par with
conditions in Western Europe. But as regards the particular question of
the meaning of the concept that "parliamentarianism has become
politically obsolete", due account should be taken of our experience,
for unless concrete experience is taken into account such concepts very
easily turn into empty phrases. In September-November 1917, did we, the
Russian Bolsheviks, not have _more_ right than any Western Communists to
consider that parliamentarianism was politically obsolete in Russia? Of
course we did, for the point is not whether bourgeois parliaments have
existed for a long time or a short time, but how far the masses of the
working people are _prepared_ (ideologically, politically and
practically) to accept the Soviet system and to dissolve the
bourgeois-democratic parliament (or allow it to be dissolved). It is an
absolutely incontestable and fully established historical fact that, in
September-November 1917, the urban working class and the soldiers and
peasants of Russia were, because of a number of special conditions,
exceptionally well prepared to accept the Soviet system and to disband
the most democratic of bourgeois parliaments. Nevertheless, the
Bolsheviks did _not_ boycott the Constituent Assembly, but took part in
the elections both before _and after_ the proletariat conquered
political power. That these elections yielded exceedingly valuable (and
to the proletariat, highly useful) political results has, I make bold to
hope, been proved by me in the above-mentioned article, which analyses
in detail the returns of the elections to the Constituent Assembly in
Russia.

 

The conclusion which follows from this is absolutely incontrovertible:
it has been proved that, far from causing harm to the revolutionary
proletariat, participation in a bourgeois-democratic parliament, even a
few weeks before - the victory of a Soviet republic and
even _after_ such a victory, actually helps that proletariat
to _prove_ to the backward masses why such parliaments deserve to be
done away with; it _facilitates_ their successful dissolution,
and _helps_ to make bourgeois parliamentarianism "politically obsolete".
To ignore this experience, while at the same time claiming affiliation
to the Communist _International_, which must work out its tactics
internationally (not as narrow or exclusively national tactics, but as
international tactics), means committing a gross error and actually
abandoning internationalism in deed, while recognising it in word.

 

Now let us examine the "Dutch-Left" arguments in favour of
non-participation in parliaments. The following is the text of Thesis
No. 4, the most important of the above-mentioned "Dutch" theses:

 

“When the capitalist system of production has broken down, and society
is in a state of revolution, parliamentary action gradually loses
importance as compared with the action of the masses themselves. When,
in these conditions, parliament becomes the centre and organ of the
counter-revolution, whilst, on the other hand, the labouring class
builds up the instruments of its power in the Soviets, it may even prove
necessary to abstain from all and any participation in parliamentary
action."

 

The first sentence is obviously wrong, since action by the masses, a big
strike, for instance, is more important than parliamentary activity
at _all_ times, and not only during a revolution or in a revolutionary
situation. This obviously untenable and historically and politically
incorrect argument merely shows very clearly that the authors completely
ignore both the general European experience (the French experience
before the revolutions of 1848 and 1870; the German experience of
1878-90, etc.) and the Russian experience (see above) of the importance
of _combining_ legal and illegal struggle. This question is of immense
importance both in general and in particular, because in _all_ civilised
and advanced countries the time is rapidly approaching when such a
combination will more and more become—and has already partly
become—mandatory on the party of the revolutionary proletariat, inasmuch
as civil war between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie is maturing and
is imminent, and because of savage persecution of the Communists by
republican governments and bourgeois governments generally, which resort
to any violation of legality (the example of America is edifying
enough), etc. The Dutch, and the Lefts in general, have utterly failed
to understand this highly important question.

 

The second sentence is, in the first place, historically wrong. We
Bolsheviks participated in the most counterrevolutionary parliaments,
and experience has shown that this participation was not only useful but
indispensable to the party of the revolutionary proletariat, after the
first bourgeois revolution in Russia (1905), so as to pave the way for
the second bourgeois revolution (February 1917), and then for the
socialist revolution (October 1917). In the second place, this sentence
is amazingly illogical. If a parliament becomes an organ and a "centre"
(in reality it never has been and never can be a "centre", but that is
by the way) of counter-revolution, while the workers are building up the
instruments of their power in the form of the Soviets, then it follows
that the workers must prepare—ideologically, politically and
technically—for the struggle of the Soviets against parliament, for the
dispersal of parliament by the Soviets. But it does not at all follow
that this dispersal is hindered, or is not facilitated, by the presence
of a Soviet opposition within the counter-revolutionary parliament. In
the course of our victorious struggle against Denikin and Kolchak, we
never found that the existence of a Soviet and proletarian opposition in
their camp was immaterial to our victories. We know perfectly well that
the dispersal of the Constituent Assembly on January 5, 1918 was not
hampered but was actually facilitated by the fact that, within the
counter-revolutionary Constituent Assembly which was about to be
dispersed, there was a consistent Bolshevik, as well as an inconsistent,
Left Socialist-Revolutionary Soviet opposition. The authors of the
theses are engaged in muddled thinking; they have forgotten the
experience of many, if not all, revolutions, which shows the great
usefulness, during a revolution, of a _combination_ of mass action
outside a reactionary parliament with an opposition sympathetic to (or,
better still, directly supporting) the revolution within it. The Dutch,
and the "Lefts" in general, argue in this respect like doctrinaires of
the revolution, who have never taken part in a real revolution, have
never given thought to the history of revolutions, or have naively
mistaken subjective "rejection" of a reactionary institution for its
actual destruction by the combined operation of a number of objective
factors. The surest way of discrediting and damaging a new political
(and not only political) idea is to reduce it to absurdity on the plea
of defending it. For any truth, if "overdone" (as Dietzgen Senior put
it), if exaggerated, or if carried beyond the limits of its actual
applicability, can be reduced to an absurdity, and is even bound to
become an absurdity under these conditions. That is just the kind of
disservice the Dutch and German Lefts are rendering to the new truth of
the Soviet form of government being superior to bourgeois-democratic
parliaments. Of course, anyone would be in error who voiced the outmoded
viewpoint or in general considered it impermissible, in all and any
circumstances, to reject participation in bourgeois parliaments. I
cannot attempt here to formulate the conditions under which a boycott is
useful, since the object of this pamphlet is far more modest, namely, to
study Russian experience in connection with certain topical questions of
international communist tactics. Russian experience has provided us with
one successful and correct instance (1905), and another that was
incorrect (1906), of the use of a boycott by the Bolsheviks. Analysing
the first case, we, see that we succeeded in _preventing_ a reactionary
government from _convening_ a reactionary parliament in a situation in
which extra-parliamentary revolutionary mass action (strikes in
particular) was developing at great speed, when not a single section of
the proletariat and the peasantry could support the reactionary
government in any way, and when the revolutionary proletariat was
gaining influence over the backward masses through the strike struggle
and through the agrarian movement. It is quite obvious
that _this_ experience is not applicable to present-day European
conditions. It is likewise quite obvious—and the foregoing arguments
bear this out -- that the advocacy, even if with reservations, by the
Dutch and the other "Lefts" of refusal to participate in parliaments is
fundamentally wrong and detrimental to the cause of the revolutionary
proletariat.

 

In Western Europe and America, parliament has become most odious to the
revolutionary vanguard of the working class. That cannot be denied. It
can readily be understood, for it is difficult to imagine anything more
infamous, vile or treacherous than the behaviour of the vast majority of
socialist and Social-Democratic parliamentary deputies during and after
the war. It would, however, be not only unreasonable but actually
criminal to yield to this mood when deciding _how_ this generally
recognised evil should be fought. In many countries of Western Europe,
the revolutionary mood, we might say, is at present a "novelty", or a
"rarity", which has all too long been vainly and impatiently awaited;
perhaps that is why people so easily yield to that mood. Certainly,
without a revolutionary mood among the masses, and without conditions
facilitating the growth of this mood, revolutionary tactics will never
develop into action. In Russia, however, lengthy, painful and sanguinary
experience has taught us the truth that revolutionary tactics cannot be
built on a revolutionary mood alone. Tactics must be based on a sober
and strictly objective appraisal of _all_ the class forces in a
particular state (and of the states that surround it, and of all states
the world over) as well as of the experience of revolutionary movements.
It is very easy to show one’s "revolutionary" temper merely by hurling
abuse at parliamentary opportunism, or merely by repudiating
participation in parliaments; its very ease, however, cannot turn this
into a solution of a difficult, a very difficult, problem. It is far
more difficult to create a really revolutionary parliamentary group in a
European parliament than it was in Russia. That stands to reason. But it
is only a particular expression of the general truth that it was easy
for Russia, in the specific and historically unique situation of 1917,
to _start_ the socialist revolution, but it will be more difficult for
Russia than for the European countries to _continue_ the revolution and
bring it to its consummation. I had occasion to point this out already
at the beginning of 1918, and our experience of the past two years has
entirely confirmed the correctness of this view. Certain specific
conditions, viz., (1) the possibility of linking up the Soviet
revolution with the ending, as a consequence of this revolution, of the
imperialist war, which had exhausted the workers and peasants to an
incredible degree; (2) the possibility of taking temporary advantage of
the mortal conflict between the world’s two most powerful groups of
imperialist robbers, who were unable to unite against their Soviet
enemy; (3) the possibility of enduring a comparatively lengthy civil
war, partly owing to the enormous size of the country and to the poor
means of communication; (4) the existence of such a profound
bourgeois-democratic revolutionary movement among the peasantry that the
party of the proletariat was able to adopt the revolutionary demands of
the peasant party (the Socialist-Revolutionary Party, the majority of
whose members were definitely hostile to Bolshevism) and realise them at
once, thanks to the conquest of political power by the proletariat—all
these specific conditions do not at present exist in Western Europe, and
a repetition of such or similar conditions will not occur so easily.
Incidentally, apart from a number of other causes, that is why it is
more difficult for Western Europe to _start_ a socialist revolution than
it was for us. To attempt to "circumvent" this difficulty by "skipping"
the arduous job of utilising reactionary parliaments for revolutionary
purposes is absolutely childish. You want to create a new society, yet
you fear the difficulties involved in forming a good parliamentary group
made up of convinced, devoted and heroic Communists, in a reactionary
parliament! Is that not childish? If Karl Liebknecht in Germany and Z.
H?glund in Sweden were able, even without mass support from below, to
set examples of the truly revolutionary utilisation of reactionary
parliaments, why should a rapidly growing revolutionary mass party, in
the midst of the post-war disillusionment and embitterment of the
masses, be unable to _forge_ a communist group in the worst of
parliaments? It is because, in Western Europe, the backward masses of
the workers and—to an even greater degree—of the small peasants are much
more imbued with bourgeois-democratic and parliamentary prejudices than
they were in Russia because of that, it is _only_ from within such
institutions as bourgeois parliaments that Communists can (and must)
wage a long and persistent struggle, undaunted by any difficulties, to
expose, dispel and overcome these prejudices.

 

The German "Lefts" complain of bad "leaders" in their party, give way to
despair, and even arrive at a ridiculous "negation" of "leaders". But in
conditions in which it is often necessary to hide "leaders" underground,
the _evolution_ of good "leaders", reliable, tested and authoritative,
is a very difficult matter; these difficulties _cannot_ be successfully
overcome without combining legal and illegal work, and _without testing
the "leaders"_, _among other ways_, in parliaments. Criticism -- the
most keen, ruthless and uncompromising criticism—should be directed, not
against parliamentarianism or parliamentary activities, but against
those leaders who are unable—and still more against those who
are _unwilling_ -- to utilise parliamentary elections and the
parliamentary rostrum in a revolutionary and communist manner. Only such
criticism—combined, of course, with the dismissal of incapable leaders
and their replacement by capable ones—will constitute useful and
fruitful revolutionary work that will simultaneously train the "leaders"
to be worthy of the working class and of all working people, and train
the masses to be able properly to understand the political situation and
the often very complicated and intricate tasks that spring from that
situation.^(³⁰)

 



NO COMPROMISES?


 

In the quotation from the Frankfurt pamphlet, we have seen how
emphatically the "Lefts" have advanced this slogan. It is sad to see
people who no doubt consider themselves Marxists, and want to be
Marxists, forget the fundamental truths of Marxism. This is what
Engels—who, like Marx, was one of those rarest of authors whose every
sentence in every one of their fundamental works contains a remarkably
profound content—wrote in 1874, against the manifesto of the
thirty-three Blanquist Communards:

 

"’We are Communists’ [the Blanquist Communards wrote in their
manifesto], ’because we want to attain our goal without stopping at
intermediate stations, without any compromises, which only postpone the
day of victory and prolong the period of slavery.’

 

"The German Communists are Communists because, through all the
intermediate stations and all compromises created, not by them but by
the course of historical development, they clearly perceive and
constantly pursue the final aim—the abolition of classes and the
creation of a society in which there will no longer be private ownership
of land or of the means of production. The thirty-three Blanquists are
Communists just because they imagine that, merely because they want to
skip the intermediate stations and compromises, the matter is settled,
and if ’it begins’ in the next few days—which they take for granted—and
they take over power, ’communism will be introduced’ the day after
tomorrow. If that is not immediately possible, they are not Communists.

 

"What childish innocence it is to present one’s own impatience as a
theoretically convincing argument!" Frederick Engels, "Programme of the
Blanquist Communards",^(³¹) from the German Social-Democratic
newspaper Volksstaat, 1874, No. 73, given in the Russian translation
of Articles, 1871-1875, Petrograd, 1919, pp. 52-53).

 

In the same article, Engels expresses his profound esteem for Vaillant,
and speaks of the "unquestionable merit" of the latter (who, like
Guesde, was one of the most prominent leaders of international socialism
until their betrayal of socialism in August 1914). But Engels does not
fail to give a detailed analysis of an obvious error. Of course, to very
young and inexperienced revolutionaries, as well as to petty-bourgeois
revolutionaries of even very respectable age and great experience, it
seems extremely "dangerous", incomprehensible and wrong to "permit
compromises". Many sophists (being unusually or excessively
"experienced" politicians) reason exactly in the same way as the British
leaders of opportunism mentioned by Comrade Lansbury: "If the Bolsheviks
are permitted a certain compromise, why should we not be permitted any
kind of compromise?" However, proletarians schooled in numerous strikes
(to take only this manifestation of the class struggle) usually
assimilate in admirable fashion the very profound truth (philosophical,
historical, political and psychological) expounded by Engels. Every
proletarian has been through strikes and has experienced "compromises"
with the hated oppressors and exploiters, when the workers have had to
return to work either without having achieved anything or else agreeing
to only a partial satisfaction of their demands. Every proletarian—as a
result of the conditions of the mass struggle and the acute
intensification of class antagonisms he lives among—sees the difference
between a compromise enforced by objective conditions (such as lack of
strike funds, no outside support, starvation and exhaustion)—a
compromise which in no way minimises the revolutionary devotion and
readiness to carry on the struggle on the part of the workers who have
agreed to such a compromise—and, on the other hand, a compromise by
traitors who try to ascribe to objective causes their self-interest
(strike-breakers also enter into "compromises"!), their cowardice,
desire to toady to the capitalists, and readiness to yield to
intimidation, sometimes to persuasion, sometimes to sops, and sometimes
to flattery from the capitalists. (The history of the British labour
movement provides a very large number of instances of such treacherous
compromises by British trade union leaders, but, in one form or another,
almost all workers in all countries have witnessed the same sort of
thing.)

 

Naturally, there are individual cases of exceptional difficulty and
complexity, when the greatest efforts are necessary for a proper
assessment of the actual character of this or that "compromise", just as
there are cases of homicide when it is by no means easy to establish
whether the homicide was fully justified and even necessary (as, for
example, legitimate self-defence), or due to unpardonable negligence, or
even to a cunningly executed perfidious plan. Of course, in politics,
where it is sometimes a matter of extremely complex relations—national
and international—between classes and parties, very many cases will
arise that will be much more difficult than the question of a legitimate
"compromise" in a strike or a treacherous "compromise" by a
strike-breaker, treacherous leader, etc. It would be absurd to formulate
a recipe or general rule ("No compromises!") to suit all cases. One must
use one’s own brains and be able to find one’s bearings in each
particular instance. It is, in fact, one of the functions of a party
organisation and of party leaders worthy of the name, to acquire,
through the prolonged, persistent, variegated and comprehensive efforts
of all thinking representatives of a given class,^(³²) the knowledge,
experience and—in addition to knowledge and experience—the political
flair necessary for the speedy and correct solution of complex political
problems.^(³³)

 

Naive and quite inexperienced people imagine that the permissibility of
compromise in general is sufficient to obliterate any distinction
between opportunism, against which we are waging, and must wage, an
unremitting struggle, and revolutionary Marxism, or communism. But if
such people do not yet know that in nature and in
society all distinctions are fluid and up to a certain point
conventional, nothing can help them but lengthy training, education,
enlightenment, and political and everyday experience. In the practical
questions that arise in the politics of any particular or specific
historical moment, it is important to single out those which display the
principal type of intolerable and treacherous compromises, such as
embody an opportunism that is fatal to the revolutionary class, and to
exert all efforts to explain them and combat them. During the 1914-18
imperialist war between two groups of equally predatory countries,
social-chauvinism was the principal and fundamental type of opportunism,
i.e., support of "defence of country", which in such a war was really
equivalent to defence of the predatory interests of one’s "own"
bourgeoisie. After the war, defence of the robber League of
Nations,^(³⁴) defence of direct or indirect alliances with the
bourgeoisie of one’s own country against the revolutionary proletariat
and the "Soviet" movement, and defence of bourgeois democracy and
bourgeois parliamentarianism against "Soviet power" became the principal
manifestations of those intolerable and treacherous compromises, whose
sum total constituted an opportunism fatal to the revolutionary
proletariat and its cause.

 

"...All compromise with other parties ... any policy of manoeuvring and
compromise must be emphatically rejected," the German Lefts write in the
Frankfurt pamphlet.

 

It is surprising that, with such views, these Lefts do not emphatically
condemn Bolshevism! After all, the German Lefts cannot but know that the
entire history of Bolshevism, both before and after the October
Revolution, is full of instances of changes of tack, conciliatory
tactics and compromises with other parties, including bourgeois parties!

 

To carry on a war for the overthrow of the international bourgeoisie, a
war which is a hundred times more difficult, protracted and complex than
the most stubborn of ordinary wars between states, and to renounce in
advance any change of tack, or any utilisation of a conflict of
interests (even if temporary) among one’s enemies, or any conciliation
or compromise with possible allies (even if they are temporary,
unstable, vacillating or conditional allies)—is that not ridiculous in
the extreme? Is it not like making a difficult ascent of an unexplored
and hitherto inaccessible mountain and refusing in advance ever to move
in zigzags, ever to retrace one’s steps, or ever to abandon a course
once selected, and to try others? And yet people so immature and
inexperienced (if youth were the explanation, it would not be so bad;
young people are preordained to talk such nonsense for a certain period)
have met with support—whether direct or indirect, open or covert, whole
or partial, it does not matter—from some members of the Communist Party
of Holland.

 

After the first socialist revolution of the proletariat, and the
overthrow of the bourgeoisie in some country, the proletariat of that
country remains for a long time weaker than the bourgeoisie, simply
because of the latter’s extensive international links, and also because
of the spontaneous and continuous restoration and regeneration of
capitalism and the bourgeoisie by the small commodity producers of the
country which has overthrown the bourgeoisie. The more powerful enemy
can be vanquished only by exerting the utmost effort, and by the most
thorough, careful, attentive, skilful and obligatory use of any, even
the smallest, rift between the enemies, any conflict of interests among
the bourgeoisie of the various countries and among the various groups or
types of bourgeoisie within the various countries, and also by taking
advantage of any, even the smallest, opportunity of winning a mass ally,
even though this ally is temporary, vacillating, unstable, unreliable
and conditional. Those who do not understand this reveal a failure to
understand even the smallest grain of Marxism, of modern scientific
socialism in general. Those who have not proved in practice, over a
fairly considerable period of time and in fairly varied political
situations, their ability to apply this truth in practice have not yet
learned to help the revolutionary class in its struggle to emancipate
all toiling humanity from the exploiters. And this applies equally to
the period before and after the proletariat has won political power.

 

Our theory is not a dogma, but a guide to action, said Marx and
Engels.^(³⁵) The greatest blunder, the greatest crime, committed by such
"out-and-out" Marxists as Karl Kautsky, Otto Bauer, etc., is that they
have not understood this and have been unable to apply it at crucial
moments of the proletarian revolution. "Political activity is not like
the pavement of Nevsky Prospekt" (the well-kept, broad and level
pavement of the perfectly straight principal thoroughfare of St.
Petersburg), N. G. Chernyshevsky, the great Russian socialist of the
pre-Marxist period, used to say. Since Chernyshevsky’s time, disregard
or forgetfulness of this truth has cost Russian revolutionaries
countless sacrifices. We must strive at all costs to prevent the Left
Communists and West-European and American revolutionaries that are
devoted to the working class from paying as dearly as the backward
Russians did to learn this truth.

 

Prior to the downfall of tsarism, the Russian revolutionary
Social-Democrats made repeated use of the services of the bourgeois
liberals, i.e., they concluded numerous practical compromises with the
latter. In 1901-02, even prior to the appearance of Bolshevism, the old
editorial board of Iskra (consisting of Plekhanov, Axelrod, Zasulich
Martov, Potresov and myself) concluded (not for long, it is true) a
formal political alliance with Strove, the political leader of bourgeois
liberalism, while at the same time being able to wage an unremitting and
most merciless ideological and political struggle against bourgeois
liberalism and against the slightest manifestation of its influence in
the working-class movement. The Bolsheviks have always adhered to this
policy. Since 1905 they have systematically advocated an alliance
between the working class and the peasantry, against the liberal
bourgeoisie and tsarism, never, however, refusing to support the
bourgeoisie against tsarism (for instance, during second rounds of
elections, or during second ballots) and never ceasing their relentless
ideological and political struggle against the
Socialist-Revolutionaries, the bourgeois-revolutionary peasant party,
exposing them as petty-bourgeois democrats who have falsely described
themselves as socialists. During the Duma elections of 1907, the
Bolsheviks entered briefly into a formal political bloc with the
Socialist-Revolutionaries. Between 1903 and 1912, there were periods of
several years in which we were formally united with the Mensheviks in a
single Social-Democratic Party, but we never stopped our ideological and
political struggle against them as opportunists and vehicles of
bourgeois influence on the proletariat. During the war, we concluded
certain compromises with the Kautskyites, with the Left Mensheviks
(Martov), and with a section of the Socialist-Revolutionaries (Chernov
and Natanson); we were together with them at Zimmerwald and
Kienthal,^(³⁶) and issued joint manifestos. However, we never ceased and
never relaxed our ideological and political struggle against the
Kautskyites, Martov and Chernov (when Natanson died in 1919, a
"Revolutionary-Communist" Narodnik,^(³⁷) he was very close to and almost
in agreement with us). At the very moment of the October Revolution, we
entered into an informal but very important (and very successful)
political bloc with the petty-bourgeois peasantry by adopting
the Socialist-Revolutionary agrarian programme in its entirety, without
a single alteration—i.e., we effected an undeniable compromise in order
to prove to the peasants that we wanted, not to "steam-roller" them but
to reach agreement with them. At the same time we proposed (and soon
after effected) a formal political bloc, including participation in the
government, with the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries, who dissolved this
bloc after the conclusion of the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk and then, in
July 1918, went to the length of armed rebellion, and subsequently of an
armed struggle, against us.

 

It is therefore understandable why the attacks made by the German Lefts
against the Central Committee of the Communist Party of Germany for
entertaining the idea of a bloc with the Independents (the Independent
Social-Democratic Party of Germany—the Kautskyites) are absolutely
inane, in our opinion, and clear proof that the "Lefts" are in
the wrong. In Russia, too, there were Right Mensheviks (participants in
the Kerensky government), who corresponded to the German Scheidemanns,
and Left Mensheviks (Martov), corresponding to the German Kautskyites
and standing in opposition to the Right Mensheviks. A gradual shift of
the worker masses from the Mensheviks over to the Bolsheviks was to be
clearly seen in 1917. At the First All-Russia Congress of Soviets, held
in June 1917, we had only 13 per cent of the votes; the
Socialist-Revolutionaries and the Mensheviks had a majority. At the
Second Congress of Soviets (October 25, 1917, old style) we had 51 per
cent of the votes. Why is it that in Germany the same and
absolutely identical shift of the workers from Right to Left did not
immediately strengthen the Communists, but first strengthened the midway
Independent Party, although the latter never had independent political
ideas or an independent policy, but merely wavered between the
Scheidemanns and the Communists?

 

One of the evident reasons was the erroneous tactics of the German
Communists, who must fearlessly and honestly admit this error and learn
to rectify it. The error consisted in their denial of the need to take
part in the reactionary bourgeois parliaments and in the reactionary
trade unions; the error consisted in numerous manifestations of that
"Leftwing" infantile disorder which has now come to the surface and will
consequently be cured the more thoroughly, the more rapidly and with
greater advantage to the organism.

 

The German Independent Social-Democratic Party is obviously not a
homogeneous body. Alongside the old opportunist leaders (Kautsky,
Hilferding and apparently, to a considerable extent, Crispien, Ledebour
and others)—these have revealed their inability to understand the
significance of Soviet power and the dictatorship of the proletariat,
and their inability to lead the proletariat’s revolutionary
struggle—there has emerged in this party a Left and proletarian wing,
which is growing most rapidly. Hundreds of thousands of members of this
party (which has, I think, a membership of some three-quarters of a
million) are proletarians who are abandoning Scheidemann and are rapidly
going over to communism. This proletarian wing has already proposed—at
the Leipzig Congress of the Independents (1919) -- immediate and
unconditional affiliation to the Third International. To fear a
"compromise" with this wing of the party is positively ridiculous. On
the contrary, it is the duty of Communists to seek and find a suitable
form of compromise with them, a compromise which, on the one hand, will
facilitate and accelerate the necessary complete fusion with this wing
and, on the other, will in no way hamper the Communists in their
ideological and political struggle against the opportunist Right wing of
the Independents. It will probably be no easy matter to devise a
suitable form of compromise—but only a charlatan could promise the
German workers and the German Communists an "easy" road to victory.

 

Capitalism would not be capitalism if the proletariat pur sang were not
surrounded by a large number of exceedingly motley types intermediate
between the proletarian and the semi-proletarian (who earns his
livelihood in part by the sale of his labour-power), between the
semi-proletarian and the small peasant (and petty artisan, handicraft
worker and small master in general), between the small peasant and the
middle peasant, and so on, and if the proletariat itself were not
divided into more developed and less developed strata, if it were not
divided according to territorial origin, trade, sometimes according to
religion, and so on. From all this follows the necessity, the absolute
necessity, for the Communist Party, the vanguard of the proletariat, its
class-conscious section, to resort to changes of tack, to conciliation
and compromises with the various groups of proletarians, with the
various parties of the workers and small masters. It is entirely a
matter of knowing how to apply these tactics in order to raise—not
lower—the general level of proletarian class-consciousness,
revolutionary spirit, and ability to fight and win. Incidentally, it
should be noted that the Bolsheviks’ victory over the Mensheviks called
for the application of tactics of changes of tack, conciliation and
compromises, not only before but also after the October Revolution of
1917, but the changes of tack and compromises were, of course, such as
assisted, boosted and consolidated the Bolsheviks at the expense of the
Mensheviks. The petty-bourgeois democrats (including the Mensheviks)
inevitably vacillate between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat,
between bourgeois democracy and the Soviet system, between reformism and
revolutionism, between love for the workers and fear of the proletarian
dictatorship, etc. The Communists’ proper tactics should consist
in utilising these vacillations, not ignoring them; utilising them calls
for concessions to elements that are turning towards the
proletariat—whenever and in the measure that they turn towards the
proletariat—in addition to fighting those who turn towards the
bourgeoisie. As a result of the application of the correct tactics,
Menshevism began to disintegrate, and has been disintegrating more and
more in our country; the stubbornly opportunist leaders are being
isolated, and the best of the workers and the best elements among the
petty-bourgeois democrats are being brought into our camp. This is a
lengthy process, and the hasty "decision"—"No compromises, no
manoeuvres"—can only prejudice the strengthening of the revolutionary
proletariat’s influence and the enlargement of its forces.

 

Lastly, one of the undoubted errors of the German "Lefts" lies in their
downright refusal to recognise the Treaty of Versailles. The more
"weightily" and "pompously", the more "emphatically" and peremptorily
this viewpoint is formulated (by K. Homer, for instance), the less sense
it seems to make. It is not enough, under the present conditions of the
international proletarian revolution, to repudiate the preposterous
absurdities of "National Bolshevism" (Laufenberg and others), which has
gone to the length of advocating a bloc with the German bourgeoisie for
a war against the Entente. One must realise that it is utterly false
tactics to refuse to admit that a Soviet Germany (if a German Soviet
republic were soon to arise) would have to recognise the Treaty of
Versailles for a time, and to submit to it. From this it does not follow
that the Independents—at a time when the Scheidemanns were in the
government, when the Soviet government in Hungary had not yet been
overthrown, and when it was still possible that a Soviet revolution in
Vienna would support Soviet Hungary—were right, under the circumstances,
in putting forward the demand that the Treaty of Versailles should be
signed. At that time the Independents tacked and manoeuvred very
clumsily, for they more or less accepted responsibility for the
Scheidemann traitors, and more or less backslid from advocacy of a
ruthless (and most calmly conducted) class war against the Scheidemanns,
to advocacy of a "classless" or "above-class" standpoint.

 

In the present situation, however, the German Communists should
obviously not deprive themselves of freedom of action by giving a
positive and categorical promise to repudiate the Treaty of Versailles
in the event of communism’s victory. That would be absurd. They should
say: the Scheidemanns and the Kautskyites have committed a number of
acts of treachery hindering (and in part quite ruining) the chances of
an alliance with Soviet Russia and Soviet Hungary. We Communists will do
all we can to facilitate and pave the way for such an alliance. However,
we are in no way obligated to repudiate the Treaty of Versailles, come
what may, or to do so at once. The possibility of its successful
repudiation will depend, not only on the German, but also on the
international successes of the Soviet movement. The Scheidemanns and the
Kautskyites have hampered this movement; we are helping it. That is the
gist of the matter; therein lies the fundamental difference. And if our
class enemies, the exploiters and their Scheidemann and Kautskyite
lackeys, have missed many an opportunity of strengthening both the
German and the international Soviet movement, of strengthening both the
German and the international Soviet revolution, the blame lies with
them. The Soviet revolution in Germany will strengthen the international
Soviet movement, which is the strongest bulwark (and the only reliable,
invincible and world-wide bulwark) against the Treaty of Versailles and
against international imperialism in general. To give absolute,
categorical and immediate precedence to liberation from the Treaty of
Versailles and to give it precedence over the question of
liberating other countries oppressed by imperialism, from the yoke of
imperialism, is philistine nationalism (worthy of the Kautskys, the
Hilferdings, the Otto Bauers and Co.), not revolutionary
internationalism. The overthrow of the bourgeoisie in any of the large
European countries, including Germany, would be such a gain for the
international revolution that, for its sake, one can, and if necessary
should, tolerate a more prolonged existence of the Treaty of
Versailles. If Russia, standing alone, could endure the Treaty of
Brest-Litovsk for several months, to the advantage of the revolution,
there is nothing impossible in a Soviet Germany, allied with Soviet
Russia, enduring the existence of the Treaty of Versailles for a longer
period, to the advantage of the revolution.

 

The imperialists of France, Britain, etc., are trying to provoke and
ensnare the German Communists: "Say that you will not sign the Treaty of
Versailles!" they urge. Like babes, the Left Communists fall into the
trap laid for them, instead of skilfully manoeuvring against the crafty
and, at present, stronger enemy, and instead of telling him, "We shall
sign the Treaty of Versailles now." It is folly, not revolutionism, to
deprive ourselves in advance of any freedom of action, openly to inform
an enemy who is at present better armed than we are whether we shall
fight him, and when. To accept battle at a time when it is obviously
advantageous to the enemy, but not to us, is criminal; political leaders
of the revolutionary class are absolutely useless if they are incapable
of "changing tack, or offering conciliation and compromise" in order to
take evasive action in a patently disadvantageous battle.

 



“LEFT-WING” COMMUNISM IN GREAT BRITAIN


 

There is no Communist Party in Great Britain as yet, but there is a
fresh, broad, powerful and rapidly growing communist movement among the
workers, which justifies the best hopes. There are several political
parties and organisations (the British Socialist Party^(³⁸), the
Socialist Labour Party, the South Wales Socialist Society, the Workers’
Socialist Federation^(³⁹)), which desire to form a Communist Party and
are already negotiating among themselves to this end. In its issue of
February 21, 1920, Vol. VI, No. 48, _The Workers’ Dreadnought_, weekly
organ of the last of the organisations mentioned, carried an article by
the editor, Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst, entitled "Towards a Communist
Party". The article outlines the progress of the negotiations between
the four organisations mentioned, for the formation of a united
Communist Party, on the basis of affiliation to the Third International,
the recognition of the Soviet system instead of parliamentarianism, and
the recognition of the dictatorship of the proletariat. It appears that
one of the greatest obstacles to the immediate formation of a united
Communist Party is presented by the disagreement on the questions of
participation in Parliament and on whether the new Communist Party
should affiliate to the old, trade-unionist, opportunist and
social-chauvinist Labour Party, which is mostly made up of trade unions.
The Workers’ Socialist Federation and the Socialist Labour
Party^(⁴⁰) are opposed to taking part in parliamentary elections and in
Parliament, and they are opposed to affiliation to the Labour Party; in
this they disagree with all or with most of the members of the British
Socialist Party, which they regard as the "Right wing of the Communist
parties" in Great Britain. (Page 5, Sylvia Pankhurst’s article.)

 

Thus, the main division is the same as in Germany, notwithstanding the
enormous difference in the forms in which the disagreements manifest
themselves (in Germany the form is far closer to the "Russian" than it
is in Great Britain), and in a number of other things. Let us examine
the arguments of the "Lefts".

 

On the question of participation in Parliament, Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst
refers to an article in the same issue, by Comrade Gallacher, who writes
in the name of the Scottish Workers’ Council in Glasgow.

 

"The above council," he writes, "is definitely anti-parliamentarian, and
has behind it the Left wing of the various political bodies. We
represent the revolutionary movement in Scotland, striving continually
to build up a revolutionary organisation within the industries [in
various branches of production], and a Communist Party, based on social
committees, throughout the country. For a considerable time we have been
sparring with the official parliamentarians. We have not considered it
necessary to declare open warfare on them, and they are _afraid_ to open
an attack on us.

 

"But this state of affairs cannot long continue. We are winning all
along the line.

 

"The rank and file of the I.L.P. in Scotland is becoming more and more
disgusted with the thought of Parliament, and the Soviets [the Russian
word transliterated into English is used] or Workers’ Councils are being
supported by almost every branch. This is very serious, of course, for
the gentlemen who look to politics for a profession, and they are using
any and every means to persuade their members to come back into the
parliamentary fold. Revolutionary comrades _must not_ [all italics are
the author’s] give any support to this gang. Our fight here is going to
be a difficult one. One of the worst features of it will be the
treachery of those whose personal ambition is a more impelling force
than their regard for the revolution. Any support given to
parliamentarism is simply assisting to put power into the hands of our
British Scheidemanns and Noskes. Henderson, Clynes and Co. are
hopelessly reactionary. The official I.L.P. is more and more coming
under the control of middle-class Liberals, who ... have found their
’spiritual home’ in the camp of Messrs. MacDonald, Snowden and Co. The
official I.L.P. is bitterly hostile to the Third International, the rank
and file is for it. Any support to the parliamentary opportunists is
simply playing into the hands of the former. The B.S.P. doesn’t count at
all here.... What is wanted here is a sound revolutionary industrial
organisation, and a Communist Party working along clear, well-defined,
scientific lines. If our comrades can assist us in building these, we
will take their help gladly; if they cannot, for God’s sake let them
keep out altogether, lest they betray the revolution by lending their
support to the reactionaries, who are so eagerly clamouring for
parliamentary ’honours’ (?) [the query mark is the author’s] and who are
so anxious to prove that they _can rule_ as effectively as the ’boss’
class politicians themselves."

 

In my opinion, this letter to the editor expresses excellently the
temper and point of view of the young Communists, or of rank-and-file
workers who are only just beginning to accept communism. This temper is
highly gratifying and valuable; we must learn to appreciate and support
it for, in its absence, it would be hopeless to expect the victory of
the proletarian revolution in Great Britain, or in any other country for
that matter. People who can give expression to this temper of the
masses, and are able to evoke such a temper (which is very often
dormant, unconscious and latent) among the masses, should be appreciated
and given every assistance. At the same time, we must tell them openly
and frankly that a state of mind is _by itself_ insufficient for
leadership of the masses in a great revolutionary struggle, and that the
cause of the revolution may well be harmed by certain errors that people
who are most devoted to the cause of the revolution are about to commit,
or are committing. Comrade Gallacher’s letter undoubtedly reveals the
rudiments of _all_ the mistakes that are being made by the German "Left"
Communists and were made by the Russian "Left" Bolsheviks in 1908 and
1918.

 

The writer of the letter is full of a noble and working-class hatred for
the bourgeois "class politicians" (a hatred understood and shared,
however, not only by proletarians but by all working people, by
all _Kleinen Leuten_ to use the German expression). In a representative
of the oppressed and exploited masses, this hatred is truly the
"beginning of all wisdom", the basis of any socialist and communist
movement and of its success. The writer, however, has apparently lost
sight of the fact that politics is a science and an art that does not
fall from the skies or come gratis, and that, if it wants to overcome
the bourgeoisie, the proletariat must train its _own_ proletarian "class
politicians", of a kind in no way inferior to bourgeois politicians.

 

The writer of the letter fully realises that only workers’ Soviets, not
parliament, can be the instrument enabling the proletariat to achieve
its aims; those who have failed to understand this are, of course,
out-and-out reactionaries, even if they are most highly educated people,
most experienced politicians, most sincere socialists, most erudite
Marxists, and most honest citizens and fathers of families. But the
writer of the letter does not even ask—it does not occur to him to
ask—whether it is possible to bring about the Soviets’ victory over
parliament without getting pro-Soviet politicians _into_ parliament,
without disintegrating parliamentarianism from _within_, without working
within parliament for the success of the Soviets in their forthcoming
task of dispersing parliament. Yet the writer of the letter expresses
the absolutely correct idea that the Communist Party in Great Britain
must act on _scientific_ principles. Science demands, first, that the
experience of other countries be taken into account especially if these
other countries, which are also capitalist, are undergoing, or have
recently undergone, a very similar experience; second, it demands that
account be taken of _all_ the forces, groups, parties, classes and
masses operating in a given country, and also that policy should not be
determined only by the desires and views, by the degree of
class-consciousness and the militancy of one group or party alone.

 

It is true that the Hendersons, the Clyneses, the MacDonalds and the
Snowdens are hopelessly reactionary. It is equally true that they want
to assume power (though they would prefer a coalition with the
bourgeoisie), that they want to "rule" along the old bourgeois lines,
and that when they are in power they will certainly behave like the
Scheidemanns and Noskes. All that is true. But it does not at all follow
that to support them means treachery to the revolution; what does follow
is that, in the interests of the revolution, working-class
revolutionaries should give these gentlemen a certain amount of
parliamentary support. To explain this idea, I shall take two
contemporary British political documents: (1) the speech delivered by
Prime Minister Lloyd George on March 18, 1920 (as reported in _The
Manchester Guardian_ of March 19, 1920), and (2) the arguments of a
"Left" Communist, Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst, in the article mentioned
above.

 

In his speech Lloyd George entered into a polemic with Asquith (who had
been especially invited to this meeting but declined to attend) and with
those Liberals who want, not a coalition with the Conservatives, but
closer relations with the Labour Party. (In the above-quoted letter,
Comrade Gallacher also points to the fact that Liberals are joining the
Independent Labour Party.) Lloyd George argued that a coalition—and
a _close_ coalition at that—between the Liberals and the Conservatives
was essential, otherwise there might be a victory for the Labour Party,
which Lloyd George prefers to call "Socialist" and which is working for
the "common ownership" of the means of production. "It is ... known as
communism in France," the leader of the British bourgeoisie said,
putting it popularly for his audience, Liberal M.P.s who probably never
knew it before. In Germany it was called socialism, and in Russia it is
called Bolshevism, he went on to say. To Liberals this is unacceptable
on principle, Lloyd George explained, because they stand in principle
for private property. "Civilisation is in jeopardy," the speaker
declared, and consequently Liberals and Conservatives must unite....

 

"...If you go to the agricultural areas," said Lloyd George, "I agree
you have the old party divisions as strong as ever. They are removed
from the danger. It does not walk their lanes. But when they see it they
will be as strong as some of these industrial constituencies are now.
Four-fifths of this country is industrial and commercial; hardly
one-fifth is agricultural. It is one of the things I have constantly in
my mind when I think of the dangers of the future here. In France the
population is agricultural, and you have a solid body of opinion which
does not move very rapidly, and which is not very easily excited by
revolutionary movements. That is not the case here. This country is more
top-heavy than any country in the world, and if it begins to rock, the
crash here, for that reason, will be greater than in any land."

 

From this the reader will see that Mr. Lloyd George is not only a very
intelligent man, but one who has also learned a great deal from the
Marxists. We too have something to learn from Lloyd George.

 

Of definite interest is the following episode, which occurred in the
course of the discussion after Lloyd George’s speech:

 

_"Mr. Wallace, M.P._: I should like to ask what the Prime Minister
considers the effect might be in the industrial constituencies upon the
industrial workers, so many of whom are Liberals at the present time and
from whom we get so much support. Would not a possible result be to
cause an immediate overwhelming accession of strength to the Labour
Party from men who at present are our cordial supporters?

 

_"The Prime Minister:_ I take a totally different view. The fact that
Liberals are fighting among themselves undoubtedly drives a very
considerable number of Liberals in despair to the Labour Party, where
you get a considerable body of Liberals, very able men, whose business
it is to discredit the Government. The result is undoubtedly to bring a
good accession of public sentiment to the Labour Party. It does not go
to the Liberals who are outside, it goes to the Labour Party, the
by-elections show that."

 

It may be said, in passing, that this argument shows in particular how
muddled even the most intelligent members of the bourgeoisie have become
and how they cannot help committing irreparable blunders. That, in fact,
is what will bring about the downfall of the bourgeoisie. Our people,
however’ may commit blunders (provided, of course, that they are not too
serious and are rectified in time) and yet in the long run, will prove
the victors.

 

The second political document is the following argument advanced by
Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst, a "Left" Communist:

 

"... Comrade Inkpin [the General Secretary of the British Socialist
Party] refers to the Labour Party as ’the main body of the working-class
movement’. Another comrade of the British Socialist Party, at the Third
International, just held, put the British Socialist Party position more
strongly. He said: ’We regard the Labour Party as the organised working
class.’

 

"We do not take this view of the Labour Party. The Labour Party is very
large numerically though its membership is to a great extent quiescent
and apathetic, consisting of men and women who have joined the trade
unions because their workmates are trade unionists, and to share the
friendly benefits.

 

"But we recognise that the great size of the Labour Party is also due to
the fact that it is the creation of a school of thought beyond which the
majority of the British working class has not yet emerged, though great
changes are at work in the mind of the people which will presently alter
this state of affairs....

 

"The British Labour Party, like the social-patriotic organisations of
other countries, will, in the natural development of society, inevitably
come into power. It is for the Communists to build up the forces that
will overthrow the social patriots, and in this country we must not
delay or falter in that work.

 

"We must not dissipate our energy in adding to the strength of the
Labour Party; its rise to power is inevitable. We must concentrate on
making a communist movement that will vanquish it. The Labour Party will
soon be forming a government, the revolutionary opposition must make
ready to attack it" [[RjC: could be incomplete here; check]]

 

Thus the liberal bourgeoisie are abandoning the historical system of
"two parties" (of exploiters), which has been hallowed by centuries of
experience and has been extremely advantageous to the exploiters, and
consider it necessary for these two parties to join forces against the
Labour Party. A number of Liberals are deserting to the Labour Party
like rats from a sinking ship. The Left Communists believe that the
transfer of power to the Labour Party is inevitable and admit that it
now has the backing of most workers. From this they draw the strange
conclusion which Comrade Sylvia Pankhurst formulates as follows:

 

"The Communist Party must not compromise.... The Communist Party must
keep its doctrine pure, and its independence of reformism inviolate, its
mission is to lead the way, without stopping or turning, by the direct
road to the communist revolution."

 

On the contrary, the fact that most British workers still follow the
lead of the British Kerenskys or Scheidemanns and have not yet had
experience of a government composed of these people—an experience which
was necessary in Russia and Germany so as to secure the mass transition
of the workers to communism—undoubtedly indicates that the British
Communists _should_ participate in parliamentary action, that they
should, from _within_ parliament, help the masses of the workers see the
results of a Henderson and Snowden government in practice, and that they
should help the Hendersons and Snowdens defeat the united forces of
Lloyd George and Churchill. To act otherwise would mean hampering the
cause of the revolution, since revolution is impossible without a change
in the views of the majority of the working class, a change brought
about by the political experience of the masses, never by propaganda
alone. "To lead the way without compromises, without turning"—this
slogan is obviously wrong if it comes from a patently impotent minority
of the workers who know (or at all events should know) that given a
Henderson and Snowden victory over Lloyd George and Churchill, the
majority will soon become disappointed in their leaders and will begin
to support communism (or at all events will adopt an attitude of
neutrality, and, in the main, of sympathetic neutrality, towards the
Communists). It is as though 10,000 soldiers were to hurl themselves
into battle against an enemy force of 50,000, when it would be proper to
"halt", "take evasive action", or even effect a "compromise" so as to
gain time until the arrival of the 100,000 reinforcements that are on
their way but cannot go into action immediately. That is intellectualist
childishness, not the serious tactics of a revolutionary class.

 

The fundamental law of revolution, which has been confirmed by all
revolutions and especially by all three Russian revolutions in the
twentieth century, is as follows: for a revolution to take place it is
not enough for the exploited and oppressed masses to realise the
impossibility of living in the old way, and demand changes; for a
revolution to take place it is essential that the exploiters should not
be able to live and rule in the old way. It is only when the _"lower
classes" do not want_ to live in the old way and the "upper
classes" _cannot carry on in the old way_ that the revolution can
triumph. This truth can be expressed in other words: revolution is
impossible without a nation-wide crisis (affecting both the exploited
and the exploiters). It follows that, for a revolution to take place, it
is essential, first, that a majority of the workers (or at least a
majority of the class-conscious, thinking, and politically active
workers) should fully realise that revolution is necessary, and that
they should be prepared to die for it; second, that the ruling classes
should be going through a governmental crisis, which draws even the most
backward masses into politics (symptomatic of any genuine revolution is
a rapid, tenfold and even hundredfold increase in the size of the
working and oppressed masses—hitherto apathetic—who are capable of
waging the political struggle), weakens the government, and makes it
possible for the revolutionaries to rapidly overthrow it.

 

Incidentally, as can also be seen from Lloyd George’s speech, both
conditions for a successful proletarian revolution are clearly maturing
in Great Britain. The errors of the Left Communists are particularly
dangerous at present, because certain revolutionaries are not displaying
a sufficiently thoughtful, sufficiently attentive, sufficiently
intelligent and sufficiently shrewd attitude toward each of these
conditions. If we are the party of the revolutionary _class_, and not
merely a revolutionary group, and if we want the _masses_ to follow us
(and unless we achieve that, we stand the risk of remaining mere
windbags), we must, first, help Henderson or Snowden to beat Lloyd
George and Churchill (or, rather, compel the former to beat the latter,
because the former _are afraid of their victory!);_ second, we must help
the majority of the working class to be convinced by their own
experience that we are right, i.e., that the Hendersons and Snowdens are
absolutely good for nothing, that they are petty-bourgeois and
treacherous by nature, and that their bankruptcy is inevitable; third,
we must bring nearer the moment when, _on the basis_ of the
disappointment of most of the workers in the Hendersons, it will be
possible, with serious chances of success, to overthrow the government
of the Hendersons at once; because if the most astute and solid Lloyd
George, that big, not petty, bourgeois, is displaying consternation and
is more and more weakening himself (and the bourgeoisie as a whole) by
his "friction" with Churchill today and with Asquith tomorrow, how much
greater will be the consternation of a Henderson government!

 

I will put it more concretely. In my opinion, the British Communists
should unite their four parties and groups (all very weak, and some of
them very, very weak) into a single Communist Party on the basis of the
principles of the Third International and of _obligatory_ participation
in parliament. The Communist Party should propose the following
"compromise" election agreement to the Hendersons and Snowdens: let us
jointly fight against the alliance between Lloyd George and the
Conservatives; let us share parliamentary seats in proportion to the
number of workers’ votes polled for the Labour Party and for the
Communist Party (not in elections, but in a special ballot), and let us
retain _complete freedom_ of agitation, propaganda and political
activity. Of course, without this latter condition, we cannot agree to a
bloc, for that would be treachery; the British Communists must demand
and get complete freedom to expose the Hendersons and the Snowdens in
the same way as (_for fifteen years_—1903-17) the Russian Bolsheviks
demanded and got it in respect of the Russian Hendersons and Snowdens,
i.e., the Mensheviks.

 

If the Hendersons and the Snowdens accept a bloc on these terms, we
shall be the gainers, because the number of parliamentary seats is of no
importance to us; we are not out for seats. We shall yield on this point
(whilst the Hendersons and especially their new friends—or new masters
—the Liberals who have joined the Independent Labour Party are most
eager to get seats). We shall be the gainers, because we shall
carry _our_ agitation among the _masses_ at a time when Lloyd
George _himself_ has "incensed" them, and we shall not only be helping
the Labour Party to establish its government sooner, but shall also be
helping the masses sooner to understand the communist propaganda that we
shall carry on against the Hendersons, without any reticence or
omission.

 

If the Hendersons and the Snowdens reject a bloc with us on these terms,
we shall gain still more, for we shall at once have shown
the _masses_ (note that, even in the purely Menshevik and completely
opportunist Independent Labour Party, the _rank and file_ are in favour
of Soviets) that the Hendersons prefer _their_ close relations with the
capitalists to the unity of all the workers. We shall immediately gain
in the eyes- of the _masses_, who, particularly after the brilliant,
highly correct and highly useful (to communism) explanations given by
Lloyd George, will be sympathetic to the idea of uniting all the workers
against the Lloyd George-Conservative alliance. We shall gain
immediately, because we shall have demonstrated to the masses that the
Hendersons and the Snowdens are afraid to beat Lloyd George, afraid to
assume power alone, and are striving to secure the _secret_ support of
Lloyd George, who is _openly_ extending a hand to the Conservatives,
against the Labour Party. It should be noted that in Russia, after the
revolution of February 27, 1917 (old style), the Bolsheviks’ propaganda
against the Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries (i.e., the Russian
Hendersons and Snowdens) derived benefit precisely from a circumstance
of this kind. We said to the Mensheviks and the
Socialist-Revolutionaries: assume full power without the bourgeoisie,
because you have a majority in the Soviets (at the First All-Russia
Congress of Soviets, in June 1917, the Bolsheviks had only 13 per cent
of the votes). But the Russian Hendersons and Snowdens were afraid to
assume power without the bourgeoisie, and when the bourgeoisie held up
the elections to the Constituent Assembly, knowing full well that the
elections would give a majority to the Socialist-Revolutionaries and the
Mensheviks^(⁴¹) (who formed a close political bloc and in fact
represented _only_ petty-bourgeois democracy), the
Socialist-Revolutionaries and the Mensheviks were unable energetically
and consistently to oppose these delays.

 

If the Hendersons and the Snowdens reject a bloc with the Communists,
the latter will immediately gain by winning the sympathy of the masses
and discrediting the Hendersons and Snowdens, if, as a result, we do
lose a few parliamentary seats, it is a matter of no significance to us.
We would put up our candidates in a very few but absolutely safe
constituencies, namely, constituencies where our candidatures would not
give any seats to the Liberals at the expense of the Labour candidates.
We would take part in the election campaign, distribute leaflets
agitating for communism, and, in _all_ constituencies where we have no
candidates, we would urge the electors _to vote for the Labour candidate
and against the bourgeois candidate._ Comrades Sylvia Pankhurst and
Gallacher are mistaken in thinking that this is a betrayal of communism,
or a renunciation of the struggle against the social-traitors. On the
contrary, the cause of communist revolution would undoubtedly gain
thereby.

 

At present, British Communists very often find it hard even to approach
the masses, and even to get a hearing from them. If I come out as a
Communist and call upon them to vote for Henderson and against Lloyd
George, they will certainly give me a hearing. And I shall be able to
explain in a popular manner, not only why the Soviets are better than a
parliament and why the dictatorship of the proletariat is better than
the dictatorship of Churchill (disguised with the signboard of bourgeois
"democracy"), but also that, with my vote, I want to support Henderson
in the same way as the rope supports a hanged man—that the impending
establishment of a government of the Hendersons will prove that I am
right, will bring the masses over to my side, and will hasten the
political death of the Hendersons and the Snowdens just as was the case
with their kindred spirits in Russia and Germany.

 

If the objection is raised that these tactics are too "subtle" or too
complex for the masses to understand, that these tactics will split and
scatter our forces, will prevent us from concentrating them on Soviet
revolution, etc., I will reply to the "Left objectors: don’t ascribe
your doctrinairism to the masses! The masses in Russia are no doubt no
better educated than the masses in Britain; if anything, they are less
so. Yet the masses understood the Bolsheviks, and the fact that, in
September 1917, _on the eve_ of the Soviet revolution, the Bolsheviks
put up their candidates for a bourgeois parliament (the Constituent
Assembly) and _on the day after_ the Soviet revolution, in November
1917, took part in the elections to this Constituent Assembly, which
they got rid of on January 5, 1918—this did not hamper the Bolsheviks,
but, on the contrary, helped them.

 

I cannot deal here with the second point of disagreement among the
British Communists—the question of affiliation or non-affiliation to the
Labour Party. I have too little material at my disposal on this
question, which is highly complex because of the unique character of the
British Labour Party, whose very structure is so unlike that of the
political parties usual in the European continent. It is beyond doubt,
however, first, that in this question, too, those who try to deduce the
tactics of the revolutionary proletariat from principles such as: "The
Communist Party must keep its doctrine pure, and its independence of
reformism inviolate; its mission is to lead the way, without stopping or
turning, by the direct road to the communist revolution"—will inevitably
fall into error. Such principles are merely a repetition of the mistake
made by the French Blanquist Communards, who, in 1874, "repudiated" all
compromises and all intermediate stages. Second, it is beyond doubt
that, in this question too, as always, the task consists in learning to
apply the general and basic principles of communism to the _specific
relations_ between classes and parties, to the _specific features_ in
the objective development towards communism, which are different in each
country and which we must be able to discover, study, and predict.

 

This, however, should be discussed, not in connection with British
communism alone, but in connection with the general conclusions
concerning the development of communism in all capitalist countries. We
shall now proceed to deal with this subject.

 



SEVERAL CONCLUSIONS


 

The Russian bourgeois revolution of 1905 revealed a highly original turn
in world history: in one of the most backward capitalist countries, the
strike movement attained a scope and power unprecedented anywhere in the
world. In the _first month_ of 1905 _alone_, the number of strikers was
ten times the _annual_ average for the previous decade (1895-1904); from
January to October 1905, strikes grew all the time and reached enormous
proportions. Under the influence of a number of unique historical
conditions, backward Russia was the first to show the world, not only
the growth, by leaps and bounds, of the independent activity of the
oppressed masses in time of revolution (this had occurred in all great
revolutions), but also that the significance of the proletariat is
infinitely greater than its proportion in the total population; it
showed a combination of the economic strike and the political strike,
with the latter developing into an armed uprising, and the birth of the
Soviets, a new form of mass struggle and mass organisation of the
classes oppressed by capitalism.

 

The revolutions of February and October 1917 led to the all-round
development of the Soviets on a nation-wide scale and to their victory
in the proletarian socialist revolution. In less than two years, the
international character of the Soviets, the spread of this form of
struggle and organisation to the world working-class movement and the
historical mission of the Soviets as the grave-digger, heir and
successor of bourgeois parliamentarianism and of bourgeois democracy in
general, all became clear.

 

But that is not all. The history of the working-class movement now shows
that, in all countries, it is about to go through (and is already going
through) a struggle waged by communism — emergent, gaining strength and
advancing towards victory — against, primarily, Menshevism, i.e.,
opportunism and social-chauvinism (the home brand in each particular
country), and then as a complement, so to say, Left-wing communism. The
former struggle has developed in all countries, apparently without any
exception, as a duel between the Second International (already virtually
dead) and the Third International The latter struggle is to be seen in
Germany, Great Britain, Italy, America (at any rate, a
certain _section_ of the Industrial Workers of the World and of the
anarcho-syndicalist trends uphold the errors of Left-wing communism
alongside of an almost universal and almost unreserved acceptance of the
Soviet system), and in France (the attitude of a section of the former
syndicalists towards the political party and parliamentarianism, also
alongside of the acceptance of the Soviet system); in other words, the
struggle is undoubtedly being waged, not only on an international, but
even on a worldwide scale.

 

But while the working-class movement is everywhere going through what is
actually the same kind of preparatory school for victory over the
bourgeoisie, it is achieving that development in its_own way_ in each
country. The big and advanced capitalist countries are travelling this
road _far more rapidly_ than did Bolshevism, to which history granted
fifteen years to prepare itself for victory, as an organised political
trend. In the brief space of a year, the Third International has already
scored a decisive victory; it has defeated the yellow, social-chauvinist
Second International, which only a few months ago was incomparably
stronger than the Third International, seemed stable and powerful, and
enjoyed every possible support—direct and indirect, material (Cabinet
posts, passports, the press) and ideological — from the world
bourgeoisie.

 

It is now essential that Communists of every country should quite
consciously take into account both the fundamental objectives of the
struggle against opportunism and "Left" doctrinairism, and the _concrete
features_ which this struggle assumes and must inevitably assume in each
country, in conformity with the specific character of its economics,
politics, culture, and national composition (Ireland, etc.), its
colonies, religious divisions, and so on and so forth. Dissatisfaction
with the Second International is felt everywhere and is spreading and
growing, both because of its opportunism and because of its inability or
incapacity to create a really centralised and really leading centre
capable of directing the international tactics of the revolutionary
proletariat in its struggle for a world Soviet republic. It should be
clearly realised that such a leading centre can never be built up on
stereotyped, mechanically equated, and identical tactical rules of
struggle. As long as national and state distinctions exist among peoples
and countries—and these will continue to exist for a very long time to
come, even after the dictatorship of the proletariat has been
established on a world-wide scale—the unity of the international tactics
of the communist working-class movement in all countries demands, not
the elimination of variety of the suppression of national distinctions
(which is a pipe dream at present), but an application of
the _fundamental_ principles of communism (Soviet power and the
dictatorship of the proletariat), which will _correctly modify_ these
principles in certain _particulars_, correctly adapt and apply them to
national and national-state distinctions. To seek out, investigate,
predict, and grasp that which is nationally specific and nationally
distinctive, in the _concrete manner_ in which each country should
tackle a _single_ international task: victory over opportunism and Left
doctrinarism within the working-class movement; the overthrow of the
bourgeoisie; the establishment of a Soviet republic and a proletarian
dictatorship—such is the basic task in the historical period that all
the advanced countries (and not they alone) are going through. The chief
thing—though, of course, far from everything—the chief thing, has
already been achieved: the vanguard of the working class has been won
over, has ranged itself on the side of Soviet government and against
parliamentarianism, on the side of the dictatorship of the proletariat
and against bourgeois democracy. All efforts and all attention should
now be concentrated on the _next_ step, which may seem—and from a
certain viewpoint actually is —less fundamental, but, on the other hand,
is actually closer to a practical accomplishment of the task. That step
is: the search after forms of the _transition_ or the _approach_ to the
proletarian revolution.

 

The proletarian vanguard has been won over ideologically. That is the
main thing. Without this, not even the first step towards victory can be
made. But that is still quite a long way from victory. Victory cannot be
won with a vanguard alone. To throw only the vanguard into the decisive
battle, before the entire class, the broad masses, have taken up a
position either of direct support for the vanguard, or at least of
sympathetic neutrality towards it and of precluded support for the
enemy, would be, not merely foolish but criminal. Propaganda and
agitation alone are not enough for an entire class, the broad masses of
the working people, those oppressed by capital, to take up such a stand.
For that, the masses must have their own political experience. Such is
the fundamental law of all great revolutions, which has been confirmed
with compelling force and vividness, not only in Russia but in Germany
as well. To turn resolutely towards communism, it was necessary, not
only for the ignorant and often illiterate masses of Russia, but also
for the literate and well-educated masses of Germany, to realise from
their own bitter experience the absolute impotence and spinelessness,
the absolute helplessness and servility to the bourgeoisie, and the
utter vileness of the government of the paladins of the Second
International; they had to realise that a dictatorship of the extreme
reactionaries (Kornilov^(⁴²) in Russia; Kapp^(⁴³) and Co. in Germany) is
inevitably the only alternative to a dictatorship of the proletariat.

 

The immediate objective of the class-conscious vanguard of the
international working-class movement, i.e., the Communist parties,
groups and trends, is to be able to _lead_ the broad masses (who are
still, for the most part, apathetic, inert, dormant and
convention-ridden) to their new position, or, rather, to be able to
lead, _not only_ their own party but also these masses in their advance
and transition to the new position. While the first historical objective
(that of winning over the class-conscious vanguard of the proletariat to
the side of Soviet power and the dictatorship of the working class)
could not have been reached without a complete ideological and political
victory over opportunism and social-chauvinism, the second and immediate
objective, which consists in being able to lead the _masses_ to a new
position ensuring the victory of the vanguard in the revolution, cannot
be reached without the liquidation of Left doctrinairism, and without a
full elimination of its errors.

 

As long as it was (and inasmuch as it still is) a question of winning
the proletariat’s vanguard over to the side of communism, priority went
and still goes to propaganda work; even propaganda circles, with all
their parochial limitations, are useful under these conditions, and
produce good results. But when it is a question of practical action by
the masses, of the disposition, if one may so put it, of vast armies, of
the alignment of _all_ the class forces in a given society _for the
final and decisive battle_, then propagandist methods alone, the mere
repetition of the truths of "pure" communism, are of no avail. In these
circumstances, one must not count in thousands, like the propagandist
belonging to a small group that has not yet given leadership to the
masses; in these circumstances one must count in millions and tens of
millions. In these circumstances, we must ask ourselves, not only
whether we have convinced the vanguard of the revolutionary class, but
also whether the historically effective forces
of _all_ classes—positively of all the classes in a given society,
without exception—are arrayed in such a way that the decisive battle is
at hand—in such a way that: (1) all the class forces hostile to us have
become sufficiently entangled, are sufficiently at loggerheads with each
other, have sufficiently weakened themselves in a struggle which is
beyond their strength; (2) all the vacillating and unstable,
intermediate elements—the petty bourgeoisie and the petty-bourgeois
democrats, as distinct from the bourgeoisie —have sufficiently exposed
themselves in the eyes of the people, have sufficiently disgraced
themselves through their practical bankruptcy, and (3) among the
proletariat, a mass sentiment favouring the most determined, bold and
dedicated revolutionary action against the bourgeoisie has emerged and
begun to grow vigorously. Then revolution is indeed ripe; then, indeed,
if we have correctly gauged all the conditions indicated and summarised
above, and if we have chosen the right moment, our victory is assured.

 

The differences between the Churchills and the Lloyd Georges —with
insignificant national distinctions, these political types exist
in _all_ countries—on the one hand, and between the Hendersons and the
Lloyd Georges on the other, are quite minor and unimportant from the
standpoint of pure (i.e., abstract) communism, i.e., communism that has
not yet matured to the stage of practical political action by the
masses. However, from the standpoint of this practical action by the
masses, these differences are most important. To take due account of
these differences, and to determine the moment when the inevitable
conflicts between these "friends", which weaken and enfeeble _all the
"friends" taken together_, will have come to a head—that is the concern,
the task, of a Communist who wants to be, not merely a class-conscious
and convinced propagandist of ideas, but a practical leader of
the _masses_ in the revolution. It is necessary to link the strictest
devotion to the ideas of communism with the ability to effect all the
necessary practical compromises, tacks, conciliatory manoeuvres,
zigzags, retreats and so on, in order to speed up the achievement and
then loss of political power by the Hendersons (the heroes of the Second
International, if we are not to name individual representatives of
petty-bourgeois democracy who call themselves socialists); to accelerate
their inevitable bankruptcy in practice, which will enlighten the masses
in the spirit of our ideas, in the direction of communism; to accelerate
the inevitable friction, quarrels, conflicts and complete disintegration
among the Hendersons, the Lloyd Georges and the Churchills (the
Mensheviks, the Socialist-Revolutionaries, the Constitutional-Democrats,
the monarchists; the Scheidemanns, the bourgeoisie and the Kappists,
etc.); to select the proper moment when the discord among these "pillars
of sacrosanct private property" is at its height, so that, through a
decisive offensive, the proletariat will defeat them all and capture
political power.

 

History as a whole, and the history of revolutions in particular, is
always richer in content, more varied, more multiform, more lively and
ingenious than is imagined by even the best parties, the most
class-conscious vanguards of the most advanced classes. This can readily
be understood, because even the finest of vanguards express the
class-consciousness, will, passion and imagination of tens of thousands,
whereas at moments of great upsurge and the exertion of all human
capacities, revolutions are made by the class-consciousness, will,
passion and imagination of tens of millions, spurred on by a most acute
struggle of classes. Two very important practical conclusions follow
from this: first, that in order to accomplish its task the revolutionary
class must be able to master _all_ forms or aspects of social activity
without exception (completing after the capture of political power —
sometimes at great risk and with very great danger—what it did not
complete before the capture of power); second, that the revolutionary
class must be prepared for the most rapid and brusque replacement of one
form by another.

 

One will readily agree that any army which does not train to use all the
weapons, all the means and methods of warfare that the enemy possesses,
or may possess, is behaving in an unwise or even criminal manner. This
applies to politics even more than it does to the art of war. In
politics it is even harder to know in advance which methods of struggle
will be applicable and to our advantage in certain future conditions.
Unless we learn to apply all the methods of struggle, we may suffer
grave and sometimes even decisive defeat, if changes beyond our control
in the position of the other classes bring to the forefront a form of
activity in which we are especially weak. If, however, we learn to use
all the methods of struggle, victory will be certain, because we
represent the interests of the really foremost and really revolutionary
class, even if circumstances do not permit us to make use of weapons
that are most dangerous to the enemy, weapons that deal the swiftest
mortal blows. Inexperienced revolutionaries often think that legal
methods of struggle are opportunist because, in this field, the
bourgeoisie has most frequently deceived and duped the workers
(particularly in "peaceful" and non-revolutionary times), while illegal
methods of struggle are revolutionary. That, however, is wrong. The
truth is that those parties and leaders are opportunists and traitors to
the working class that are unable or unwilling (do not say, "I can’t";
say, "I shan’t") to use illegal methods of struggle in conditions such
as those which prevailed, for example, during the imperialist war of
1914-18, when the bourgeoisie of the freest democratic countries most
brazenly and brutally deceived the workers, and smothered the truth
about the predatory character of the war. But revolutionaries who are
incapable of combining illegal forms of struggle with _every_ form of
legal struggle are poor revolutionaries indeed. It is not difficult to
be a revolutionary when revolution has already broken out and is in
spate, when all people are joining the revolution just because they are
carried away, because it is the vogue, and sometimes even from careerist
motives. After its victory, the proletariat has to make most strenuous
efforts, even the most painful, so as to "liberate" itself from such
pseudo-revolutionaries. It is far more difficult—and far more
precious—to be a revolutionary when the conditions for direct, open,
really mass and really revolutionary struggle _do not yet exist_, to be
able to champion the interests of the revolution (by propaganda,
agitation and organisation) in non-revolutionary bodies, and quite often
in downright reactionary bodies, in a non-revolutionary situation, among
the masses who are incapable of immediately appreciating the need for
revolutionary methods of action. To be able to seek, find and correctly
determine the specific path or the particular turn of events that
will _lead_the masses to the real, decisive and final revolutionary
struggle—such is the main objective of communism in Western Europe and
in America today.

 

Britain is an example. We cannot tell—no one can tell in advance—how
soon a real proletarian revolution will flare up there, and _what
immediate cause_ will most serve to rouse, kindle, and impel into the
struggle the very wide masses, who are still dormant. Hence, it is our
duty to carry on all our preparatory work in such a way as to be "well
shod on all four feet" (as the late Plekhanov, when he was a Marxist and
revolutionary, was fond of saying). It is possible that the breach will
be forced, the ice broken, by a parliamentary crisis, or by a crisis
arising from colonial and imperialist contradictions, which are
hopelessly entangled and are becoming increasingly painful and acute, or
perhaps by some third cause, etc. We are not discussing the kind of
struggle that will _determine_ the fate of the proletarian revolution in
Great Britain (no Communist has any doubt on that score; for all of us
this is a foregone conclusion): what we are discussing is the _immediate
cause_ that will bring into motion the now dormant proletarian masses,
and lead them right up to revolution. Let us not forget that in the
French bourgeois republic, for example, in a situation which, from both
the international and the national viewpoints, was a hundred times less
revolutionary than it is today, such an "unexpected" and "petty" cause
as one of the many thousands of fraudulent machinations of the
reactionary military caste (the Dreyfus case^(⁴⁴)) was enough to bring
the people to the brink of civil war!

 

In Great Britain the Communists should constantly, unremittingly and
unswervingly utilise parliamentary elections and all the vicissitudes of
the Irish, colonial and world-imperialist policy of the British
Government, and all other fields, spheres and aspects of public life,
and work in all of them in a new way, in a communist way, in the spirit
of the Third, not the Second, International. I have neither the time nor
the space here to describe the "Russian" "Bolshevik" methods of
participation in parliamentary elections and in the parliamentary
struggle; I can, however, assure foreign Communists that they were quite
unlike the usual West-European parliamentary campaigns. From this the
conclusion is often drawn: "Well, that was in Russia, in our country
parliamentarianism is different." This is a false conclusion.
Communists, adherents of the Third International in all countries, exist
for the purpose of _changing_ — all along the line, in all spheres of
life—the old socialist, trade unionist, syndicalist, and parliamentary
type of work into a _new_ type of work, the communist. In Russia, too,
there was always an abundance of opportunism, purely bourgeois sharp
practices and capitalist rigging in the elections. In Western Europe and
in America, the Communist must learn to create a new, uncustomary,
non-opportunist, and non-careerist parliamentarianism; the Communist
parties must issue their slogans; true proletarians, with the help of
the unorganised and downtrodden poor, should distribute leaflets,
canvass workers’ houses and cottages of the rural proletarians and
peasants in the remote villages (fortunately there are many times fewer
remote villages in Europe than in Russia, and in Britain the number is
very small); they should go into the public houses, penetrate into
unions, societies and chance gatherings of the common people, and speak
to the people, not in learned (or very parliamentary) language, they
should not at all strive to "get seats" in parliament, but should
everywhere try to get people to think, and draw the masses into the
struggle, to take the bourgeoisie at its word and utilise the machinery
it has set up, the elections it has appointed, and the appeals it has
made to the people; they should try to explain to the people what
Bolshevism is, in a way that was never possible (under bourgeois rule)
outside of election times (exclusive, of course, of times of big
strikes, when in Russia a _similar_ apparatus for widespread popular
agitation worked even more intensively). It is very difficult to do this
in Western Europe and extremely difficult in America, but it can and
must be done, for the objectives of communism cannot be achieved without
effort. We must work to accomplish _practical_ tasks, ever more varied
and ever more closely connected with all branches of social life,
winning branch after branch, and sphere after sphere _from the
bourgeoisie._

 

In Great Britain, further, the work of propaganda, agitation and
organisation among the armed forces and among the oppressed and
underprivileged nationalities in their "own" state (Ireland, the
colonies) must also be tackled in a new fashion (one that is not
socialist, but communist not reformist, but revolutionary). That is
because, in the era of imperialism in general and especially today after
a war that was a sore trial to the peoples and has quickly opened their
eyes to the truth (i.e., the fact that tens of millions were killed and
maimed for the sole purpose of deciding whether the British or the
German robbers should plunder the largest number of countries), all
these spheres of social life and heavily charged with inflammable
material and are creating numerous causes of conflicts, crises and an
intensification of the class struggle. We do not and cannot know which
spark—of the innumerable sparks that are flying about in all countries
as a result of the world economic and political crisis—will kindle the
conflagration, in the sense of raising up the masses; we must,
therefore, with our new and communist principles, set to work to stir up
all and sundry, even the oldest, mustiest and seemingly hopeless
spheres, for otherwise we shall not be able to cope with our tasks,
shall not be comprehensively prepared, shall not be in possession of all
the weapons and shall not prepare ourselves either to gain victory over
the bourgeoisie (which arranged all aspects of social life—and has now
disarranged them—in its bourgeois fashion), or to bring about the
impending communist reorganisation of every sphere of life, following
that victory.

 

Since the proletarian revolution in Russia and its victories on an
international scale, expected neither by the bourgeoisie nor the
philistines, the entire world has become different, and the bourgeoisie
everywhere has become different too. It is terrified of "Bolshevism",
exasperated by it almost to the point of frenzy, and for that very
reason it is, on the one hand, precipitating the progress of events and,
on the other, concentrating on the forcible suppression of Bolshevism,
thereby weakening its own position in a number of other fields. In their
tactics the Communists in all the advanced countries must take both
these circumstances into account.

 

When the Russian Cadets and Kerensky began furiously to hound the
Bolsheviks—especially since April 1917, and more particularly in June
and July 1917—they overdid things. Millions of copies of bourgeois
papers, clamouring in every key against the Bolsheviks, helped the
masses to make an appraisal of Bolshevism, apart from the newspapers,
all public life was full of discussions about Bolshevism, as a result of
the bourgeoisie’s "zeal". Today the millionaires of all countries are
behaving on an international scale in a way that deserves our heartiest
thanks. They are hounding Bolshevism with the same zeal as Kerensky and
Co. did; they, too, are overdoing things and _helping us_ just as
Kerensky did. When the French bourgeoisie makes Bolshevism the central
issue in the elections, and accuses the comparatively moderate or
vacillating socialists of being Bolsheviks; when the American
bourgeoisie, which has completely lost its head, seizes thousands and
thousands of people on suspicion of Bolshevism, creates an atmosphere of
panic, and broadcasts stories of Bolshevik plots; when, despite all its
wisdom and experience, the British bourgeoisie—the most "solid" in the
world—makes incredible blunders, founds richly endowed "anti-Bolshevik
societies", creates a special literature on Bolshevism, and recruits an
extra number of scientists, agitators and clergymen to combat it, we
must salute and thank the capitalists. They are working for us. They are
helping us to get the masses interested in the essence and significance
of Bolshevism, and they cannot do otherwise, for they
have _already_ failed to ignore Bolshevism and stifle it.

 

But at the same time, the bourgeoisie sees practically only one aspect
of Bolshevism—insurrection, violence, and terror, it therefore strives
to prepare itself for resistance and opposition primarily
in _this_ field. It is possible that, in certain instances, in certain
countries, and for certain brief periods, it will succeed in this. We
must reckon with such an eventuality, and we have absolutely nothing to
fear if it does succeed. Communism is emerging in positively every
sphere of public life; its beginnings are to be seen literally on all
sides. The "contagion" (to use the favourite metaphor of the bourgeoisie
and the bourgeois police, the one mostly to their liking) has very
thoroughly penetrated the organism and has completely permeated it. If
special efforts are made to block one of the channels, the "contagion"
will find another one, sometimes very unexpectedly. Life will assert
itself. Let the bourgeoisie rave, work itself into a frenzy, go to
extremes, commit follies, take vengeance on the Bolsheviks in advance,
and endeavour to kill off (as in India, Hungary, Germany, etc.) more
hundreds, thousands, and hundreds of thousands of yesterday’s and
tomorrow’s Bolsheviks. In acting thus, the bourgeoisie is acting as all
historically doomed classes have done. Communists should know that, in
any case, the future belongs to them; therefore, we can (and must)
combine the most intense passion in the great revolutionary struggle,
with the coolest and most sober appraisal of the frenzied ravings of the
bourgeoisie. The Russian revolution was cruelly defeated in 1905; the
Russian Bolsheviks were defeated in July 1917; over 15,000 German
Communists were killed as a result of the wily provocation and cunning
manoeuvres of Scheidemann and Noske, who were working hand in glove with
the bourgeoisie and the monarchist generals, White terror is raging in
Finland and Hungary. But in all cases in all countries, communism is
becoming steeled and is growing; its roots are so deep that persecution
does not weaken or debilitate it but only strengthens it. Only one thing
is lacking to enable us to march forward more confidently and firmly to
victory, namely, the universal and thorough awareness of all Communists
in all countries of the necessity to display the utmost _flexibility_ in
their tactics. The communist movement, which is developing
magnificently, now lacks, especially in the advanced countries, this
awareness and the ability to apply it in practice.

 

That which happened to such leaders of the Second International, such
highly erudite Marxists devoted to socialism as Kautsky, Otto Bauer and
others, could (and should) provide a useful lesson. They fully
appreciated the need for flexible tactics; they themselves learned
Marxist dialectic and taught it to others (and much of what they have
done in this field will always remain a valuable contribution to
socialist literature); however, in _the application_ of this dialectic
they committed such an error, or proved to be so undialectical in
practice, so incapable of taking into account the rapid change of forms
and the rapid acquisition of new content by the old forms, that their
fate is not much more enviable than that of Hyndman, Guesde and
Plekhanov. The principal reason for their bankruptcy was that they were
hypnotised by a definite form of growth of the working-class movement
and socialism, forgot all about the one-sidedness of that form, were
afraid to see the break-up which objective conditions made inevitable,
and continued to repeat simple and, at first glance, incontestable
axioms that had been learned by rote, like: "three is more than two".
But politics is more like algebra than like higher than elementary
arithmetic, and still more like higher than elementary mathematics. In
reality, all the old form of the socialist movement have acquired a new
content, and, consequently, a new symbol, the "minus" sign, has appeared
in front of all the figures; our wiseacres, however, have stubbornly
continued (and still continue) to persuade themselves and others that
"minus three" is more than "minus two".

 

We must see to it that Communists do not make a similar mistake, only in
the opposite sense, or rather, we must see to it that a _similar
mistake_, only made in the opposite sense by the "Left" Communists is
corrected as soon as possible and eliminated as rapidly and painlessly
as possible. It is not only Right doctrinairism that is erroneous; Left
doctrinairism is erroneous too. Of course, the mistake of Left
doctrinairism in communism is at present a thousand times less dangerous
and less significant than that of Right doctrinairism (i.e.,
social-chauvinism and Kautskyism); but, after all, that is only due to
the fact that Left communism is a very young trend, is only just coming
into being. It is only for this reason that, under certain conditions,
the disease can be easily eradicated, and we must set to work with the
utmost energy to eradicate it.

 

The old forms burst asunder, for it turned out that their new
content—anti-proletarian and reactionary—had attained an inordinate
development. From the standpoint of the development of international
communism, our work today has such a durable and powerful content (for
Soviet power and the dictatorship of the proletariat) that it can and
must manifest itself in any form, both new and old; it can and must
regenerate, conquer and subjugate all forms, not only the new, but also
the old—not for the purpose of reconciling itself with the old, but for
the purpose of making all and every form—new and old—a weapon for the
complete and irrevocable victory of communism.

 

The Communists must exert every effort to direct the working-class
movement and social development in general along the straightest and
shortest road to the victory of Soviet power and the dictatorship of the
proletariat on a world-wide scale. That is an incontestable truth. But
it is enough to take one little step farther—a step that might seem to
be in the same direction—and truth turns into error. We have only to
say, as the German and British Left Communists do, that we recognise
only one road, only the direct road, and that we will not permit
tacking, conciliatory manoeuvres, or compromising—and it will be a
mistake which may cause, and in part has already caused and is causing,
very grave prejudices to communism. Right doctrinairism persisted in
recognising only the old forms, and became utterly bankrupt, for it did
not notice the new content. Left doctrinairism persists in the
unconditional repudiation of certain old forms, failing to see that the
new content is forcing its way through all and sundry forms, that it is
our duty as Communists to master all forms to learn how, with the
maximum rapidity, to supplement one form with another, to substitute one
for another, and to adapt our tactics to any such change that does not
come from our class or from our efforts.

 

World revolution has been so powerfully stimulated and accelerated by
the horrors, vileness and abominations of the world imperialist war and
by the hopelessness of the situation created by it, this revolution is
developing in scope and depth with such splendid rapidity, with such a
wonderful variety of changing forms, with such an instructive practical
refutation of all doctrinairism, that there is every reason to hope for
a rapid and complete recovery of the international communist movement
from the infantile disorder of "Left-wing" communism.

 

April 27, 1920



APPENDIX


 

Before publishing houses in our country—which has been plundered by the
imperialists of the whole world in revenge for the proletarian
revolution, and which is still being plundered and blockaded by them
regardless of all promises they made to their workers—were able to bring
out my pamphlet, additional material arrived from abroad. Without
claiming to present in my pamphlet anything more than the cursory notes
of a publicist, I shall dwell briefly upon a few points.


I. The Split Among the German Communists

 

The split among the Communists in Germany is an accomplished fact. The
"Lefts", or the "opposition on principle", have formed a separate
Communist Workers’ Party, as distinct from the Communist Party. A split
also seems imminent in Italy—I say "seems", as I have only two
additional issues (Nos. 7 and 8) of the Left newspaper, _Il Soviet_, in
which the possibility of and necessity for a split is openly discussed,
and mention is also made of a congress of the "Abstentionist" group (or
the boycottists, i.e., opponents of participation in parliament), which
group is still part of the Italian Socialist Party.

 

There is reason to fear that the split with the "Lefts", the
anti-parliamentarians (in part anti-politicals too, who are opposed to
any political party and to work in the trade unions), will become an
international phenomenon, like the split with the "Centrists" (i.e.,
Kautskyites, Longuetists, Independents, etc.). Let that be so. At all
events, a split is better than confusion, which hampers the ideological,
theoretical and revolutionary growth and maturing of the party, and its
harmonious, really organised practical work which actually paves the way
for the dictatorship of the proletariat.

 

Let the "Lefts" put themselves to a practical test on a national and
international scale. Let them try to prepare for (and then implement)
the dictatorship of the proletariat, without a rigorously centralised
party with iron discipline, without the ability to become masters of
every sphere, every branch, and every variety of political and cultural
work. Practical experience will soon teach them.

 

Only, every effort should be made to prevent the split with the "Lefts,,
from impeding—or to see that it impedes as little as possible—the
necessary amalgamation into a single party, inevitable in the near
future, of all participants in the working-class movement who sincerely
and conscientiously stand for Soviet government and the dictatorship of
the proletariat. It was the exceptional good fortune of the Bolsheviks
in Russia to have had fifteen years for a systematic and consummated
struggle both against the Mensheviks (i.e., the opportunists and
"Centrists") and against the "Lefts", long before the masses began
direct action for the dictatorship of the proletariat. In Europe and
America the same work has now to be done by forced marches, so to say.
Certain individuals, especially among unsuccessful aspirants to
leadership, may (if they lack proletarian discipline and are not honest
towards themselves) persist in their mistakes for a long time; however,
when the time is ripe, the masses of the workers will themselves unite
easily and rapidly and unite all sincere Communists to form a single
party capable of establishing the Soviet system and the dictatorship of
the proletariat.^(⁴⁵)

 


II. The Communists and The Independents in Germany

 

In this pamphlet I have expressed the opinion that a compromise between
the Communists and the Left wing of the Independents is necessary and
useful to communism, but will not be easy to bring about. Newspapers
which I have subsequently received have confirmed this opinion on both
points. No. 32 of _The Red Flag_, organ of the Central Committee, the
Communist Party of Germany (_Die Rote Fahne_, Zentralorgan der
Kommunistischen Partei Deutschlands, Spartakusbund, of March 26, 1920)
published a "statement" by this Central Committee regarding the
Kapp-Luttwitz military _putsch_ and on the "socialist government". This
statement is quite correct both in its basic premise and its practical
conclusions. The basic premise is that at present there is no "objective
basis" for the dictatorship of the proletariat because the "majority of
the urban workers" support the Independents. The conclusion is: a
promise to be a "loyal opposition" (i.e., renunciation of preparations
for a "forcible overthrow") to a "socialist government if it excludes
bourgeois-capitalist parties".

 

In the main, this tactic is undoubtedly correct. Yet, even if minor
inaccuracies of formulation should not be dwelt on, it is impossible to
pass over in silence the fact that a government consisting of
social-traitors should not (in an official statement by the Communist
Party) be called "socialist"; that one should not speak of the exclusion
of "bourgeois-capitalist parties", when the parties both of the
Scheidemanns and of the Kautskys and Crispiens are
petty-bourgeois-democratic parties; that things should never be written
that are contained in S4 of the statement, which reads:

 

"...A state of affairs in which political freedom can be enjoyed without
restriction, and bourgeois democracy cannot operate as the dictatorship
of capital is, from the viewpoint of the development of the proletarian
dictatorship, of the utmost importance in further winning the
proletarian masses over to the side of communism."

 

Such a state of affairs is impossible. Petty-bourgeois leaders, the
German Hendersons (Scheidemanns) and Snowdens (Crispiens), do not and
cannot go beyond the bounds of bourgeois democracy, which, in its turn,
cannot but be a dictatorship of capital. To achieve the practical
results ~ that the Central Committee of the Communist Party had 4, been
quite rightly working for, there was no need to write such things, which
are wrong in principle and politically harmful. It would have been
sufficient to say (if one wished to observe parliamentary amenities):
"As long as the majority of the urban workers follow the Independents,
we Communists must do nothing to prevent those workers from getting rid
of their last philistine-democratic (i.e., ’bourgeois-capitalist’)
illusions by going through the experience of having a government of
their ’own’." That is sufficient ground for a compromise, which is
really necessary and should consist in renouncing, for a certain period,
all attempts at the forcible overthrow of a government which enjoys the
confidence of a majority of the urban workers. But in everyday mass
agitation, in which one is not bound by official parliamentary
amenities, one might, of course, add: "Let scoundrels like the
Scheidemanns, and philistines like the Kautskys and Crispiens reveal by
their deeds how they have been fooled themselves and how they are
fooling the workers; their ’clean’ government will itself do the
’cleanest’ job of all in ’cleansing’ the Augean stables of socialism,
Social-Democracy and other forms of social treachery."

 

The real nature of the present leaders of the (leaders of whom it has
been wrongly said that they have already lost all influence, whereas in
reality they are even more dangerous to the proletariat that the
Hungarian Social-Democrats who styled themselves Communists and promised
to "support" the dictatorship of the proletariat) was once again
revealed during the German equivalent of the Kornilov revolt, i.e., the
Kapp-Luttwitz _putsch_.^(⁴⁶) A small but striking illustration is
provided by two brief articles—one by Karl Kautsky entitled "Decisive
Hours" ("Entscheidende Stunden") in_Freiheit_ (_Freedom_), organ of the
Independents, of March 30, 1920, and the other by Arthur Crispien
entitled "On the Political Situation" (in the same newspaper, issue of
April 14, 1920). These gentlemen are absolutely incapable of thinking
and reasoning like revolutionaries. They are snivelling philistine
democrats, who become a thousand times more dangerous to the proletariat
when they claim to be supporters of Soviet government and of the
dictatorship of the proletariat because, in fact, whenever a difficult
and dangerous situation arises they are sure to commit treachery ...
while "sincerely" believing that they are helping the proletariat! Did
not the Hungarian Social-Democrats, after rechristening themselves
Communists, also want to "help" the proletariat when, because of their
cowardice and spinelessness, they considered the position of Soviet
power in Hungary hopeless and went snivelling to the agents of the
Entente capitalists and the Entente hangmen?

 


III. Turatie and Co. in Italy

 

The issues of the Italian newspaper _Il Soviet_ referred to above fully
confirm what I have said in the pamphlet about the Italian Socialist
Party’s error in tolerating such members and even such a group of
parliamentarians in their ranks. It is still further confirmed by an
outside observer like the Rome correspondent of _The Manchester
Guardian_, organ of the British liberal bourgeoisie, whose interview
with Turati is published in its issue of March 12 1920. The
correspondent writes:

 

"... Signor Turati’s opinion is that the revolutionary peril is not such
as to cause undue anxiety in Italy. The Maximalists are fanning the fire
of Soviet theories only to keep the masses awake and excited. These
theories are however, merely legendary notions, unripe programmes,
incapable of being put to practical use. They are likely only to
maintain the working classes in a state of expectation. The very men
who. use them as a lure to dazzle proletarian eyes find themselves
compelled to fight a daily battle for the extortion of some often
trifling economic advantages so as to delay the moment when the working
classes will lose their illusions and faith in their cherished myths.
Hence a long string of strikes of all sizes and with all pretexts up to
the very latest ones in the mail and railway services—strikes which make
the already hard conditions of the country still worse. The country is
irritated owing to the difficulties connected with its Adriatic problem,
is weighed down by its foreign debt and by its inflated paper
circulation, and yet it is still far from realising the necessity of
adopting that discipline of work which alone can restore order and
prosperity."

 

It is clear as daylight that this British correspondent has blurted out
the truth, which is probably being concealed and glossed over both by
Turati himself, and his bourgeois defenders, accomplices and inspirers
in Italy. That truth is that the ideas and political activities of
Turati, Treves, Modigliani, Dugoni and Co. are really and precisely of
the kind that the British correspondent has described. It is downright
social treachery. Just look at this advocacy of order and discipline
among the workers, who are wage-slaves toiling to enrich the
capitalists! And how familiar to us Russians are all these Menshevik
speeches! What a valuable admission it is that the masses are _in favour
of_ Soviet government! How stupid and vulgarly bourgeois is the failure
to understand the revolutionary role of strikes which are spreading
spontaneously! Indeed, the correspondent of the British
bourgeois-liberal newspaper has rendered Turati and Co. a disservice and
has excellently confirmed the correctness of the demand by Comrade
Bordiga and his friends on _Il Soviet_, who are insisting that the
Italian Socialist Party, if it really wants to be _for_ the Third
International, should drum Turati and Co. out of its ranks and become a
Communist Party both in name and in deed.

 


IV. False Conclusions from Correct Premises

 

However, Comrade Bordiga and his "Left" friends draw from their correct
criticism of Turati and Co. the wrong conclusion that any participation
in parliament is harmful in principle. The Italian "Lefts" cannot
advance even a shadow of serious argument in support of this view. They
simply do not know (or try to forget) the international examples of
really revolutionary and communist utilisation of bourgeois parliaments,
which has been of unquestionable value in preparing for the proletarian
revolution. They simply cannot conceive of any "new" ways of that
utilisation, and keep on repeatedly and endlessly vociferating about the
"old" non-Bolshevik way.

 

Herein lies their fundamental error. In _all_ fields of activity, and
not in the parliamentary sphere alone, communism must _introduce_ (and
without long and persistent effort it will be _unable_ to introduce)
something new in principle that will represent a radical break with the
traditions of the Second International (while retaining and developing
what was good in the latter).

 

Let us take, say, journalistic work. Newspapers, pamphlets and leaflets
perform the indispensable work of propaganda, agitation and
organisation. No mass movement in any country at all civilised can get
along without a journalistic apparatus. No outcries against "leaders" or
solemn vows to keep the masses uncontaminated by the influence of
leaders will relieve us of the necessity of using, for this work, people
from a bourgeois-intellectual environment or will rid us of the
bourgeois-democratic, "private property" atmosphere and environment in
which this work is carried out under capitalism. Even two and a half
years after the overthrow of the bourgeoisie, after the conquest of
political power by the proletariat, we still have this atmosphere around
us, this environment of mass (peasant, artisan) bourgeois-democratic
private property relations.

 

Parliamentarianism is one form of activity; journalism is another. The
content of both can and should be communist if those engaged in these
two spheres are genuine Communists, really members of a proletarian mass
party. Yet, in neither sphere—and _in no other sphere of activity_ under
capitalism and during the period of transition from capitalism to
socialism—is it possible to avoid those difficulties which the
proletariat must overcome, those special problems which the proletariat
must solve so as to use, for its own purposes, the services of people
from the ranks of the bourgeoisie, eradicate bourgeois-intellectualist
prejudices and influences, and weaken the resistance of (and,
ultimately, completely transform) the petty-bourgeois environment.

 

Did we not, before the war of 1914-18, witness in all countries
innumerable cases of extreme "Left" anarchists, syndicalists and others
fulminating against parliamentarianism, deriding bourgeois-vulgarised
parliamentary socialists, castigating their careerism, and so on and so
forth, and yet themselves pursuing the _same kind_ of bourgeois
career _through_ journalism and _through_ work in the syndicates (trade
unions)? Is not the example of Jouhaux and Merrheim, to limit oneself to
France, typical in this respect?

The childishness of those who "repudiate" participation in parliament
consists in their thinking it possible to "_solve_" the difficult
problem of combating bourgeois-democratic influences _within_ the
working-class movement in such a "simple", "easy", allegedly
revolutionary manner, whereas they are actually merely running away from
their own shadows, only closing their eyes to difficulties and trying to
shrug them off with mere words. The most shameless careerism, the
bourgeois utilisation of parliamentary seats, glaringly reformist
perversion of parliamentary activity, and vulgar petty-bourgeois
conservatism are all unquestionably common and prevalent features
engendered everywhere by capitalism, not only outside but also within
the working-class movement. But the selfsame capitalism and the
bourgeois environment it creates (which disappears very slowly even
after the overthrow of the bourgeoisie, since the peasantry constantly
regenerates the bourgeoisie) give rise to what is essentially the same
bourgeois careerism, national chauvinism, petty-bourgeois vulgarity,
etc. —merely varying insignificantly in form—in positively every sphere
of activity and life.

 

You think, my dear boycottists and anti-parliamentarians, that you are
"terribly revolutionary", but in reality you _are frightened_ by the
comparatively minor difficulties of the struggle against bourgeois
influences within the working-class movement, whereas your victory—i.e.,
the overthrow of the bourgeoisie and the conquest of political power by
the proletariat—will create _these very same_ difficulties on a still
larger, an infinitely larger scale. Like children, you are frightened by
a minor difficulty which confronts you today, but you do not understand
that tomorrow, and the day after, you will still have to learn, and
learn thoroughly, to overcome the selfsame difficulties, only on an
immeasurably greater scale.

 

Under Soviet rule, your proletarian party and ours will be invaded by a
still larger number of bourgeois intellectuals. They will worm their way
into the Soviets, the courts, and the administration, since communism
cannot be built otherwise than with the aid of the human material
created by capitalism, and the bourgeois intellectuals cannot be
expelled and destroyed, but must be won over, remoulded, assimilated and
re-educated, just as we must—in a protracted struggle waged on the basis
of the dictatorship of the proletariat—re-educate the proletarians
themselves, who do not abandon their petty-bourgeois prejudices at one
stroke, by a miracle, at the behest of the Virgin Mary, at the behest of
a slogan, resolution or decree, but only in the course of a long and
difficult mass struggle against mass petty-bourgeois influences. Under
Soviet rule, these same problems, which the anti-parliamentarians now so
proudly so haughtily, so lightly and so childishly brush aside with a
wave of the hand—_these selfsame_ problems are arising anew _within_ the
Soviets, within the Soviet administration among the Soviet "pleaders"
(in Russia we have abolished, and have rightly abolished, the bourgeois
legal bar, but it is reviving again under the cover of the "Soviet
pleaders"^(⁴⁷)’). Among Soviet engineers, Soviet school-teachers and the
privileged, i.e., the most highly skilled and best
situated, _workers_ at Soviet factories, we observe a constant revival
of absolutely _all_ the negative traits peculiar to bourgeois
parliamentarianism, and we are conquering this evil—gradually —only by a
tireless, prolonged and persistent struggle based on proletarian
organisation and discipline.

 

Of course, under the rule of the bourgeoisie it is very "difficult" to
eradicate bourgeois habits from our own, i.e., the workers’, party; it
is "difficult" to expel from the party the familiar parliamentary
leaders who have been hopelessly corrupted by bourgeois prejudices; it
is "difficult" to subject to proletarian discipline the absolutely
essential (even if very limited) number of people coming from the ranks
of the bourgeoisie; it is "difficult" to form, in a bourgeois
parliament, a communist group fully worthy of the working class; it is
"difficult" to ensure that the communist parliamentarians do not engage
in bourgeois parliamentary inanities, but concern themselves with the
very urgent work of propaganda, agitation and organisation among the
masses. All this is "difficult", to be sure; it was difficult in Russia,
and it is vastly more difficult in Western Europe and in America, where
the bourgeoisie is far stronger, where bourgeois-democratic traditions
are stronger, and so on.

 

Yet all these "difficulties" are mere child’s play compared with
the _same sort_ of problems which, in any event, the proletariat will
have most certainly to solve in order to achieve victory, both during
the proletarian revolution and after the seizure of power by the
proletariat. Compared with _these_ truly gigantic problems of
re-educating, under the proletarian dictatorship, millions of peasants
and small proprietors, hundreds of thousands of office employees,
officials and bourgeois intellectuals, of subordinating them all to the
proletarian state and to proletarian leadership, of eradicating their
bourgeois habits and traditions—compared with these gigantic problems it
is childishly easy to create, under the rule of the bourgeoisie, and in
a bourgeois parliament, a really communist group of a real proletarian
party.

 

If our "Left" and anti-parliamentarian comrades do not learn to overcome
even such a small difficulty now, we may safely assert that either they
will prove incapable of achieving the dictatorship of the proletariat,
and will be unable to subordinate and remould the bourgeois
intellectuals and bourgeois institutions on a wide scale, or they will
have to _hastily complete their education_, and, by that haste, will do
a great deal of harm to the cause of the proletariat, will commit more
errors than usual, will manifest more than average weakness and
inefficiency, and so on and so forth.

 

Until the bourgeoisie has been overthrown and, after that, until
small-scale economy and small commodity production have entirely
disappeared, the bourgeois atmosphere, proprietary habits and
petty-bourgeois traditions will hamper proletarian work both outside and
within the working-class movement, not only in a single field of
activity—the parliamentary—but, inevitably, in every field of social
activity, in all cultural and political spheres without exception. The
attempt to brush aside, to fence oneself off from _one_ of the
"unpleasant" problems or difficulties in some one sphere of activity is
a profound mistake, which will later most certainly have to be paid for.
We must learn how to master every sphere of work and activity without
exception, to overcome all difficulties and eradicate all bourgeois
habits, customs and traditions everywhere. Any other way of presenting
the question is just trifling, mere childishness.

 

May 12, 1920

 


V

 

In the Russian edition of this book I somewhat incorrectly described the
conduct of the Communist Party of Holland as a whole, in the sphere of
international revolutionary policy. I therefore avail myself of the
present opportunity to publish a letter from our Dutch comrades on this
question and to correct the expression "Dutch Tribunists", which I used
in the Russian text, and for which I now substitute the words "certain
members of the Communist Party of Holland."^(⁴⁸)

 

N. Lenin

 


Letter From Wijnkoop

 

Moscow, June 30, 1920

 

Dear Comrade Lenin,

 

Thanks to your kindness, we members of the Dutch delegation to the
Second Congress of the Communist International were able to read
your _Left-Wing Communism—An Infantile Disorder_ prior to its
publication in the European languages. In several places in the book you
emphasise your disapproval of the part played by some members of the
Communist Party of Holland in international politics.

 

We feel, nevertheless, that we must protest against your laying the
responsibility for their actions on the Communist Party. This is highly
inaccurate. Moreover, it is unjust, because these members of the
Communist Party of Holland take little or no part in the Party’s current
activities and are endeavouring, directly or indirectly, to give effect,
in the Communist Party of Holland, to opposition slogans against which
the Party and all its organs have waged, and continue to wage to this
day, a most energetic struggle.

 

Fraternally yours,

 

D. J. Wijnkoop

(on behalf of the Dutch delegation)

 

 

 



NOTES


[←1]

     The old _Iskra_—the first illegal Marxist newspaper in Russia. It
    was founded by V. I. Lenin in 1900, and played a decisive role in
    the formation of revolutionary Marxist party of the working class in
    Russia. _Iskra’s_ first issue appeared in Leipzig in December 1900,
    the following issues being brought out in Munich, and then beginning
    with July 1902—in London, and after the spring of 1903—in Geneva.

    On Lenin’s initiative and with his participation, the editorial
    staff drew up a draft of the Party’s Programme (published
    in _Iskra_ No. 21), and prepared the Second Congress of the
    R.S.D.L.P., at which the Russian revolutionary Marxist party was
    actually founded.

    Soon after the Second Congress, the Mensheviks, supported by
    Plekhanov, won control of _Iskra._ Beginning with issue No.
    52, _Iskra_ ceased to be an organ of the revolutionary Marxists.

[←2]

     The reference is to the Mensheviks (who formed the Right and
    opportunist wing of Social-Democracy in the R.S.D.L.P.), and to the
    Socialist-Revolutionaries.

[←3]

     The reference is to the Bolshevik deputies to the Fourth Duma,
    namely, A. Y. Badayev, M. K. Muranov, G. I. Petrovsky, F. N.
    Samoilov and N. R. Shagov. At the Duma’s session of July 26 (August
    8), 1914, at which the representatives of all the
    bourgeois-landowner Duma groups approved tsarist Russia’s entry into
    the imperialist war, the Bolshevik Duma group declared a firm
    protest; they refused to vote for war credits and launched
    revolutionary propaganda among the people. In November 1914 the
    Bolshevik deputies were arrested, in February 1915 they were brought
    to trial, and exiled for life to Turukhansk Territory in Eastern
    Siberia. The courageous speeches made by the Bolshevik deputies at
    their trial, exposing the autocracy, played an important part in
    anti-war propaganda and in revolutionising the toiling masses.

[←4]

     _Longuetism_—the Centrist trend within the French Socialist Party,
    headed by Jean Longuet. During the First World War of 1914-18, the
    Longuetists conducted a policy of conciliation with the
    social-chauvinists. They rejected the revolutionary struggle and
    came out for" defence of country" in the imperialist war. Lenin
    called them petty-bourgeois nationalists. After the victory of the
    October Socialist Revolution in Russia, the Longuetists called
    themselves supporters of the proletarian dictatorship, but in fact
    they remained opposed to it. In December 1920 the Longuetists
    together with the avowed reformists, broke away from the Party and
    joined the so-called Two-and-a-Half International.

[←5]

     _Fabians_—members of the Fabian Society, a British reformist
    organisation founded in 1884. The membership consisted, in the main,
    of bourgeois intellectuals. The Fabians denied the necessity of the
    proletariat’s class struggle and the socialist revolution, and
    contended that the transition from capitalism to socialism was
    possible only through petty reforms and the gradual reorganisation
    of society. In 1900 the Fabian Society joined the Labour Party. The
    Fabians are characterised by Lenin in "British Pacifism and British
    Dislike of Theory" (see present edition, Vol. 21, pp. 260-65) and
    elsewhere.

[←6]

     The _Independent Labour Party of Britain_ (I.L.P.)—a reformist
    organisation founded in 1893 by leaders of the "new trade unions",
    in conditions of a revival of the strike struggle and the mounting
    movement for British working-class independence of the bourgeois
    parties. The I.L.P. included members of the "new trade unions" and
    those of a number of the old trade unions, as well as intellectuals
    and petty bourgeoisie who were under the influence of the Fabians.
    The I.L.P. was headed by James Keir Hardie and Ramsay MacDonald.
    From its very inception, the I.L.P. took a bourgeois-reformist
    stand, laying particular stress on parliamentary forms of struggle
    and parliamentary deals with the Liberals. Lenin wrote of the I.L.P.
    that "in reality it is an opportunist party always dependent on the
    bourgeoisie".

[←7]

     _Ministerialism_ (or "ministerial socialism", or else
    Millerandism)—the opportunist tactic of socialists’ participation in
    reactionary bourgeois governments. The term appeared when in 1899,
    the French socialist Millerand joined the bourgeois government of
    Waldeck-Rousseau.

[←8]

     The _Independent Social_-_Democratic Party of Germany_—a Centrist
    party founded in April 1917.

    A split took place at the Congress of the Independent
    Social-Democratic Party, held in Halle in October 1920, the majority
    joining the Communist Party of Germany in December 1920. The Right
    wing formed a separate party, retaining the old name of the
    Independent Social-Democratic Party. In 1922 the "Independents"
    re-joined the German Social-Democratic Party.

[←9]

     Lenin is referring probably to his article "What Should Not Be
    Copied from the Gennan Labour Movement", published in the Bolshevik
    magazine _Prosveshcheniye_ in April 1914 (see present edition, Vol.
    20, pp. 254-58). Here Lenin exposed the treacherous behaviour of
    Karl Legien, the German Social-Democrat who in 1912, in addressing
    the Congress of the U.S.A., praised U.S. official circles and
    bourgeois parties.

[←10]

     _Spartacists_—members of the Spartacus League founded in January
    1916, during the First World War, under the leadership of Karl
    Liebknecht, Rosa Luxemburg, Franz Mehring and Clara Zetkin. The
    Spartacists conducted revolutionary anti-war propaganda among the
    masses, and exposed the expansionist policy of German imperialism
    and the treachery of the Social-Democratic leaders. However, the
    Spartacists—the German Left wing—did not get rid of their
    semi-Menshevik errors on the most important questions of theory and
    tactics. A criticism of the German Left-wing’s mistakes is given in
    Lenin’s works "On Junius’s Pamphlet" (see present edition, Vol. 22,
    pp. 297-305), "A Caricature of Marxism and Imperialist Economism"
    (see Vol. 23, pp. 28-76) and elsewhere.

    In April 1917, the Spartacists joined the Centrist Independent
    Social-Democratic Party of Germany, preserving their organisational
    independence. After the November 1918 revolution in Germany, the
    Spartacists broke away from the "Independents", and in December of
    the same year founded the Communist Party of Germany.

[←11]

     The reference is to Frederick Engels’s letter to August Bebel,
    written on March 18-28, 1875.

[←12]

     The Treaty of Brest Litovsk was signed between Soviet Russia and
    the powers of the Quadruple Alliance (Germany, Austria-Hungary,
    Bulgaria and Turkey) on March 3, 1918, at Brest Litovsk and ratified
    on March 15 by the Fourth (Extraordinary) All-Russia Congress of
    Soviets. The peace terms were very harsh for Soviet Russia.
    According to the treaty, Poland, almost all the Baltic states, and
    part of Byelorussia were placed under the control of Germany and
    Austria-Hungary. The Ukraine was separated from Soviet Russia,
    becoming a state dependent on Germany. Turkey gained control of the
    cities of Kars, Batum and Ardagan. In August 1918, Germany imposed
    on Soviet Russia a supplementary treaty and a financial agreement
    containing new and exorbitant demands.

    The treaty prevented further needless loss of life, and gave the
    R.S.F.S.R. the ability to shift it’s attention to urgent domestic
    matters. The signing of the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk promoted the
    struggle for peace among the broad masses of all the warring
    nations, and denounced the war as a struggle between imperialist
    powers. On November 13, 1918, following the November revolution in
    Germany--the overthrow of the monarchist regime—the All-Russia
    Central Executive Committee annulled the predatory Treaty of
    Brest-Litovsk.

[←13]

     The reference is to the otzovists _[the term otzovist derives from
    the Russian verb "otozvat" meaning "to recall"._—_Ed.]_ and
    ultimatumists, the struggle against whom developed in 1908, and in
    1909 resulted in the expulsion of A. Bogdanov, the otzovist leader,
    from the Bolshevik Party. Behind a screen of revolutionary phrases,
    the otzovists demanded the recall of the Social-Democrat deputies
    from the Third Duma and the cessation of activities in legal
    organisations such as the trade unions, the co-operatives, etc.
    Ultimatumism was a variety of otzovism. The ultimatumists did not
    realise the necessity of conducting persistent day-by-day work with
    the Social-Democrat deputies, so as to make them consistent
    revolutionary parliamentarians. They proposed that an ultimatum
    should be presented to the Social-Democratic group in the Duma,
    demanding their absolute subordination to decisions of the Party’s
    Central Committee; should the deputies fail to comply, they were to
    be recalled from the Duma. A conference of the enlarged editorial
    board of the Bolshevik _paper Proletary_, held in June 1909, pointed
    out in its decision that "Bolshevism, as a definite trend in the
    R.S.D.L.P., had nothing in common either with otzovism or with
    ultimatumism". The conference urged the Bolsheviks "to wage a most
    resolute struggle against these deviations from the path of
    revolutionary Marxism" (_KPSS v rezolutsiyakh i resheniyakh
    syezdov_,_konferentsii i plenumov TsK_ [_The C.P.S.U. in the
    Resolutions and Decisions of Its Congresses_, _Conferences and
    Plenums of the Central Committee_], Part I, 1954, p. 221).

[←14]

     On August 6 (19), 1905, the tsar’s manifesto was made public,
    proclaiming the law on the setting up of the Duma and the election
    procedures. This body was known as the Bulygin Duma, after A.G.
    Bulygin, the Minister of the Interior, whom the tsar entrusted with
    drawing up the Duma draft. According to the latter, the Duma had no
    legislative functions, but could merely discuss certain questions as
    a consultative body under the tsar. The Bolsheviks called upon the
    workers and peasants to actively boycott the Bulygin Duma, and
    concentrate all agitation on the slogans of an armed uprising, a
    revolutionary army, and a provisional revolutionary government. The
    boycott campaign against the Bulygin Duma was used by the Bolsheviks
    to mobilise all the revolutionary forces, organise mass political
    strikes, and prepare for an armed uprising. Elections to the Bulygin
    Duma were not held and the government was unable to convene it. The
    Duma was swept away by the mounting tide of the revolution and the
    all-Russia October political strike of 1905.

[←15]

      Lenin is referring to the _all_-_Russia October political strike
    of 1905_ during the first Russian revolution. This strike, which
    involved over two million people, was conducted under the slogan of
    the overthrow of the tsarist autocracy, an active boycott of the
    Bulygin Duma, the summoning of a Constituent Assembly and the
    establishment of a democratic republic. The all-Russia political
    strike showed the strength of the working-class movement, fostered
    the development of the revolutionary struggle in the countryside,
    the army and the navy. The October strike led the proletariat to the
    December armed uprising. Concerning the October strike, see the
    article by V. I. Lenin ’The All-Russia Political Strike".

[←16]

     What applies to individuals also applies—with necessary
    modifications—to politics and parties. It is not he who makes no
    mistakes that is intelligent. There are no such men, nor can there
    be. It is he whose errors are not very grave and who is able to
    rectify them easily and quickly that is intelligent.

[←17]

     The "_opposition on principle_" -- a group of German Left-wing
    Communists advocating anarcho-syndicalist views. When the Second
    Congress of the Communist Party of Germany, which was held in
    Heidelberg in October 1919, expelled the opposition, the latter
    formed the so-called Communist Workers’ Party of Germany, in
    April 1920. To facilitate the unification of all German communist
    forces and win over the finest proletarian. elements in the
    C.W.P.G., the opposition was temporarily admitted into the Communist
    International in November 1920 with the rights of a sympathising
    member.

    However, the Executive Committee of the Communist International
    still considered the United Communist Party of Germany to be the
    only authoritative section of the Comintern. C.W.P.G.’s
    representatives were admitted into the Comintern on the condition
    that they merged with the United Communist Party of Germany and
    supported all its activities. The C.W.P.G. leaders, however, failed
    to observe these conditions. The Third Congress of the Communist
    International, which was held in June-July 1921, and wanted
    solidarity with workers who still followed the C.W.P.G. Leaders,
    resolved to give the C.W.P.G. two months to call a congress and
    settle the question of affiliation. The C.W.P.G. Leaders did not
    obey the Third Congress’s resolution and thus placed themselves
    outside the Communist International. Later the C.W.P.G. degenerated
    into a small sectarian group without any support in the working
    class.

[←18]

     _Homer_, _Karl_—Anton Pannekoek.

[←19]

     Karl Erler, "The Dissolution of the Party", Kommunistische
    Arbeiterzeitung, Hamburg, February 7, 1920, No. 32:

    "The working class cannot destroy the bourgeois state without
    destroying bourgeois democracy, and it cannot destroy bourgeois
    democracy without destroying parties."

    The more muddle-headed of the syndicalists and anarchists in the
    Latin countries may derive "satisfaction" from the fact that solid
    Germans, who evidently consider themselves Marxists (by their
    articles in the above-mentioned paper K. Erler and K. Homer have
    shown most plainly that they consider themselves sound Marxists, but
    talk incredible nonsense in a most ridiculous manner and reveal
    their failure to understand the ABC of Marxism), go to the length of
    making utterly inept statements. Mere acceptance of Marxism does not
    save one from errors. We Russians know this especially well, because
    Marxism has been very often the "fashion" in our country.

     

[←20]

     The reference is to the _League of Struggle for the Emancipation of
    the Working Class_ organised by V. I. Lenin in the autumn of 1895.
    The League of Struggle united about twenty Marxist circles in St.
    Petersburg. It was headed by the Central Group including V. I.
    Lenin, A. A. Vaneyev, P. K. Zaporozhets, G. M. Krzhizhanovsky, N. K.
    Krupskaya, L. Martov, M. A. Silvin, V. V. Starkov, and others; five
    members headed by V. I. Lenin directed the League’s activities. The
    organisation was divided into district groups. Progressive workers
    such as I. V. Babushkin, V. A. Shelgunov and others linked these
    groups with the factories.

    The St. Petersburg League of Struggle for the Emancipation of the
    Working Class was, in V. I. Lenin’s words, the embryo of a
    revolutionary party based on the working-class movement and giving
    leadership to the class struggle of the proletariat.

[←21]

     The Congress was held in Moscow from March 29 to April 5, 1920. The
    Ninth Congress was more numerous than any previous Party congresses.
    It was attended by 715 delegates—553 of them with full votes, and
    162 with deliberative votes—representing a membership of 611,978.
    Represented were the Party organisations of Central Russia, the
    Ukraine, the Urals, Siberia and other regions recently liberated by
    the Red Army. Many of the delegates came to the Congress straight
    from the front.

    The agenda of the Congress was as follows:

    1. The report of the Central Committee. 
    2. The immediate tasks of economic construction. 
    3. The trade union movement. 
    4. Organisational questions. 
    5. The tasks of the Communist International. 
    6. The attitude towards the co-operatives. 
    7. The change-over to the militia system. 
    8. Elections to the Central Committee. 
    9. Miscellaneous.

    The Congress was held under the guidance of V. I. Lenin, who was the
    main speaker on the political work of the Central Committee and
    replied to the debate on the report. He also spoke on economic
    construction and co-operation, made the speech at the closing of the
    Congress, and submitted a proposal on the list of candidates to the
    Party’s Central Committee.

    In the resolution "The Immediate Tasks of Economic Development" the
    Congress noted that "the basic condition of economic rehabilitation
    of the country is a steady implementation of the single economic
    plan for the coming historical epoch" (_KPSS v rezolutsiyakh i
    resheniyakh syezdov_, _konferentsii i plenumow TsK_ [_The C.P.S.U.
    in the Resolutions and Decisions of Its Congresses_, _Conferences
    and Plenums of the Central Committee_], Part I, 1954, p. 478). The
    kingpin of the single economic plan was electrification, which V. I.
    Lenin considered a great programme for a period of 10 to 20 years.
    The directives of the Ninth Congress were the basis of the plan
    conclusively drawn up by the State Commission for the
    Electrification of Russia (the GOELRO plan) and approved by the
    All-Russia Congress of Soviets in December 1920.

    The Congress paid particular attention to the organisation of
    industrial management. The resolution on this question called for
    the establishment of competent, firm and energetic one-man
    management. Taking its guidance from Lenin, the Congress especially
    stressed the necessity to extensively enlist old and experienced
    experts.

    The anti-Party group of Democratic Centralists, consisting of
    Sapronov, Osinsky, V. Smirnov and others, came out against the Party
    line. Behind a cover of phrases about Democratic Centralism but in
    fact distorting that principle, they denied the need for one-man
    management at factories, came out against strict Party and state
    discipline, and alleged that the Central Committee did not give
    effect to the principle of collective leadership.

    The group of Democratic Centralists was supported at the Congress by
    Rykov, Tomsky, Milyutin and Lomov. The Congress rebuffed the
    Democratic Centralists and rejected their proposals.

    The Congress gave special attention to labour emulation and
    communist _Subbotniks._ To stimulate such emulation, the extensive
    application of the bonus system of wages was recommended. The
    Congress resolved that May 1, the international proletarian holiday,
    which in 1920 fell on Saturday, should be a
    mass _Subbotnik_ organised throughout Russia.

    An important place in the work of the Congress was held by the
    question of trade unions, which was considered from the viewpoint of
    adapting the entire work of the trade unions to the accomplishment
    of the economic tasks. In a resolution on this question, the
    Congress distinctly defined the trade unions’ role their relations
    with the state and the Party, forms and methods of guidance of trade
    unions by the Communist Party, as well as forms of their
    participation in communist construction. The Congress decisively
    rebuffed the anarcho-syndicalist elements (Shlyapnikov, Lozovsky,
    Tomsky and Lutovinov), who advocated the "independence" of the trade
    unions and contraposed them to the Communist Party and the Soviet
    government.

    At a closed meeting held on April 4, the Congress elected a new
    Central Committee of 19 members and 12 candidate members. The former
    included V.I. Lenin, A. A. Andreyev, F. E. Dzerzhinsky, M. I.
    Kalinin, Y. E. Rudzutak, F. A. Sergeyev (Artyom), and J. V. Stalin.
    On April 5 the Congress concluded its work.

[←22]

     Malinovsky was a prisoner of war in Germany. On his return to
    Russia when the Bolsheviks were in power he was instantly put on
    trial and shot by our workers. The Mensheviks attacked us most
    bitterly for our mistake—the fact that an _agent provocateur_ had
    become a member of the Central Committee of our Party. But when,
    under Kerensky, we demanded the arrest and trial of Rodzyanko, the
    Chairman of the Duma, because he had known, even before the war,
    that Malinovsky was an _agent provocateur_ and _had not
    informed_ the Trudoviks and the workers in the Duma, neither the
    Mensheviks nor the Socialist-Revolutionaries in the Kerensky
    government supported our demand, and Rodzyanko remained at large and
    made off unhindered to join Denikin.

[←23]

     Between the February 1917 Revolution and 1919 inclusively, the
    Party’s membership changed as follows: by the Seventh All-Russia
    Conference of the R.S.D.L.P.(B.) (April 1917) the Party numbered
    80,000 members, by the Sixth R.S.D.L.P.(B.) Congress in July-August
    1917—about 240,000, by the Seventh Congress of the R.C.P.(B.) in
    March 1918—not less than 270,000; by the Eighth Congress of the
    R.C.P.(B.) in March 1919—313,766 members.

[←24]

     The reference is to _Party Week_, which was held in accordance with
    the resolution of the Eighth Congress of the R.C.P.(B.) on building
    up the Party’s membership. The Party Week was conducted in
    conditions of the bitter struggle waged by the Soviet state against
    the foreign intervention and domestic counterrevolution. Party Week
    was first held in the Petrograd organisation of the R.C.P.(B.),
    August 10-17, 1919 (the second Party Week was held in Petrograd in
    October-November 1919); between September 20 and 28 a Party Week was
    held in the Moscow Gubernia organisation. Summarising the experience
    of the first Party Weeks, the Plenum of the Central Committee of the
    R.C.P.(B.), held on September 26, 1919, resolved that Party Weeks
    should be held in cities, the countryside and the army. At the end
    of September, the Central Committee addressed a circular to all
    Party organisations pointing out that, as the re-registration and
    purge of the membership had been accomplished in almost all Party
    organisations, new members might be enrolled. The Central Committee
    stressed that during Party Weeks only industrial workers, peasants,
    and Red Army and Navy men should be admitted into the Party. As a
    result of Party Weeks, over 200,000 joined the Party in 38 gubernias
    of the European part of the R.S.F.S.R., more than a half of them
    being industrial workers. Over 25 per cent of the armed forces’
    strength joined the Party at the fronts.

[←25]

     See LCW, Vol. 30, pp. 253-75.

[←26]

      The _Communist International_ -- a journal, organ of the Executive
    Committee of the Communist International. It was published in
    Russian, German, French, English, Spanish and Chinese, the first
    issue appearing on May 1, 1919.

    The journal published theoretical articles and documents of the
    Comintern, including a number of articles by Lenin. It elucidated
    the fundamental questions of Marxist-Leninist theory in connection
    with problems confronting the international working-class and
    communist movement and the experience of socialist construction in
    the Soviet Union. It also waged a struggle against various
    anti-Leninist tendencies.

    Publication of the journal ceased in June 1943 in connection with
    the resolution adopted by the Presidium of the Comintern’s Executive
    Committee on May 15, 1943, on the dissolution of the Communist
    International.

[←27]

     See Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, _Selected Correspondence_,
    Moscow, 1965, p. 110.

[←28]

     The _Industrial Workers of the World (I.W.W.)_—a workers’ trade
    union organisation, founded in the U.S.A. in 1905, and in the main
    organising unskilled and low-paid workers of various trades. Among
    its founders were such working-class leaders as Daniel De Leon,
    Eugene Debs and William Haywood. I.W.W. organisations were also set
    up in Canada, Australia, Britain, Latin America and South Africa. In
    conditions of the mass strike movement in the U.S.A., which
    developed under the influence of the Russian revolution of 1905-07,
    the I.W.W. organised a number of successful mass strikes, waged a
    struggle against the policy of class collaboration conducted by
    reformist leaders of the American Federation of Labor and Right-wing
    socialists. During the First World War of 1914-18, the organisation
    led a number of mass anti-war actions by the American working class
    Some I.W.W. Leaders, among them William Haywood, welcomed the Great
    October Socialist Revolution and joined the Communist Party of the
    U.S.A. At the same time, anarcho-syndicalist features showed up in
    I.W.W. activities: it did not recognise the proletariat’s political
    struggle, denied the Party’s leading role and the necessity of the
    proletarian dictatorship, and refused to carry on work among the
    membership of the American Federation of Labor. In 1920 the
    organisation’s anarcho-syndicalist leaders took advantage of the
    imprisonment of many revolutionaries and against the will of the
    trade union masses, rejected appeal by the Comintern’s Executive
    Committee that they join the Communist International. As a result of
    the leaders’ opportunist policy, the I.W.W. degenerated into a
    sectarian organisation, which soon lost all influence on the
    working-class movement.

[←29]

     The Gomperses, Hendersons, Jouhaux and Eegiens are nothing but
    Zubatovs, differing from our Zubatov only in their European garb and
    polish, and the civilised, refined and democratically suave manner
    of conducting their despicable policy.

[←30]

      I have had too little opportunity to acquaint myself with
    ’Leftwing’, communism in Italy. Comrade Bordiga and his faction of
    Abstentionist Communists (Comunista astensionista) are certainly
    wrong in advocating non-participation in parliament. But on one
    point, it seems to me, Comrade Bordiga is right—as far as can be
    judged from two issues of his paper, Il Soviet (Nos. 3 and 4,
    January 18 and February 1, 1920), from four issues of Comrade
    Serrati’s excellent periodical, Comunismo (Nos. 1-4, October
    l-November 30, 1919), and from separate issues of Italian bourgeois
    papers which I have seen. Comrade Bordiga and his group are right in
    attacking Turati and his partisans, who remain in a party which has
    recognised Soviet power and the dictatorship of the proletariat, and
    yet continue their former pernicious and opportunist policy as
    members of parliament. Of course, in tolerating this, Comrade
    Serrati and the entire Italian Socialist Party are making a mistake
    which threatens to do as much harm and give rise to the same dangers
    as it did in Hungary, where the Hungarian Turatis sabotaged both the
    party and the Soviet government from within. Such a mistaken,
    inconsistent, or spineless attitude towards the opportunist
    parliamentarians gives rise to "Leftwing" communism, on the one
    hand, and to a certain extent justifies its existence, on the other.
    Comrade Serrati is obviously wrong when he accuses Deputy Turati of
    being "inconsistent" (Comunismo No. 3), for it is the Italian
    Socialist Party itself that is inconsistent in tolerating such
    opportunist parliamentarians as Turati and Co.

[←31]

     See Marx / Engels, _Werke_, Dietz Verlag, Berlin, 1962, Bd. 18, S.
    533.

[←32]

     Within every class, even in the conditions prevailing in the most
    enlightened countries, even within the most advanced class, and even
    when the circumstances of the moment have aroused all its spiritual
    forces to an exceptional degree, there always are—and
    inevitably _will be_ as long as classes exist, as long as a
    classless society has not fully consolidated itself, and has not
    developed on its own foundations -- representatives of the class who
    do not think, and are incapable of thinking, for themselves.
    Capitalism would not be the Oppressor of the masses that it actually
    is, if things were otherwise.

[←33]

     See Marx / Engels, _Werke_, Dietz Verlag, Berlin, 1962, Bd. 18, S.
    533.

[←34]

     The _League of Nations_ was an international body which existed
    between the First and the Second World Wars. It was founded in 1919
    at the Paris Peace Conference of the victor powers of the First
    World War. The Covenant of the League of Nations formed part of the
    Treaty of Versailles of 1919, and was signed by 44 nations. The
    Covenant was designed to produce the impression that this
    organisation’s aim was to combat aggression, reduce armaments, and
    consolidate peace and security. In practice, however its leaders
    shielded the aggressors, fostered the arms race and preparations for
    the Second World War.

    Between 1920 and 1934, the League’s activities were hostile towards
    the Soviet Union. It was one of the centres for the organising of
    armed intervention against the Soviet state in

    On September 15, 1934, on French initiative, 34 member states
    invited the Soviet Union to join the League of Nations which the
    U.S.S.R. did, with the aim of strengthening peace. However, the
    Soviet Union’s attempts to form a peace front met with resistance
    from reactionary circles in the Western powers. With the outbreak of
    the Second World War the League’s activities came to an end, the
    formal dissolution taking place in April 1946, according to a
    decision by the specially summoned Assembly.

[←35]

     Lenin is referring to a passage from Frederick Engels’s letter
    to F. A. Sorge of November 29, 18X6, in which, criticising German
    Social-Democrat political exiles living in America, Engels wrote
    that for them the theory was "a credo, not a guide to action" (see
    Karl Marx and Frederick Engels, _Selected Correspondence_, Moscow,
    1965, p. 395).

[←36]

     The reference is to the international socialist conferences in
    Zimmerwald and Kienthal (Switzerland).

    The _Zimmerwald Conference_, the first international socialist
    conference, was held on September 5-8, 1915. The _Kienthal
    Conference_, the second international socialist conference, was held
    in the small town of Kienthal on April 24-30, 1916.

    The Zimmerwald and Kienthal conferences contributed to the
    ideological unity, on the basis of Marxism-Leninism, of the
    Left-wing elements in West-European Social-Democracy, who later
    played an active part in the formation of Communist parties in their
    countries and the establishment of the Third Communist
    International.

[←37]

     "_Revolutionary Communists_"—a Narodnik group which broke away from
    the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries after the latter’s mutiny in
    July 1918. In September 1918, they formed the "Party of
    Revolutionary Communism", which favoured co-operation with the
    R.C.P.(B.), and pledged support for Soviet power. Their programme
    which remained on the platform of Narodnik utopianism was muddled
    and eclectic. While recognising that Soviet rule created
    preconditions for the establishment of a socialist system, the
    "revolutionary communists" denied the necessity of the proletarian
    dictatorship during the transitional period from capitalism to
    socialism. Throughout the lifetime of the "Party of Revolutionary
    Communism", certain of its groups broke away from it, some of them
    joining the R.C.P.(B.) (A. Kolegayev, A. Bitsenko, M. Dobrokhotov
    and others), and others, the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries. Two
    representatives of the "Party of Revolutionary Communism" were
    allowed to attend the Second Congress of the Comintern, in a
    deliberative capacity, but with no votes. In September 1920,
    following the Congress decision that there must be a single
    Communist Party in each country, the "Party of Revolutionary
    Communism" decided to join the R.C.P.(B.). In October of the same
    year, the R.C.P.(B.) Central Committee permitted Party organisations
    to enrol members of the former "Party of Revolutionary Communism" in
    the R.C.P.(B.).

[←38]

     The _British Socialist Party_ was founded in 1911, in Manchester,
    as a result of a merger of the Social-Democratic Party and other
    socialist groups. The B.S.P. conducted agitation in the spirit of
    Marxism, it was "not opportunist and was _really_ independent of the
    Liberals". However, its small membership and its poor links with the
    masses gave the B.S.P. a somewhat sectarian character. During the
    First World War, a bitter struggle developed within the British
    Socialist Party between the internationalists (William Gallacher,
    Albert Inkpin, John Maclean, Theodore Rothstein and others), and the
    social-chauvinists, headed by Hyndman. Within the internationalist
    trend were inconsistent elements that took a Centrist stand on a
    number of issues. In February 1916, a group of B.S.P. Leaders
    founded the newspaper _The Call_, which played an important role in
    uniting the internationalists. The B.S.P.’s annual conference, held
    in Salford in April 1916, condemned the social-chauvinist stand of
    Hyndman and his supporters who after the conference, left the party.

    The British Socialist Party welcomed the Great October Socialist
    Revolution, its members playing an important part in the "Hands Off
    Russia" movement. In 1919, the overwhelming majority of its
    organisations (98 against 4) declared for affiliation to the
    Communist International. The British Socialist Party, together with
    the Communist Unity Group formed the core of the Communist Party of
    Great Britain. At the First (Unity) Congress, held in 1920. the vast
    majority of B.S.P. local organisations entered the Communist Party.

[←39]

     The _Socialist Labour Party_ was organised in 1903 by a group of
    the Left-wing Social-Democrats who had broken away from the
    Social-Democratic Federation. The _South Wales Socialist
    Society_ was a small group consisting mostly of Welsh coal miners.
    The _Workers’ Socialist Federation_ was a small organisation which
    emerged from the Women’s Suffrage League and consisted mostly of
    women.

    The Leftist organisations did not join the Communist Party of Great
    Britain when it was formed (its Inaugural Congress was held on July
    31-August 1, 1920) since the Party’s programme contained a clause on
    the Party participation in parliamentary elections and on
    affiliation to the Labour Party. At the Communist Party’s Congress
    in January 1921, the South Wales Socialist Society and the Workers’
    Socialist Federation, which had assumed the names of the Communist
    Workers’ Party and the Communist Party respectively, united with the
    Communist Party of Great Britain under the name of the United
    Communist Party of Great Britain. The leaders of the Socialist
    Labour Party refused to join.

[←40]

     I believe this party is opposed to affiliation to the Labour Party
    but not all its members are opposed to participation in Parliament.

[←41]

      The results of the November 1917 elections to the Constituent
    Assembly in Russia, based on returns embracing over 36,000,000
    voters, were as follows: the Bolsheviks obtained 25 per cent of the
    votes; the various parties of the landowners and the bourgeoisie
    obtained 13 per cent, and the petty-bourgeois-democratic parties,
    i.e., the Socialist-Revolutionaries, Mensheviks and a number of
    similar small groups obtained 62 per cent.

[←42]

     This refers to the counter-revolutionary mutiny organised in August
    1917 by the bourgeoisie and the landowners, under the Supreme
    Commander-in-Chief, the tsarist general Kornilov. The conspirators
    hoped to seize Petrograd, smash the Bolshevik Party, break up the
    Soviets, establish a military dictatorship in the country, and
    prepare the restoration of the monarchy.

    The mutiny began on August 25 (September 7), Kornilov sending the
    3rd Cavalry Corps against Petrograd, where Kornilov
    counter-revolutionary organisations were ready to act.

    The Kornilov mutiny was crushed by the workers and peasants led by
    the Bolshevik Party. Under pressure from the masses, the Provisional
    Government was forced to order that Kornilov and his accomplices be
    arrested and brought to trial.

[←43]

     The reference is to the military-monarchist coup d’tat, the
    so-called Kapp _putsch_ organised by the German reactionary
    militarists. It was headed by the monarchist landowner Kapp and
    Generals Ludendorff, Seeckt and Luttwitz. The conspirators prepared
    the coup with the connivance of the Social-Democratic government. On
    March 13, 1920, the mutinous generals moved troops against Berlin
    and, meeting with no resistance from the government, proclaimed a
    military dictatorship. The German workers replied with a general
    strike. Under pressure from the proletariat the KaDT, Rovernment was
    overthrown on March 17, and the Social-Democrats again took power.

[←44]

     The _Dreyfus case_—a provocative trial organised in 1894 by the
    reactionary-monarchist circles of the French militarists. On trial
    was Dreyfus, a Jewish officer of the French General Staff, falsely
    accused of espionage and high treason. Dreyfus’s conviction—he was
    condemned to life imprisonment—was used by the French reactionaries
    to rouse anti-Semitism and to attack the republican regime and
    democratic liberties. When, in 1898, socialists and progressive
    bourgeois democrats such as Emile Zola, Jean Jaures, and Anatole
    France launched a campaign for Dreyfus’s re-trial, the case became a
    major political issue and split the country into two camps—the
    republicans and democrats on the one hand, and a bloc of
    monarchists, clericals, anti-Semites and nationalists, on the other.
    Under the pressure of public opinion, Dreyfus was released in 1899,
    and in 1906 was acquitted by the Court of Cassation and reinstated
    in the Army.

[←45]

     With regard to the question of future amalgamation of the "Left"
    Communists, the anti-parliamentarians, with the Communists in
    general, I would make the following additional remarks. In the
    measure in which I have been able to familiarise myself with the
    newspapers of the "Left" Communists and the Communists in general in
    Germany, I find that the former have the advantage of being better
    able than the latter to carry on agitation among the masses. I have
    repeatedly observed something similar to this in the history of the
    Bolshevik Party, though on a smaller scale, in individual local
    organisations, and not on a national scale. For instance, in 1907-08
    the "Left" Bolsheviks, on certain occasions and in certain places,
    carried on more successful agitation among the masses than we did.
    This may partly have been due to the fact that a revolutionary
    moment, or at a time when revolutionary recollections are still
    fresh, it is easier to approach the masses with tactics of sheer
    negation. This, however, is not an argument to prove the correctness
    of such tactics. At all events, there is not the least doubt that a
    Communist _party_ that wishes to be the real vanguard, the advanced
    detachment, of the revolutionary _class_, of the proletariat—and
    which, in addition wishes to learn to lead the _masses_, not only
    the proletarian, but also the non-proletarian masses of working and
    exploited people—must know how to conduct propaganda, how to
    organise, and how to carry on agitation in a manner most simple and
    comprehensible, most clear and vivid, both to the urban, factory
    masses and to the rural masses.

[←46]

     Incidentally, this has been dealt with in an exceptionally clear,
    concise, precise and Marxist way in the excellent organ of the
    Austrian Communist Party, _The Red Banner_, of March 28 and
    30, 1920. (_Die Rote Fahne_, Wien, 1920, Nos. 266 and 267; L.L.:
    "_Ein neuer Abschnitt der deutschen Revolution_" ["A New Stage of
    the German Revolution" -- _Ed_]).

[←47]

     _"Soviet pleaders"_—collegiums of advocates established in February
    1918, under the Soviets of Workers’, Soldiers’, Peasants’ and
    Cossacks’ Deputies. In October 1920, these collegiums were
    abolished.

[←48]

     On the basis of this directive from Lenin the words "certain
    members of the Communist Party of Holland" have been substituted
    everywhere in this volume, in the text of _"Left_-_Wing"
    Communism_ --_ an Infantile Disorder_ for the expression "Dutch
    Tribunists".
